Vol. I. 2
CLINTON BRADSHAW. CHAPTER I.
Near
the court house, in one of our principal
cities
,
(the especial whereabout and name, for certain
reasons, we must leave to the sagacity of our
readers
,)
in an autumnal evening, about eight o'clock, or
after, not many years since, a young gentleman might
have been seen walking in rather a quick step, like
one who felt himself in somewhat of a hurry. On
reaching the door of what appeared to be a
lawyer's
office, he rapped quickly against it with a
leaden-headed rattan, such as were then, and are
now, much the fashion. Come in, said a voice,
from the upper story of the building, from the
window
of which a light shone forth into the street.
Hold a light, Bradshaw, said the visiter, as he
entered the lower room, or I may break my neck
over some of these chairs.
Come a-head, my dear fellow; be cat-like, see
in the dark, or feelyou know the room; besides,
fancy you are stealing to your lady-love, and, though
you need not tread with a feathery step, yet, be a
little cautious. Take care you don't run your
proboscis
against the stair doorit's open: if you do,
there'll be blood upon thy face; that won't look
well at the party. Mind, there's a nail I fasten the
door with, that may interfere with your
inexpressibles
:
I've none to lend you;I'm as poor as Job's
turkey.
I am ditto to Mr. Burke, and that's a good
reason
why you should have held the light, said the
visiter, who, by this time, had ascended the stairs
free of harm, and entered the room. He found
Bradshaw busily engaged, with his coat off, in the
act of polishing a pair of pumps. The room was
filled with rough shelves, which were covered with
books, most of them of the law, as could be
distinguished
by the covers; but, in a kind of recess,
formed by the flue of the chimney, was a number
of miscellaneous works, which appeared to have
seen some service. There was a screen in the
room; behind it was a bed; and in the centre of
the chamber, near the fire-place, in which was a
little fire burning, stood a table; on it were
scattered
papers and books, apparently in much
confusion
.
Why, Bradshaw, you are a pretty fellow! It's
after eight o'clock, and here you are blacking your
pumps, and not dressed yet. Bah! your hands are
as black as a chimney sweep's: I'd have a fellow
to attend to such things for me, if I had to go in
debt for it.
So would I, and so do I; but the Rev. Mr.
Longshore, who does me this honour, has gone to an
abolition meeting,and the calls of patriotism, or
rather philanthropy, are, with him, stronger, of
course, than pecuniary considerations. See, I'm
giving them a polish like his face.
Bradshaw, said his companion, (whose name
was Henry Selman, and who carefully dusted a
chair ere he seated himself,) what do you think
of these abolitionists?
Think of them! Why, that some of them are
knaves, some of them are fools, and some of them
are honest, but misguided, men. But, tell me, who's
to be at the party?
Why, all the world and his wife; I'm told the
old fellow is going to do the handsome thing. He's
made great preparations, and the womankind have
been talking of it this week past. I wonder if the
old chap is as rich as it is said?
Doubtful.
What makes you think so?
Various circumstances; however, it is
generally
thought that, if he lives, he will be very wealthy.
He, you know, is alike fond of money and display.
He wants to win caste among the aristocratic, and
he seeks to hide his original obscurity in display:
he cannot throw off the filthy dowlas of the
plebeian
,
but he can cover it with patrician robes.
It sometimes, as you know, steals out, though most
wofully. I should rather say this of the family than
of the old man, for he is indifferent to the
aristocracy
with which they would inoculate him. But
why do you ask? are you speculating upon the
solid charms of his daughters?
Why, that depends, as you would say, upon
the speculations of the father; they are fine girls,
but they're as plenty as blackberries.
Ay, and the parent stem is thorny: you must
take care in the plucking, else you will find the
thorns remain, after the sweets are not only plucked,
but goneall but the memory. There is no fun in
wooing for gold, and marrying a portionless bride;
besides, the old man's a hard knot, and if he had
wealth, you would feel hope deferred for many
a year, and of that heart sickness an unloved wife
could not cure you. Again: though his fortune
might give one daughter a splendid dower, think
of it, when divided among the race of Perrys that
are, and are to be.
Bradshaw, you're a strange fellow: I never
saw such a mixture of sensuality and sentiment,
worldliness and romance, in any man, before.
Well, sir, that's bad news: it's the very
temperament
to bedevil a man; for between the
conflicting
feelings which must be engendered in such
a character, there must always be an
irresoluteness
of purposean action and reactionthat will
make any thing but a successful, or a happy being.
Bradshaw's brow clouded as he spoke. He had
finished the task which Mr. Longshore, but for the
abolition meeting, would have performed for him,
and with his toilet made, for he was quick and
careless
in making it, he stood leaning, with his arms
folded, against the mantel-piece, looking
abstractedly
2*
into the fire. Selman paused, for a moment,
from the self-complacent act of striking his
square-toed
shoe with his rattan, struck with the
interesting
and intellectual appearance of Bradshaw: He
was rather below the middle size, and of slender
and graceful proportions; his head was finely
shaped; the hair thick and wavy, and worn
carelessly
,
without any regard to the fashion, though it
had been cut fashionably; the forehead was rather
broad and perpendicular, than high; and his eye
was dark and deeply set, with a quick and
searching
glance. It was capable of every variety of
expression
,
and no one could look upon it, for a
moment
,
without being struck by its expression. His
nose was straight and finely formed, and the mouth
chiselled, with compressed lips, for one so young,
but which relaxed into a winning or scornful smile
in an instant. There was, in him, that undefinable
interest which some men create in the bosoms even
of their most familiar acquaintances, and which
strikes the most casual observer, and makes him
anxious to know more of the character before him.
He will occupy a considerable portion of this
narrative
.
At the period where we now begin his history,
he is about nineteen years of age, and a student of
law. His previous biography is soon told: He is
the only son of a most respectable farmer, whose
progenitors landed on the pilgrim rock, among that
little band who were the fathers of New England.
In the progress of years, the immediate ancestors
of Clinton Bradshaw emigrated to one of our
middle
states, and there his father tilled the farm
which had been, for more than a century and a
half, in his family.
Clinton Bradshaw had, in early life, very bad
health; so much so as to prevent him, for many
years, from going to school. His mother,
however
,
did all she could to compensate him for the
loss: she kept him as close at his books, as his
health and truant disposition would allow:
nevertheless
,
he grew up, to the age of fifteen, without
schooling
in any respect. His health was often
an excuse for him not only to quit the tasks of
the master, but to throw aside those of the
mother
,
and roam at large through the woods and by
the streams where his wayward inclination led
him. Yet, in consequence of severe attacks of
indisposition, he was, at periods, much confined
to the house; and by his mother's side he would
read, day after day, and week after week, every
variety of books, which, at his age, could interest
a youthful mind; and some, which older minds
delight in. Notwithstanding the religious
character
of his parentsthey were Methodistshe
was allowed to read just what he chose, and what
the large circulating library of the city supplied;
as any thing that would relieve his suffering, or
make him forgetful of his tedious confinement,
that which a spirited boy so illy bears, was
permitted
him. Romances, history, biography,
novels
,
poems, were thus open to him, and through
them he roamed, with as little restraint as through
his father's fields, when his health permitted him
to do so. His parents, too, though very plain
people
,
at the period to which we allude, visited a
great deal among their neighbours and in the city;
and to divert the mind of their sonthe only son
as well as to keep him immediately under the
parental eye, for they felt momently and
intensely
anxious about his health, they always took him
with them. In his early years a little stool was
placed in the bottom of the gig for him, as
regularly
as the horse was harnessed; and when he
grew older, Clinton's saddle was put upon his
pony, and he accompanied his father to the
different
county meetings, religious and political; for
the father felt an interest in both; and, though a
modest and retiring man, was a leading character
among his neighbours. At the quiltings and
apple-butter
frolics, Clinton was a favourite with
every bodythe farmers, their wives and
daughters
,
always welcomed him. At the husking
matches, where the negroes collect in the slave
states with the labouring class of whites, on some
allotted evening, and make a frolic of stripping
the corn, which has previously been thrown in a
pile, from the husks, no one's coming gave more
real satisfaction to all. The old negroes would
observe, There comes Massa Clinton; he good
to poor nigger; he make good massa: and the
youngsters would grin from ear to ear, with the
anticipation of some harmless trick that Clinton
would be sure to play off upon some one. The
whites, too, would greet him, one and all; his
presence
,
young as he was, never failed to give
delight
to every one. In this way Clinton
Bradshaw's
character became a marked one in early
life. In the company of his father and mother,
he went frequently into the best society the
neighbourhood
afforded, (in it were some of the oldest
and most respectable families in the country,) and
under circumstances where he seldom met boys
of his age; this compelled him to seek what
enjoyment
he found on such occasions, in the
conversations
of his elders, male and female. He
would stand by his father's side and listen, for
hours, to matters of grave discussion between him
and his friends, or talk with the old ladies of his
mother and themselves: with the young ones he
was most popular; he early learned the thousand
nameless arts of pleasing them, which he
practised
not with the sheepishness of a boy, but just
with boyishness enough to make them remark
what a man he would be. From these various
scenes, when his mother did not accompany him,
he would return and tell her all about them. As
his father was not communicative concerning his
meetings with his friends, through Clinton, Mrs.
Bradshaw generally learned what his father said
and what others said. To his mother, and his
little sister,he had but one sister,he would
narrate all he saw in the female community of the
neighbourhood: and whenever he had been from
home they were sure to ask him all about his
visit
,
which he could recount with a discrimination
of character and powers of conversation far above
his years. All these various circumstances made
him manly, early, and gave him address,
self-possession
and self-reliance in every company. His
reading, in his long hours of sickness, had been
such as to fit him to shine in society.
At fifteen, Clinton's health rapidly improved;
so much so that, at his own request, he was taken
from the county school and boarded in the city,
that he might attend the high school, or college,
if we give the epithet to the institution with
which the trustees were wont to dignify it. In
town his mind rapidly developed itself; in the
routine of school his companions surpassed him,
but in composition and declamation he stood
unrivalled
.
He was popular, both with his tutors
and his school-mates; for though hasty, and prone
to resentment, he was frank, magnanimous, and
daring. He had, however, the temperament which
is said to belong to genius. He was subject to an
inequality of spirits, and to a depression, which
sometimes made him moody in the gayest scenes.
This was observed of him in his early boyhood;
he would retire from his companions, in the midst
of their gaiety, and sit apart, musing, for hours.
He was, perhaps, rather suspicious: this, in after
life, he attributed to reading tales of treachery and
blood, such as first caught his attention in
boyhood
.
Without the occurrence of any material
incident, other than may be noticed in the
progress
of our narrative, Clinton Bradshaw left
school with a high reputation for talentthe very
highestand commenced the study of the law.
In the office, in the upper story of which our
readers
have been introduced to him, he had been a
student nearly a year.
CHAPTER II.
Mr. James Perry
, at whose house the party
was given, was one of that class of individuals
who are frequently to be met with in our
country
.
From extreme poverty and obscurity he
had risen to opulence, and that kind of reputation
which opulence bestows. On 'Change, he was
bowed to with profound respect by his brother
merchants; the lawyer knew him as one able to
fee well; the mechanic, as one who paid well; the
young, fashionable men, about town, as the old
chap who had daughters and something to give
them; and the young ladies, that is, certain of
them, as the delightful old gentleman with such
fine sons; and the solicitors of all sorts of
nameless
charities, as the very one whom they had best
get to head the lists of contributions: therefore,
Mr. Perry was a distinguished citizen. He was
a shrewd, money-making, money-keeping old
man, with a good deal of worldly wisdom. He
did not look upon the bright side of human
nature
,
but he was good-natured, and he retained
much of his original vulgarity, which did not
trouble himself, but afflicted his family sorely.
Mr. Perry had four daughters and two sons;
the oldest of the daughters was married to Mr.
Joseph Nutt, who formed one of the firm of
Perry
,
Nutt, & Co.; the Co. being represented by the
eldest son of Mr. Perry; namely, Mr. James
Perry
,
jr. The rest of the family were unmarried,
but marriageable. There was, first, Miss Priscilla
Perry, and then Miss Penelope Perry, and then
Miss Jane Perry, and then, last, though not least,
at least in his own estimation, was Mr.
Washington
Perry. The mother of this race was a thin,
bustling, active old lady, who loved her children
devotedly, and always sided with them when any
discussion took place between them and their
father
on certain fashionable proprieties, which the
old gentleman seemed to have a propensity to
violate
,
or rather not to understand. Upon this point
Mrs. Perry felt herself entitled to admonish him,
as she was sometimes wont to observe, in the
family
circle, that she came of a family who knew
what high life was when Mr. Perry first got
acquainted
with her: and he had to show the
devotion
of years, in which time his property did not
decrease, before the lady could be brought to
consent
to accept his long proffered hand.
Two suits of rooms were thrown open to
receive
the company who assembled on this
evening
.
It was, literally, a squeeze. An individual
moved about to the eminent risk of his
neighbours'
toes and to, apparently, the unutterable
damage
of the ladies' dresses. It required the skill
of an accomplished tactician to step amidst the
mass of fashionables (dare we use the expression)
and not do injury. How frowningly disdainful
would curl some fair one's lips, when some one
whom she held of little worth disordered her
robes in passing!particularly if the individual
chanced to be one of her own sex, the why and
wherefore of whose invitation she held
debateable
.
These squeezes are a great test of
amiability
.
How many passions are attempted to be
thrown off with the old dress! and how many
soft phrases and kind looks are put on with the
new one! which, like it, often lose their gloss
before the evening is over;and yet here were
many happy faces that were really emblems of
happy heartsand many more, that wore the
seeming, and had it notthis counterfeiting,
though, proves one thingthat the true coin is
not only current, but valuable.
The party was a brilliant oneall the fashion
of the town were there, and they had assembled
before Bradshaw and his friend arrived.
I declare, Mr. Selman, said Miss Penelope
Perry
,
a plump, pretty, good-natured coquettish girl, I
declare you are really getting too fashionable; you
are the last of all!
Not in your good opinion, I hope, Miss
Penelope
,
said Selman, with a most gallant air, which
was meant to be tender.
You deserve to be, if you are not, sir, for
coming at such a time.
I assure you, Miss Penelope, said Bradshaw,
it was my fault. I detained Selman; and the
Vol. I. 3
only way I could keep him was, by discoursing of
yourself.
As this was said, Selman took his seat by Miss
Penelope, and Bradshaw, cutting his eye at him,
whispered, Three is bad company, and
sauntered
to another part of the room.
My, what fine manners Mr. Bradshaw has,
said Miss Penelope; he's so good-looking, and they
say he is superior to all the young men in the city.
Is it so?
The way that superior to all the young men
in the city was pronounced, gave Selman, for a
moment, a queer sensation, that was not
pleasurable
,
but he rallied and said,
He's the finest fellow I know; as that wild
Kentuckian
,
Willoughby, says, he's a whole-souled
fellow
.
I wonder he don't go more into society, I never
saw easier manners.
Yes, he has very fine manners; but, Miss
Penelope
,
said Selman, lowering his voice, why did
you treat me so coldly at your sister's, Mrs. Nutts,
last night? You had neither smile nor look for any
one but that booby Bates.
Kentuck, said Bradshaw to Willoughby, in
another part of the room, how do you like our
city? and how does this gay scene before you
compare
with old Kentuck?
Why, sir, said Willoughby, who was proud of
being a Kentuckian, Kentuck would not suffer in
the comparison. There we have more frankness;
and in getting up a ball or party extempore we
could beat you. I wish, Bradshaw, you would take
a trip across the mountains with me, some of these
days, and judge for yourself; you would be
delighted
with the Kentuckians, and, to tell the truth,
you remind me a good deal of them.
Thank you, sir. Estimating your countrymen
as I know you do, I feel, indeed, that you have
paid me a compliment.
Ah, Mr. Willoughby, I'm glad to see you, sir,
said old Mr. Perry, advancing towards the young
men, and giving them a hearty shake of the hand;
you must make a good report of us, when you
write home. Mr. Bradshaw, you are welcome, sir.
I believe you are not yet acquainted with my wife,
sir,my ladyMrs. Perry?
I have not yet had that pleasure, sir; though
I have several times called upon the Miss Perrys,
I have not been so fortunate as to see your lady.
The old gentleman took the arm of Bradshaw
and led him up to Mrs. Perry, who was standing
by the mantel-piece, with great dignity, waiting
the approach of her guests. Bradshaw was,
accordingly
,
introduced.
I believe, Mr. Perry built this house himself,
ma'am, said Clinton, looking round the ample
dimensions
of the room, and at the costly furniture,
did he not?
Yes, siroh, yes, sir; and, I believe, I may lay
claim to some of it as being according to my taste.
All of it, I should presume, ma'am.
Yes, sir, and the Miss Perrys, the folding-doors,
sirthey are broader, you perceive, than they are
generally made. I took the hint from Mrs.
Holliday's
,
and she, I'm told, saw all the houses after
this fashion when she was in Europe.
Mrs. Holliday; is she here, ma'am?
Yes, sir: that tall lady in black, whom you see
standing by the piano. She is a delightful lady; I
love her very much.
I have the pleasure of knowing her.
Yes, Mr. Clinton Bradshaw, it seems you know
every body this evening, except me, your old
school-mate
,
said a sweet voice at Bradshaw's elbow.
Bradshaw turned quickly, and well he might.
The speaker was a female, and could scarcely be
sixteen. Her form was of the finest proportions,
and graceful as could be; perhaps, she was not
quite tall enough. The rose was just budding.
The delicately moulded hand, which he felt
tremble
a little, as he clasped it, was proverbially
beautiful
and fair. The neck, thrown archly back,
may be, with a little consciousness, was nearly hid
by long and clustering curls of light auburn hair,
that seemed, as the light was reflected on them
from a large mirror opposite, to have been gathered
of sunbeams, among which night had partly thrown
her shadows, if I may dare to use such an
expression
,
and bound upon her brow with starry looking
pearl. Her forehead was very fair, but rather
broad than high, and the eyebrow rather deeply
drawn, and slightly arching. Her eye was blue
blue as heaven, with a softness over it, like a
summer's
sky seen between whitest clouds; but its
expression
changed with every feeling, while a
playful
archness and sensibility lurked in her exquisite
and redolent lip.
Mary, he exclaimed, warmly,I beg
pardon
,
Miss Carlton, when did you come to town?
Yes, sir, you're a pretty schoolmate to neglect
your old friends at this rate! I brought a note for
you from your sister, and I was determined you
should not have it till you called for it. I came to
town the day before yesterday, and this is the first
you knew of it, is it? And here you have been in
the room this half hour, and, I verily believe, you
have spoken to every one in it, old and young,
except
myself!
No, Mary, no, said Bradshaw, in a low voice
`Every humbler altar passed,
I now have reached the shrine at last.'
Indeed, I am glad to see you. If I had known you
were here, I should not have loitered away so long:
I should have had the pleasure of waiting on you
here. How is my sister? But I heard from her
to-day.
Is she well?
Yes.
She has written you a very long letter. She
said you were to be out there next Sunday. She
charged me to tell you to take care of your health.
My kind parents and sister think I am still an
invalid, and they regard me still as the poor, frail
child who gave them so much uneasiness. I
consider
myself now in strong health, and, as I never
was much of a student, and read less now than I
3*
did two years since, there is a likelihood of my
health remaining strong.
I hope so; but, Mr. Clinton, what if you should
become dissipated among your city friends? I
suppose
you flatter yourself, that you have strength
of mind sufficient to resist all temptation.
Quite the contrary: I find that the prayer, `Lead
us not into temptation,' which I have so often heard
my father repeat, must be mine in spirit and in
truth; for, Mary, to tell you the truth, I fear,
whenever
I get into temptation, temptation gets the
better
of me. Won't you be my guardian angel?
Why, sir, according to your confession, you'll
want a whole host of guardian angels; as many
as were appointed in Pope's poem to guard the
lady's hair,and, after all, you know, the lock was
stolen.
Ah, but, Mary, who would not struggle with a
thousand invisible shapes of air, and defy their
influence
,
to win such a lock? said Bradshaw, gazing
upon her own luxuriant tresses.
Come, Mr. Clinton, none of your flattery here,
sir, said she, slightly blushing; talk to me as you
used to talk to me at school, when you walked
home between Emily and me, and bore our baskets
for us, and gathered the wild berries, and plucked
the wild rose, and kept away the wild bull: do you
remember that time? continued she, drawing
involuntarily
closer to his side; I shall never forget
it, Clinton. Now, sometimes, it occurs to me you
are altering, particularly since you have come to
town: you seem more worldly, and more cold, and
more ambitious, and what you say is said in choicer
language, and with more self-possession, but is there
so much of the heart in it?
More of it, to you, Mary; but come, take my
arm and promenade with me, and let me make
some of these exquisites around us envious.
Pray, who is that? said a young man, in
another
part of the room, by the name of Bates, to his
companion; who is that, on whose arm Miss
Carlton
is leaning?
The interrogator is the same individual whom
Selman, in reproaching Miss Penelope Perry for
neglecting him, called booby Bates. He is a
young gentleman who has high notions of himself,
high aristocratic notions of family,
notwithstanding
his father was a pedlar, and peddled, with a
pack upon his back, tapes and needles to the
mothers
of those around him, whom he affects to call
plebeians. Mr. Bates was fresh from college, and
strongly reminded one of Swift's lines
Near a bow-shot from the college,
Half the world from sense or knowledge.
His companion was a young gentleman of his own
age and calibre. He replied to the interrogation
in an affected tone of voice, saying, 'Pon honour,
I don't know any thing about him. His father, I
believe, is an old farmerploughmanwho sells
his own turnips in the market, and has, I suspect,
hard times to raise the wind to support my
gentleman
in the study of the law. Really, Mr. Bates,
the professions are becoming quite common!
Yes, sir, very much so, Mr. Turnbullbut how
came Miss Carlton to be acquainted with him?
Why, I believe, sir, the fact is, that this young
man's father's farm joins the estate of Mr. Carlton,
and, I suppose, the young man, in running of
errands
to Mr. Carlton's, perhaps, to the overseer's,
to borrow some article of husbandry for his father,
chanced to get acquainted with Miss Carlton.
She seems to treat him very kindly.
He fastened himself upon her, probably, and
she can't get rid of him. Besides, there's no
accounting
for tastes, you know; ha, ha, his father's
a shouting methodist!
We must reform these things, Mr. Turnbull,
we must reform these things, replied Mr. Bates,
adjusting his stock.
Now, I'd give a hundred dollars, thought
Selman
,
who overheard this conversation, if I had it
to give, poor devil as I am, if Bradshaw heard
this.I hate that Bates, and I've just a great mind
to tell Bradshaw. The blood of the pilgrims would
be up in his veins, as Kentuck would say, like all
wrath. Selman was a great lover and utterer of
quaint sayings.
The dancing now commenced. Mr. Bates, with
an air of extreme affectation, treading on his toes,
and bending forward, advanced to Miss Carlton,
and begged the honour of her hand for the dance.
Thank you, sir, replied Miss Carlton; I
promised
to promenade this set with Clintonwith
Mr. Bradshaw. Are you acquainted with Mr.
Bates, Mr. Bradshaw? Gentlemen, permit me to
make you acquainted.
The young men bowed to each other: Bradshaw
with easy civility, and Bates with much
awkwardness
,
which was intended for dignity.
How long have you been home, Mr. Bates?
asked Bradshaw.
About a month, sir.
I have not had the pleasure of meeting you
before
,
sir. When Professor D, of Yale, was in
our city, some three months since, I had the
honour
of making his acquaintance. I received a
letter
from him to-day: he spoke of you, sir, and of
several of your fellow students; and desired me to
present his compliments to those of the graduates
with whom I might be acquainted.
Was he well, sir.
Yes, sir, I thank you, very well, replied
Bradshaw
,
as he bowed and passed onward, with Miss
Carlton leaning on his arm.
The dance went on merrily. Selman was making
the agreeable, with all his might, to Miss Penelope
Perry; and the lady appeared to be particularly
kind. Mrs. Perry was seated on the sofa, talking
with one of the elder ladies, but evidently
abstracted
:
judging from the expression of her eye, and its
direction, she was observing the Miss Perrys. The
way in which she contrived to keep all of them in
the maternal vision, was an art which none but
mothers, fond of their daughters, and anxious for
them, can practise. There is a beauty and joy in
the glittering dance which makes even age
blithesome
!
The merry musicthe many twinkling
feet keeping time with itthe profusion of lights
the happy faces looking onand the thousand
little
flirtations which the very courtesies of the dance
call up in the feelings of partners, however
indifferent
to each other,how strong, at the moment,
the feelings of others, differently situated!
combine
to make the scene one of enjoyment to all.
Even the old gentlemen, who had been busily
discussing
the politics of the day over Mr. Perry's
wine, quit the one, and forgot the other, while they
joined the circle round the dancers, and called up the
day of Auld lang Syne. To an observer of
human
nature, it is a pleasant sight, to behold, on such
occasions, how the gray heads and caps of the
company
will become suddenly brisk and youthful in
their civilities to each other. Then it is, the young
discover that the manners of their fathers, which
struck them as cold formalitiesthe formalities of
another age, which must have been one of stiff
ceremonies
are,
in fact, as social as their own, when
the social feelings are aroused. Their parents
differ
from them only as age differs from youth; as
the snow-clad landscape, the frozen current, and
songless bird upon the withered bough of winter,
differ from the smiling landscape, the babbling
brook, and tuneful bird, of summer.
CHAPTER III.
It
was late when the company broke up.
Bradshaw
stood in the passage with his hat under his
arm, waiting to escort Miss Carlton home, who was
up stairs, arraying herself in her cloak and bonnet.
As she descended, Mr. Bates stepped up and offered
her his services.
I am sorry to deprive you of so much pleasure,
sir, said Bradshaw; but this is an honour and a
gratification which I cannot resign.
As Bradshaw passed out, with Miss Carlton
leaning
on his arm, Willoughby and Selman both
addressed
him withBradshaw, meet us at
Fleming's
.
Mary, this is a beautiful night! how bright the
moon and stars are! I should love these autumn
evenings, were it not that the leaves of these shade
trees seem, when moved by the night air, to be
sighing for summer. The happiest period of my
life was the six months after I had left my town
school, previously to my commencing law student,
which I spent in the country. How often have I
walked with yourself and Emily on such an
evening
!
The stilness of the scene, interrupted only
by the falling of the leaves, and the breath of the
wind among them, contrasts with this so strangely
and so jarringly, that I wish we were walking there
now, that Auld lang Syne might be called up
without any discordant associations.
I wish so too, with all my heart, for it seems
to me that, in town, one feels more worldly, and
disposed
to speculate upon and question feelings which,
in the country, we should be content with enjoying.
Yes, 'tis just so; and who ever yet quit a
crowded and bustling scene, such as we have just
left, and went forth, in the still night, without
feeling
a certain sense of lonelinessno, I cannot, must
not say loneliness, with you by my sidebut a
conviction
that their happiness never can spring from
such scenes, and that they constitute but a small
portion of it.
True, Clinton, said his companion, looking up
into his face; but why do you, who seem to
enjoy
such scenes so much, philosophize so much
against them?
Ay, there's the rub: I do enjoy myself a great
deal, but it is the enjoyment of mere excitement,
which must give place to gloomy thoughts. I do
believe that we start in life with a certain portion
of animal spirits, which, like a bottle of
Champaign
,
we cannot use and keep; or, to use a
homelier
illustration, we cannot eat our cake and have
it too.
But is not the memory of its enjoyment a
pleasure
?
Why, I don't know; I rather think with Byron
Joy's recollections are no longer joy,
But sorrow's memory is sorrow still
Here am I now, with the world before me, to force
my way in a toilsome and most laborious
profession
,
with thousands running the same career;
even should I win in the race, it may be at the
expense
of health, and to find the goal beside the
grave, and scarcely a breathing time, before the
breath is gone for ever.
What put you in such a strange humour,
Clinton
?
Oh, I don't know,seeing you, I suppose,
whom I have not seen for so long. It throws me
back upon all my early feelings, which, to tell the
truth, I have not called up lately. They come
upon me like an overflowing stream that has been
pent up for a long time. My `little bark of hope'
may be said to be upon the breakers, driving I
know not whitherhe who holds the helm, you
know, must not look back too often to the land he's
leftmust not look back, I fear, at allelse, he
may be wrecked upon his venturous voyage. He
must go on, like Columbus, and quell the passions
that rise, like his mutinous mariners, to force him
back. Therefore it is, Mary, that I want a
guardian
angel, as I told you early this evening, or,
rather
,
a bright particular star, to control my destiny
and make it happy.
Ah! but Clinton, said his companion, in a tone
that a close observer would have discovered
trembled
Vol. I. 4
a little, as I replied, you would want a host
of guardian angelsa milky way of stars.
This milky way of stars would but mislead me.
Mary, I should verify, to quote poetry again, for
the `stars are the poetry of heaven,' I should
verify
the lines of the poet
`A wand'ring bark upon whose path-way shone
All stars of heaven, except the guiding one.'
Well, here we are at your home. Let me pull
the bell. I have talked and felt more romantic for
this last half hour than I have since I last saw
you.
Clinton, you must call and see me very soon.
CertainlyI will call to-morrow. Good night.
Good night.
Bradshaw turned to leave; when he had
proceeded
ten or twelve steps from the door, he heard
it shut gently. Buttoning his coat close up to the
collar, he hastened down street, with a rapid step,
to Fleming's. He descended the steps of the
cellar
,
(it was an oyster cellar,) and in a few moments
stood among his companions, who were all seated
round the open stove of the establishment, waiting
for him.
Bradshaw, you must have escorted Miss
Carlton
home at a snail's paceSelman's just got here
from Mr. Perry's; he lingered round Miss Penelope
like old Mohegan about his birth-place, exclaimed
Willoughby.
Ah, did he? replied Bradshaw; I thought
several times, when I observed Miss Penelope and
Selman this evening, that she must have been
influenced
by a consideration of the text, `Blessed
are the merciful;' and you know, Selman, that love
is like mercy, it is thrice blessed;
`It blesses her that gives and him that takes.'
But beware of old Mohegan's fate, Hal; remember
he expired in a
flame
, or, what is worse, he was
literally scorched to death.
Bradshaw! exclaimed Selman, plague take
your quotations; be original. I heard you this
evening
,
with your dd die away air, repeating
Tom Moore to Miss Penelope. I don't think Tom
Moore should be repeated to any lady.
Ah, Selman, Selman, said Bradshaw,
laughing
,
`The course of true love never did run smooth.'
And I fear me that true love has run this evening
as it always runs.
I thought, said Kentuck, when I observed
Selman this evening, that he was going ahead like
one of our glorious Ohio steamers; but, by Jove, I
believe he's run against a snag since. Stranger,
he continued, imitating the rough voice of a
boatman
,
you seem to be in a bad fix.
Here they all laughed heartily, save Selman,
who tried to laugh, too, but his voice jarred like a
cracked fiddle at a concert.
A fellow never knows when he is well off,
said Bradshaw. I heard mother-in-law puff him
up to the seventh heaven to-night, and the old
gentleman
echoed it.
Come, exclaimed Selman, jumping up and
rallying; love must be fed, gentlemen, and
Bradshaw
,
I suspect you have an appetite,you have
been out so long in this cold night-air, hey? What
say you?
Yes, you're right, Selman; I have an
excellent
appetite. What say you to whisky-punch and
oysters? Or, if you feel more ethereal, wine and
oysters, or a beef-steak? for I must feed.
I go in for the punch, said Kentuck.
The viands were accordingly ordered.
Gentlemen, asked a modest, amiable young
man, named Emory, how did you enjoy
yourselves
this evening?
As for me, said Willoughby, first rate. I
stood by the sideboard and listened to father Perry
with profound attention. The way I sucked in his
wine and his wisdom was a caution. I drank
bumpers
to all his sentiments. Bradshaw, you, I thought,
were, like Selman, drinking in something else.
Yes, said Selman, I suspect, Willoughby,
you're verifying the old proverb, `In wine there is
truth.' I'll swear you're telling it on Bradshaw.
What say you, Bradshaw?
Bradshaw smiled and replied,No man is
obliged to criminate himself, as the law tells us.
Criminate himself! Why, it would be criminal not
to admire Miss Carlton!
That's a fact, said Kentuck; she's the
loveliest
creature I ever saw, east or west.
She has so much ease and grace, said Emory;
and then, for one so young, she has such sweet
manners to all.
The servant soon came in to say that their
oysters
were ready.
It's half after one, by Shrewsbury clock, said
Kentuck. We are here all alone; come one and
all into number seven. Mr. Fleming, please to let
us have a goodly number of whisky-punches. Let
me see; one, two, three, four, fivethat's it; `there's
a divinity in odd numbers.' No, we're not exactly
alone neither; I see there's a light away off in that
box.
The young men all entered box number seven,
and before they left it, their stock of oysters had
been replenished once or twice, and their glasses
repeatedly; so often as to add a great deal to their
already overflowing hilarity. The company were
five in number; namely, Bradshaw, Kentuck,
Selman
,
Emory, and another, whom we have not yet
introduced to our readers, named Cavendish, who
did not join his party until they had commenced
their supper. Cavendish was a student of law, and
from his great gravity, and a certain oddness, more,
perchance, than for his legal acquirements, although
they were very superior, his companions had
already
anticipated his elevation to the bench, by
calling him judge. The judge's gravity had been
considerably relaxed, and his tongue loosened, by
the good things which the little green curtain of
number seven hid from the vulgar eye. As the
young men came forth and took their seats round
the stove, Bradshaw and Cavendish were in warm
dispute concerning the merits of different members
of the bar.
I tell you what it is, Judge, said Bradshaw,
4*
you may depend upon it, that Glassman, in point
of real talentof geniusis the first man at this
bar. I know that he is dissipatedthat he has been
guilty of excessesthat there are many things in
his life which the world condemns: but remember
what Byron has so beautifully said of Sheridan
What to them seemed vice might be but wo!
Wo! exclaimed Cavendish, you don't pretend
to tell me there is any wo about Glassman!
Yes, I do pretend to tell you that there is wo
about Glassmanunhappiness, I mean.
Unhappiness! What a man you are,
Bradshaw
;
you're always fancying something of
somebody
.
Why, he is one of the liveliest men I ever
saw: it's a mere fondness for dissipation and
profligacy
which makes him lead such a life, and I
consider
that W and T are infinitely his
superiors
,
as lawyers. What, in the name of common
sense, makes you think that he's unhappy?
If you please, a mere fancy. I know little of
his history, and I don't know him personally; but
he's a man who always interested me. He's
dissipated
,
fond of society, yet, I'm told, has no intimates
he's a
rou
without a mistressa gambler,
indifferent
to losses or gainsand you must have
observed
,
if you've ever observed him, though not at
all avaricious, he always attends closely to business,
when he has a press of it; and it is in some
interval
of business, or when he has very little to attend
to, that he commences his scenes of dissipation: I,
therefore, conclude, that he does not seek
dissipation
for the mere love of it, but for the oblivion
which it brings. Depend upon it, no man, no
matter
how loudly he laughs, or how easily he talks,
ever exhibited such a character as Glassman, who
was not unhappy; and, much as I may startle you
with the thought, I do not believe his unhappiness
springs from disappointed ambition or treacherous
friendshipwhat think you of my saying of
Glassman
the
rou
, that I think the unhappiness, which
I attribute to him, arises from a woman.
You'll be an excellent advocate before a jury,
Bradshaw, in fancying facts, said Cavendish. I
might know a man all my life, and never elaborate
such a character of him as you've just given; and
here you, who don't know Glassman personally
know, you confess, nothing of his historyyou
pretend
to draw such conclusions!
Well, Judge, replied Bradshaw, I confess my
premises are slender, and I lay claim to no
superior
penetration, but I have often observed
Glassman
at the bar, in the street, and at different
places, and I really think what I said is correct,
though, perhaps, I could get no one to sanction my
opinion; but the superiority of his talents I can
maintain on more tenable grounds: he is the first
man at the bar, in point of natural capacity; in
legal acquirements, he is not surpassed by either
W or T; and in polite literature he is
better versed than either of them. And, pray, who
so eloquent? Who has a finer person? Who a
better
address? He joins conciliating manners with
firmness of purpose. Notwithstanding his habits,
he maintains his professional dignity, and commands
the respect of the community, not only for his
talents
,
but for himself. Who is more courted in
society
,
when he chooses to enter it, and by those
very men and women, too, who spend so much
breath in finding fault with him, behind his back.
Why, Judge, I'd rather hear him speak than any
man at this bar. His language is of the pure old
Englishsuch as one gets by reading the old poets
and prose writers of Englandracy, pointed, and
precise. His wit may be a little artificial
somewhat
after the manner of a good deal of Sheridan's
far-fetched; but, then, it is often natural, and
always
keen and applicable. If he does not always
hit the centre of the mark, he always goes near it,
even when he misses, and his arrow is sent from so
strong a bow, that it always sticks. He reasons
clearlythe most profound subject so clearly and
so simply that you do not see its profundity or its
intricacies. Then, I pray you, who wins more
causes than he, or who gives opinions that are
oftener
sustained by the courtand who can adorn
a dry legal argument with so much elegant
literature
and
who
Halloo! exclaimed Willoughby, from another
part of the cellar, where himself and Selman had
been drinking and laughing with Fleming, the
owner
of the establishment. Let's sally out boys, and
have a night of it; I feel like going my death.
So do I, said Selman; let's have a real
spree.
Agreed, said the Judge, who, though he
maintained
his argument consecutively, and carried his
liquor discreetly, more like an old limb of the law
than a young one, was overflowing, as his much
talking proved. Agreed, agreed; call me not
Judge, though, gentlemencall me not Judge; and
I shall only resume my judgeship, by your leave,
gentlemen, to fine any one as many glasses as we
can all drink, who shall dare to disturb the
joyousness
and the appropriateness of this occasion by
uttering
the ominous wordJudge.
A Daniel come to judgment, exclaimed
Willoughby
.
Joseph Willoughby, said Cavendish, assuming
his gravest face, the court fine you five glasses of
whisky-punch, or of whatever drink any individual
of this company may deem most palatable,the
court will amend their judgment, six glasses, for
Fleming will drink one with us,for transgressing
the law.
How does your Honour make that out? asked
Willoughby.
Another finetwelve glasses, said Cavendish.
How in the dl do you make that out?
shouted
Willoughby.
Fined again, said Cavendish. Joseph
Willoughby
,
alias
old Kentuck, otherwise Kentucky,
the court fine you eighteen glasseslet there be
silence
in court while the judgment is being
pronounced
and,
let it be understood, that whoever
shall refuse to drink his portion of the fines, shall
have his nose held, as does a mother hold her child's,
when she would give medicine to it, which the
ignorant
infant has not capacity to understand is for
its own good, and take voluntarily,shall have
his nose held, and a double portion administered to
him, by compulsion; the first portion, because he
ought to have taken it, and the second, because he
did not take the first portion willingly.
How do you make it out? asked Willoughby,
impatiently.
Let's have the court organized, said Bradshaw.
Cavendish, put that arm-chair on the table, and
mount it, for the judgment-seat: here, I'll turn up
this little table; it will do for a dock, in which to
place the prisoner. Constable Emory, take charge
of the prisoner, and place him in the dock, while I
assist the Honourable Jonathan Cavendish, whose
extreme decrepitudethe decrepitude of
honourable
agerequires support, to the judgment-seat.
We are thankful, however, that he does not want
spirit
to do his duty.
Listen, Joseph Willoughby,
alias
Kentuck,
alias
old Kentucky, said Cavendish to Willoughby, the
one seated in the arm-chair on the table, and the
other standing upon the inverted table, while
Emory
held his collar; listen, while the court pass
sentence upon you, and let the by-standers take
warning by your awful example. Were it not that
the court were already, for other offences, about to
fine you heavily, you should be severely fined for
appearing in court in your present beastly
condition
for,
alas! it is too apparent that you are in
such a state, that the admonition of the court will
be but little heeded:My Lord Mansfield has
observed
that there is no situation in which the
human
mind can be placed, more difficult, and more
trying, than when it is made a judge in its own
cause. The court do not think that they are
placed in this difficult situation, described by my
Lord Mansfield, though, at first blush, it would
seem that they were. The law was passed, that
you should not use the word judge on the
present
occasion; yet, no sooner was it passed, than
you exclaimed`A Daniel come to judgment.'
Now, who can pronounce the word
judge
ment,
without saying
judge
. For this, then, you are fined
six glasses. As the court were about to pass
sentence
on you for your first offence, you interrupted
the court, and used the word honour; now, as
honour
is but a synonymous word with judge, and as
on this occasion we must construe the law
according
to the
spirit
, you are as clearly finable as if
you had said judge. The third instance in which
your are finable is, for using the word devil, and
interrupting the court. Such offences as the
last-named
,
were punishable by the common law.
Therefore, Joseph Willoughby,
alias
Kentuck,
alias
old Kentucky, you are fined eighteen glasses, and
let them be immediately forthcoming. The court
are dry with much speaking.
Ha! ha! shouted Willoughby; I will say,
though I am fined again, that you're a wise judge,
and I do honour thee.
Mr. Bradshaw, said Cavendish, with great
solemnity
,
do you not mean to attend to your
duties
?
Assist the court to descend, sir.
There's one thing I'll propose, said Selman,
while they were drinking, that is, that we fine
Bradshaw for his dd quotations, and for
spouting
Tom Moore to women.
Come, let's sally forth and have a night of it!
exclaimed two or three of the company.
Gentlemen, I protest, said the Judge, scarcely
able to stand, yet as grave as he was tipsy; I
protest
,
I hope that some of usyour humble servant,
for instancehas a character to lose. Here's
Emory
,
his modesty will take him out of a scrape, as
no one will believe that he got intentionally into
it. Here's Selman; he has an excuse in the frowns
of his lady-love. It is proper, said one of the old
philosophers, to drown love in wine. Old Kentuck
is a privileged character; he can get drunk when
he pleases. Bradshaw, keep your eyes open, and
you'll be something: you have the elements of
success
in you; but mind your ways, and put the curb
bridle on your imagination and your passions; if
you don't, you'll be thrown, though you were riding
Eclipse. There, I can elaborate a character, too,
gentlemen. Each of you wend your several ways.
What, get into a spree just from Perry's party!
Why, sirs, this slanderous town will allege that we
got drunk there. I fear they could prove it upon
Kentuck; and what then, gentlemen of the jury?
I believe I'm drunkI've got a whole host of
declarations
to fill up to-morrow.Come, Kentuck
gentlemen, the court stands adjourned
sine die
this is
die
, though it is as dark as Egypt.
So saying, Cavendish took Willoughby's arm;
the rest following, they left, not without many
missteps
,
the cellar.
CHAPTER IV.
With
tipsy determination, Cavendish insisted
upon going home, and, after a good deal of
parleying
,
Cavendish, Willoughby, and Emory went one
way; Kentuck and Emory, Kentuck especially,
making a great noise, turning over boxes, and
striking his rattan against the awning-posts and
houses, and Cavendish remonstrating with them on
the loss of character, and the filthiness of the
watch-house
.
Bradshaw, arm in arm with Selman,
proceeded
to his office, where we first introduced him
to our readers. They soon reached the office,
stirred up the fire and seated themselves before it.
Bradshaw, said Selman, I don't know what
to make of you, or how to consider you:I was
a going to speak to you on this subject before we
went to the party, but you spoke of the Perrys in
such a manner, and you seemed to think every one
must like the girls for their money and for nothing
else, that
My dear fellow, interrupted Bradshaw, don't
think of that: my only motive was a little innocent
quizzing, and a wish to see how the fair lady stood
in your good gracesas I had every reason to
believe
you stood well in hers.
Vol. I. 5
Do you think so? eagerly inquired Selman.
Why, I'll tell you what it isjust how she
treats meand I'll be blowed, if I can tell how
I stand with hersometimes I think very well,
and then again her conduct is such that I'm a
great mind to cut and run. The first part of this
evening you saw how she treated me. Well, sir,
before the evening was over, she laid me flat as a
flounder.
Here Bradshaw could scarcely suppress a smile.
But, my dear fellow, you don't woo rightly. I
could quote to you whole stanzas of Byron, if you
were not so much opposed to quotation, the tenor
of which is to show that confidence wins women,
and not too many sighs.
Sometimes I am very confident; but I don't
know how to take her, and when to be confident.
Why, you must be
always
confident.
But, to tell you the truth, Bradshaw, I can't.
I used to think that I could; but the moment my
feelings became engaged, away with all
confidence
and
then she acts so inconsistently.
Sometimes
when I call to see her she is all smiles, and
evidently prefers me to all the company; at least
the fellows say so when we leave there together:
then, at other times, she will be very pleasant in
the beginning of the evening, or until company
comes, and then, by gad, I'm of no more
consequence
than a pet kitten, playing with her
knitting-ball
.
Have you ever made a declaration?
Never, directly. I have often broadly hinted
one; but, when I do, she commences singing, or
asks me some foolish question about that booby
Bates, or the ball. The other evening she was
making a fancy basket with shells, after a good
deal of twistification, continued Selman,
blushing
at the memory, I began the subject, and
she commenced playing with the shells; when
I got near the point, she asked me to snuff the
lights, and worked at her basket as if life and
death depended upon it. I swore to myself then,
and I'll keep itif ever she's my wife I'll pay
her for it.
First catch the fish, before you cook it, says
the renowned Mrs. Glass, observed Bradshaw.
I suppose you think it's a kittle of fish, said
Selman, rather snappishly; and, looking at
Bradshaw
,
keenly, he continued, Bradshaw, I begin
to think you have a notion of her yourself.
At this, Bradshaw burst into an uncontrollable
fit of laughter. Selman made castles in the ashes
for a moment or two with his rattan, and then
jumping up, he exclaimed, angrily, Mr.
Bradshaw
,
I did not think you would treat me
treacherously
,
and insult me in your own office into the
bargain.
Selman, it's a case with you, by the little god
of love. I'd no idea you were in for it so
deeply
.
My dear fellow, believe me, I would not
wound your feelings for the world;as there is
honour in man, and changeability in woman, I
have no more thought of addressing Miss
Penelope
than I have of making a declaration to the
moonI never had: besides, if I had, or if any
one else had, in my opinion they have no chance
whatever, as I really believe she has a great
regard
for my friend
What friend?
Henry Selman.
Do you truly think so, Bradshaw?
I do, though it may be just such a fancy as
the Judge accuses me of entertaining of
Glassman
.
Oh, people say you've a great deal of
penetration
.
Miss Penelope says so herself.
Bradshaw smiled as he went to the source of
the compliment, thinking we never believe so
sincerely in another's penetration, as when it
flatters
our hopes. Who cannot then be a Solomon,
at least in the estimation of one person?
What makes you think she likes me, though?
asked Selman.
O! a thousand circumstancesthe manner in
which she treats you, for instance. I don't
pretend
to know much about the sex; yet, you know,
we all form theories on the subject. I've thought
of them enough, Heaven knows; though, as Sterne
says, to make another quotation, `I love all the
sex so much that I never could fix my affection
upon one.' I've had a great deal of sickness
in my life, and I've been very much thrown
among women. I have tried to read them as I
try to read men; but this is between you and me
and your rattan. The human heart is the great
book, Selman: I am convinced, if we could only
read it rightly, (Bradshaw continued, speaking
in a kind of soliloquy, as if in his own thoughts
he had forgotten his companion's presence,) it
is the key to the inner temple, where the crown
of success is kept; get this knowledge of the
world, this key, and you may pass into the
temple
and crown yourself. I don't knowI
sometimes
think the more a man studies it, the more
he is perplexed. It is geniusa gift. A man
must be born with bumps that way, as a
phrenologist
would say. It is intuitionan instinct; but this
instinct may be made acuter by practice. What
would I not give, said Bradshaw, opening a
book, and reading aloud several lines from it, to
read mankind as I can read that bookto have
their hearts in my hands,and then throwing
the book roughly from him, as if he was angry
with himself at betraying a train of feeling which
Selman's compliment to his penetration, at which
he had but a moment before smiled, had called
up, he said, I suspect you yield too much to
her.
Yield to her! Why, I always yield to her!
You do, hey! Well, there's such a thing, I
know, as stooping to conquer, but you must not
stoop too low.
How, then?
Why, Selman, I've never been in love;
therefore
I don't know how low I should stoop if I
werebut this is my theory on the subject. I fear
that those who can theorize best in love, as well
as in other matters, practise worst. However, if
I were in your place, and could so far master my
feelings, I would go more into general society; to
be admired by many women is, perhaps, the best
way of securing the love of one. I would not be
5*
too humble. I would give my heart away, as if
I valued the gift; not as if I meant to steal
another
,
but as if I expected a fair exchange and no
robberythough an exchange which it was my
fondest, my most cherished hope to make; which
should be received with gratitude, and treasured
with love, and held far dearer to me than aught
else in the world. When a man is deeply in love,
he has a hard task to win his mistress, unless the
flame were simultaneously inspired. He has so
much in his own emotions to contend withhope,
distrust, jealousythat he cannot adapt himself
to her, and practise those consummate arts by
which women are won. He is so much possessed
with his own feelings, that he forgets to watch
hers: and, besides, we judge others' feelings from
our own, so often, that we are always forming
erroneous
opinions of them, particularly in the
affairs
of the heart. This is the reason why a man
of the world is always more successful in love
than other men. He has self-control. He
studies
the character and learns the feelings of his
lady-love, and with Protean power he adapts
himself
to her. Othello, the Moorthe blackamoor
bore himself proudly, yet he took the pliant
hour; and do you doubt he had been looking out
for it with a soldier's watchfulness? Richard the
Third bore himself daringly, even in the depth of
his humility: when he knelt, he stooped to
conquer
;
but it was the stooping of the eagle, who
is sure of the dove. I always thought there was
something unnatural in this play, that the gentle
Lady Anne should be won, at her husband's
funeral
,
by his murderer. But see Booth in the
tyrant
,
and you think it naturalhe plays so
cunningly
.
Hudibras is a caricature; but, though it
be, it is rather too true a picture of the class of
lovers who are not the successful ones.
Bradshaw, these are but fictitious illustrations.
You were speaking of men of the world being the
most successful. Othello was no man of the world;
Hudibras was in his wooing, for he sought the
jointure. Othello was successful; Hudibras not
Hudibras! he's no illustration at all of any thing
but a low, poor devil, who was drawn to be laughed
at.
I know it; but it is the justness of the ridicule
that makes us laugh. There is human nature in
it, as there is human nature in Shakespeare's lowest
clowns: the lover, for instance, of sweet Anne Page
`if she had been a boy, he wouldn't have had
her, though he had married her.' Whatever is in
us, in common with such charactersand we all
have something in us, in common with themwe
must suppress. Othello's manliness made
Desdemona
forget his visage,for the dangers he had
passed, she loved him; he loved her because she
pitied them. She clung to his manly nature
for support, as the beautiful honey-suckle of
the woods clings to the generous oak. So with
Lucy Ashton and Ravenswood, in `The Bride of
Lamermoor.' Scott is next to Shakspeare in the
knowledge of the human heart. Think of
Marmion
and his page. In which of Scott's poems is
it, I forget, `The Lady of the Lake' or `Rokeby,'
that the lover woos the heroine, and with such
sweet verses! She followed his request, and twined
the cypress wreath for him. Look at `Don Juan,'
Byron's best production,the best of the age, in
spite of its licentiousness. Look at `Sardanapalus,'
the luxurious Sardanapalus, whom Ionian Myrrha
loves; she speaks of having `fallen in her own
thoughts by loving this soft stranger.' She does
not love him for his softness, but for the manliness
and bravery that shine through it, like the
lightning
in a summer's eve. You reply to me that this
is all poetry, and that these instances are rare, and,
in the common-place world, we don't meet with
them. I know it. In the common-place world we
seldom meet with love, either.
In these conversations, our readers observe that
Bradshaw commences with reference to Selman;
but that his feelings lead him to express his own
thoughts and opinions, with scarcely a
consciousness
,
on his part, of what originated the
conversation
.
Our readers must also remember that the
evening had been, to him, one of various
excitement
,
intellectual and animalthat his frame was
delicate, and his passions inflammable, to the
highest
degree.
Ah! but, Bradshaw, give me living instances.
What, do you mean of men who have lived?
Look at Julius Csar, the greatest man that ever
livedso say Lord Bacon and Lord Byron, the lord
of philosophers and the lord of poets. He dared as
much, to win Cleopatra, as he did when he crossed
the Rubicon; he stayed in dalliance with her,
until
he nearly lost his life. He won a woman, as he
won a victory, by daring to win. He had the
quality
which Napoleon so well, metaphorically,
exprssed
,
and which, no doubt, he thought his own
quality`The iron hand, with the velvet glove.'
Just so was it with Mirabeau: `Wait till I shake
my boar's head at them,' he used to say, when he
heard the hootings of the Jacobins. To a lady who
had fallen in love with him, from hearing of him,
he wrote, in reply to an inquiry as to his personal
appearance, `Fancy a tiger who has had the
small-pox
;
but,' he used to say, `you have no idea of
the beauty of my deformity.' In spite of all his
vices, he succeeded with men and women. How?
By energy, energy, energy! If I were a
heathen
,
I would build a temple to energy
enshrine
the god there, and worship him. But,
understand
me, I would cover the iron hand with
the velvet glove. Not until it was absolutely
necessary
,
should any pressure be felt, but the soft,
persuasive one, that would lead. But, when it
was necessary, I would grasp with the power of
Hercules, though it were the Nemean lion; but,
mark me, I would not wear the lion's skin as a
garment
:
it is what Hercules did, I knowbut it is
what the ass did, also. So many asses bray,
now-a-days
,
from the lion's covering, that the world
almost
always suspect, when they see the covering,
that the ass is under it.
What has this to do with love? asked Selman.
Why, a great deal: if MiltonI don't justify
his tyrannyhad been a kneeling lover, think you
he ever would have been knelt to by his wife?
What did Miss Chaworth care for Byron, when he
was an unknown, `poor, lame boy,' as she called
him. We all know how much she cared for him
afterwards, when Byron had bearded his critics,
and, in spite of them, reached the pinnacle. She
sought to see him then, though wedded, mind you,
to the very man for whom she rejected `the lame
boy.' I know every man can't be a Byron, or a
Milton; but we are not fools, Selman, and we
must win our way. Mind what I tell you; the
way to win is not by yielding in the crowd and
press of men: if you yield, you will be trodden on;
if you push on, men will think that the prize is
yoursthe timid will give up at once, and the stout
of heart quail, if your heart be only stouter than
theirs. But you must not brag, sir; the courage
must be in the eye and the voice, in the
self-possession
of the head and the heart. Think of the
disinherited knight, at the tournament at Ashby;
he entered the list without any one to say `God
speed you;' he strikes the shield of Brian de Bois
Guilbert, till it rings again; he meets the proudest
of the templars, and hurls him to the dust. This
is fictionyes! but it is glorious fiction. Read the
eight volumes of Plutarch's lives: they are filled
with such fiction. Read the history of Richelieu, of
De Retz, of Mirabeau, of the Man of Destiny. Read
the history of England's great ones: of
Marlborough
,
of Wolsey, of Milton, of Shakspeare, of
Chatham, (Jove! how he hurled defiance at
Walpole
,)
of Sheridan, of Erskine, (how he came out
in his first effort,) and Curran, (how he braved the
minions of office,)think of these men: they
entered
the lists on the theatre of the wide world,
like the disinherited knight, and, when the odds
pressed hard upon them, fortune came to their
rescue
as
she will always come to the rescue of the
valiant, like the black sluggard to the rescue of
Ivanhoe. Look at our own country: at
Washington
,
at our more than Demosthenes, Patrick
Henry
,
(what self-sustainment there was about him,
even in the depth of obscurity and poverty,) and
at Roger Sherman, and a host of others, who
gather
in our history as our stars increase and cluster
in our banner. Yes, said Bradshaw, rising and
walking up and down the room, these men, and
such like them, are the `gods of my idolatry.'
Some one remarks, Dr. Channing, I believe, that
the reason why we admire even the Father of all
Evil, the Satan of Milton, is because of the energy
he exhibits, and the firmness with which, amidst
the `burning marl,' he sustained himself. We
cannot
but admire this trait of character, though in a
fiendhow much more in god-like men! And if
they be fallen men, and display this trait, it is a
proof that all of their original brightness has not
fleday, it is the power with which they often
win back their original brightness. This world, sir,
is like the hackneyed fable of Hercules and the
wagoner: he called on Hercules for help, but the
god told him to help himself first, to put his
shoulder
to the wheel, and then to pray. If you would
reach the high places in this worldif you would
get out of the slough, you must help yourself, and
then the world will play Hercules and help you
but not till then. But, come, let us to bed'tis
after three. Turn in there, Selman, and may all
the dreams that hover round the fortunate lover,
be yours.
First catch the fish, though, as you say,
exclaimed
Selman.
I know that, replied Bradshaw; but, sir,
if you do not bait your hook, and throw it into
the waters, how will you ever catch your fish?
You have had a nibble, a glorious nibble, at any
rate, Selman; and that, you know, is the
premonitory
symptom of a bite;and may the biter be
bitI don't mean in the vulgar sense of the
proverb
:
I mean, may she be caught.
Long after Selman's head was upon his pillow
in an undisturbed and dreamless sleep, in spite of
Miss Penelope, Bradshaw was up, with his books
before him, not in study, but in a state of
restlessness
.
For a few moments he would glance
over the life of Csar, Themistocles, Napoleon,
or Chatham, or look into a poem, or stir his fire,
or sit in abstraction and gaze upon the various
forms which the burning coal assumed. An
observer
of his countenance would soon have
discovered
in him the throes and excitement of a
deep ambitionan ambition self-sustained and
determined, yet restless and anxious for action
a character formed in common mouldone, who,
even in his most wayward moments, felt a
fixedness
of purpose, that longed, at least, to try its
energies in another field than that of the
imagination
.
CHAPTER V.
The
sun was up some hours, before Bradshaw
left his room; when he did, it was noiselessly, so
as not to disturb Selman. He went forth to take
exercise, in the hope of alleviating a severe
headach
.
In returning from a long walk, he met
Cavendish
and Willoughby, strolling along towards
the court-house, and joined them.
The top of the morning to you, Bradshaw,
said Willoughby.
The top is toppling down towards the
meridian
,
said Cavendish. But where's Selman?
I left him, nearly an hour since, at my office,
fast asleep, replied Bradshaw.
The deuce you did! exclaimed Cavendish.
I should have supposed he would have been long
ago chewing the cud of bitter or sweet memory,
according as Miss Penelope frowned or smiled
last night.
The fact is, Selman is completely in for it. I
could not help laughing at him last night,he
looked, to me, exactly like Jefferson's Tony
Lumpkin, when his mother `snubbed him,'
remarked
Bradshaw.
He's a good-natured fellow, said
Willoughby
.
Vol. I. 6
He will never make a fortune; yet he has
no spendthrift habits. I wish he could get that
girlhe is really attached to her; and, then, the
old man has fortune enough; beside, some
spendthrift
of a fool may run away with her some of
these days. I don't believe she could make a
better
match.
How old is Selman? asked Cavendish.
He told me, the other day, that he was
twenty-two
,
replied Bradshaw. He intends going
into business for himself in a short time. I'm
told he's an excellent book-keeper, and that he
has a good deal of business tact.
If that be the fact, I should not think old
Perry
would veto him, said Willoughby.
The old man has not the veto powerit
belongs
to the other side of the house, remarked
Bradshaw.
He's afraid of Bates, remarked Cavendish.
Bates thinks that the world was made for him,
and all that he has to do is to smile upon the lady
to win her. He only wants to cut Selman out,
and gratify a contemptible vanity. I don't think
he means to address her.
I tell you what it is, gentlemen, all, said
Bradshaw, half quizically, let us turn
conspirators
,
and bring the matter about: it can be done.
Let us make a public opinion on the subjecttell
all the women what a fine fellow Selman is
how much he is admired by their sex and by ours;
and let us all be sure to let Miss Penelope know
that there are several ladies who, we have every
reason to believe, are very much taken with him.
We must puff him up to one another before the
old man; and we must not forget, often to talk of
his good family, and his respect for his mother,
before the old lady. It is not, perchance, the
thing to plot such manuvres, except upon such
occasions. But, recollect, gentlemen, to work
surely we must work secretlythat is, we must
not blab the business. Just for the joke of the
affair, as well as to do Selman a service, let us see
if we can't succeed.
Agreed! agreed! shouted Willoughby.
Bradshaw, said the Judge, that's a good
notion
;
when I go a wooing, I'll come to you for
advice
.
I won't let you plead the case for me to the
lady, for there I would not trust you; but I'll get
you to make a little public opinion for me. In the
mean time, take care that some one does not make
a little public opinion on you, about your manner
of spending your evenings.
In such conversation, arm in arm, the young
men entered the court-house. Some common case
occupied the attention of the court, and, after
listening carelessly to the trial for a few minutes,
and speaking with his different acquaintances of
the party of the previous evening, &c., Bradshaw
quit his companions to go to his office. As
Bradshaw
was leaving the court-room, Mr. Tompson, a
member of the bar, came up to him with Mr.
Glassmanthe gentleman about whose character,
our readers may remember, he had been disputing
with Cavendish, at the oyster cellarand, after
introducing him to Glassman, left them together.
Mr. Bradshaw, said Glassman, to defend the
absent has always been esteemed a virtue; though
not absent last evening, when you so eloquently
defended and complimented meI am not the last
criminal, I suspect, sir, whom you will eloquently
defend;yet it was a generous offering to one, sir,
whom you thought absentwhom you did not
personally
know. Permit me to say, sir, it gives me
more pleasure to make your acquaintance than any
I have made for years: I hope we may be better
acquainted; though I feel, in that better
acquaintance
,
I may lose the good opinion which you have
been pleased to express of me.
Were you present, sir? inquired Bradshaw,
perfectly astonished.
Yes, sir; I was in the number in which, you
may remember, one of your friends remarked there
was a light.
I assure you, Mr. Glassman, that my friend
spoke as he did merely for the sake of argument;
and he would not, on any consideration, so have
expressed himself, if he had known you were
within
.
I believe it, sir; but don't speak in that way;
it forces on me too strongly the conviction, that
you spoke for argument too. I assure you, sir,
that I am not the least hurt with Mr.
Cavendish
.But,
come, let us walk down street. So
saying, Glassman placed his arm in Bradshaw's;
and they entered the street.
Glassman was truly an accomplished and
intellectual
man. The commendation which Bradshaw
had bestowed on him was, perhaps, not undeserved.
He was a man to please Bradshaw; and ere they
parted, Bradshaw had accepted, with pleasure, an
invitation to dine with him on that day.
I keep bachelor's hall, said Glassman, and
you must come early. In the same house with
my office I have a suite of rooms; and I try to
congregate there the comforts that one of my means
and habits can gather round him. I like to have
as many inducements to keep me at my office, and
near my business as possible. I feel happiest when
I am engaged in business, or conversing with a
friend; so do not fail me. I shall expect you at
two.
After Glassman and Bradshaw parted, Bradshaw
called on Miss Carlton. She was at home and
alone.
Mary, how did you enjoy yourself last night?
Oh, very much, indeed. I spent a delightful
evening.
So did I. I have come this morning to be
disenchanted
but
in vain. I used to think that, if
a gentleman was struck with a lady's surpassing
loveliness at an evening party, he should call on
her the next morning, when the gayety and
adornment
of the party were over, if he meant to pursue
his studies with any thing like a determination of
retaining a single idea of what he was reading.
But you are one of those who, Thomson would
say, was now `adorned the most.'
You sinner! exclaimed the laughing, blushing
Mary; I'm going to make some morning calls, and
you must go with me. Wait till I put on my
bonnet
.
I am determined, if I stay in town, and while
I stay, you shall not be such a recluse as you have
been.
6*
Let me assist you, Marythereto fix a lady's
bonnet is the poetry of life. I've tied it in a
double
beau. Here's your shawl, 'tis a beautiful
onelet me arrange it with the end a little to one
side. It looks better so; there is a carelessness
about it which has fascination in its folds. Now,
lady, as I am not much of a beau, you must
remember
I am under your especial patronage.
You are a politician in your courtesy; you
assume
least where you know you have the most
power. If I were to tell you all the compliments
I heard paid to you last night, you would not
forget
them for a twelvemonth.
Suppose I were to tell you all I heard paid to
youI can repeat them all by
heart
.
There; a compliment again. I shall never
know when to believe you sincere. If a girl had
a lover like you, she would never know when to
believe him. He would have to protest very hard
when he made his declaration. Here, Miss
Carlton
blushed, and quickly said, Clinton, you don't
look as well as you did when you lived in the
country
:
you look very thin. Do you study hard, or do
you
Dissipate, Mary? Not much, nor study much
either. Let me see: yes, 'tis just three months
to-day
this
very daysince I last saw you. Do
you discover that I have grown thin? There are
many causes for thinness, you know. Well, I
never
saw you look better. I suppose, you enjoyed
yourself very much.
No; I did not a great deal: I would rather have
been at home. Father was talking politics all the
time, and I saw belles and beaux a plenty, but
they were merely casual acquaintances, and one
never enjoys oneself in such society; at least, I
never
could.
Do you go to Washington City this winter?
Father wishes me to go, but I tell him I am
too young yet, and that I would rather remain at
homeI mean in town hereand attend to my
music masters and my teachers, for that I only
consider myself a school girl as yet. What do you
think about it?
I think about it! Upon my word, you
compliment
me. Like you, I consider myself as yet but
at schooland, Mary, I am much too selfish to wish
my old schoolmate away,even, to tell you the
truth, though I thought she would like the holiday.
If she does not like it, why then the selfishness is
justified.
The old school-house on the top of the hill!
I passed by it yesterday; Mr. Lusby came to the
door and stopped the carriage. He told me not
to forget to thank you for him for the books you
sent him.
He's a fine old gentleman.
Indeed he is; and he takes much pride in his
scholars. He said, if you only had paid more
attention
to the Latin and the mathematics, he would
have had no fault to find with you, bating a little
occasional laziness, said Miss Carlton, archly.
Laziness! yes; he used to lecture me for that
often, and tell me it was my besetting sin. Do you
remember the time I caught you crying over little
Red Ridinghood. I looked through the window at
youit was in play-timefor a minute before you
saw me. You had your hair pushed backyou
were leaning with your cheeks on your open hands,
with the book before you:the tears were
streaming
down your cheeks.
I remember it well, and how furiously you
fought Joseph Sloan, who was a much larger boy
than yourself, for hissing at me, when he saw me
crying. Mr. Clinton, do you know, sir, that you
have a very ferocious countenance, when you are
in a passion?
Have I?
Yes, you haveand you must quit scowling so.
I observed you once or twice last night: when any
one, who did not know you, would have thought
that you were angry. Let us turn around this
cornerI am going to Mr. Perry's.
What! is it fashionable to call the morning
after
a party?
O, I know the girls very well, and I promised
them, last night, that I would call this morning.
What kind of a girl is Miss Penelope?
A very fine girl; she's kind-hearted and
amiable
,
and as accomplished as most girls: if I may dare
to say it, perhaps, she is too fond of admiration. If
she had a lover, she would require a great many
attentions.
Pray, who of your gentle sex does not; and
what lover would not give them?
Certainly; what lover would not give them?
but I thought you, gentlemen, would make a
voluntary
offering, where you would not pay an
extorted
tribute.
What do you think of Mr. Selman, Mary?
Whatthe gentleman who came with you last
night? I like him very much, what little I've seen
of him. He was very attentive to Penelope.
Very.
Do you think he is pleased with Penelope?
Don't you think Penelope is pleased with him?
I hope no lady would show a preference for a
gentleman, until that gentleman has shown that he
preferred her, said Miss Carlton, quickly, with a
slight blush.
O, certainly not, replied Bradshaw, but you
have already observed that he showed a preference
for her.
I believe she does like him, and, also, that she
likes to torment him a little.
Bradshaw smiled. Which is the best way, do
you think, Mary, for a lover to treat such a lady?
Indeed, I do not know; I should ask you that
question.
No, indeed; I should ask youno man can
understand
your sex as well as yourselves.
Now, there, sir, you are wrong: we girls
differ
as much from ourselves as we differ from you.
Well, Mary, I have reason to believe that
Selman
is attached to Miss Penelope; and, if you like
him, speak a good word for him.
Certainly, I will, if it will do any good. I
really
think she likes him.
They here arrived at and entered Mr. Perry's
house. They found Miss Penelope alone, and
looking
her best, notwithstanding the excitement and
worryment of the previous evening, which, as one
of the entertainers, she must have experienced.
Miss Penelope, said Bradshaw, I was telling
Miss Carlton how well she looked this morning, and
I may say the same to you. Your party was such
a delightful one, that, instead of exhausting one's
spirits, as parties generally do, it has renovated
them.
I am truly glad to hear that you enjoyed
yourself
.
O, very much, indeed, said Miss Carlton.
Yes, observed Bradshaw, every body
appeared
to enjoy themselves. Did you observe, too,
what a great beau Henry Selman is getting to be?
No, I did not. Is he? asked Miss Penelope.
Quite so, I assure you, replied Bradshaw.
Miss Carlton and myself were speaking of him as
we came here. I thought Miss Sutherland, last
night, was very much disposed to be merciful to
him.
Merciful! how? what do you mean? asked
Miss Penelope.
Why, not cruel. I think he stands A, number
one there. O, Miss Penelope, what a beautiful
fancy basket! Did you work it?
Yes, sir.
Really, you must suffer me to compliment you
on it. We were speaking, last night, of the
different
ornaments of the kind possessed by you ladies,
and Selman warmly maintained that yours was, by
far, the handsomest of allhe is a man of fine
taste.
Yes, sir, I believe he is a gentleman of taste,
said Miss Penelope, looking very thoughtfully into
the fire; but I did not observe that he was very
attentive to Miss Sutherlandwas he?
He went home with her, said Bradshaw.
Miss Penelope, he continued, you know, I
suppose
,
that Miss Carlton will not go to Washington
this winter.
Yes, I know she does not; and, as the country
will be very dreary in the winter, she will, of
course, spend it with us. I think we shall have a
very gay winter: there will be the theatre and the
ballsO! I long for the balls to commence; they
do, next Thursdayand the parties, and, I
suppose
,
we shall have a wedding or two. Miss
Carlton
,
you will enjoy yourself as much here as you
would in Washington.
I have no doubt I should enjoy myself more,
replied Miss Carlton. I like to be among those
whom I know well;that constitutes the
enjoyment
,
I think, and not the mere party or the ball.
In this, and similar calls, Miss Carlton and her
companion passed the morning; he left her only in
time to keep his appointment with Glassman.
CHAPTER VI.
Glassman
lived near the west end of the city,
in a by-street leading to it, that was not much
frequented
.
A few steps bore him from a kind of
retirement
,
to the glitter and magnificence of wealth
and fashion. Bradshaw soon reached his residence,
and entered his office, which was in the front room
of the house. Passing into the back room, he found
Mr. Glassman with a book of poems in his hand,
that he had been perusing.
Walk in, Mr. Bradshaw; be seated, sir. I
passed you in the street after we parted; but you
were so closely engaged in conversation with your
fair companion, that you did not observe me. I
think she is the loveliest and most agreeable lady
of her age, I ever beheld. I met her lately, and
had some chat with her; I don't know when I have
been so delightfully entertained. She is the only
daughter, I believe, of Mr. Carlton? While Mr.
Glassman spoke, he eyed his companion with the
close scrutiny of a man of the world.
With an easy manner, Bradshaw repliedYes,
sir, the only daughter. Any eulogy which may be
pronounced on Miss Carlton will be deserved;
though I am four or five years the older, yet I
remember
her as long as I remember myself. We
were early school-mates, and she is very intimate
with my sister.
Ay, well, sir, be careful that the sex do not
allure
you from your studies. And, yet, I do not
know why we should not wish to yield to their
allurements
:
I have no doubt that youth is the
happiest
period of our lifeand why not yield to its
bias and impressions, as the leaf, upon the stream,
floats as the wind bloweth.
I should not suppose, sir, that you would preach
that doctrine.
The preachment and the practice are not
always
the samebut you know we cannot say which
is the best part of the road until we have travelled
it. I do not know but what our professionfrom
our habit of disputation in the defence of any side
leads us very much into doubting; makes us
specious
reasoners, and wayward actors. I won't say
that in a dull man, who pursues closely and
exclusively
the practice of the profession, this effect is
produced; but one who is a general readerwho
has a taste for polite literature, and who cultivates
it, is very apt to be thus influenced.
But, sir, remarked Bradshaw, do you not
believe that Erskine and Curran, if they had been
followers of literature, would have been more
devoted
to pleasure than they were, and that
Sheridan
,
if he had been a lawyer, would have been less
so. Sheridan thought so himself, I believe, from
the fact of his having wished towards the close of
his life, that he had studied law: `I would have
done, at least, as well,' said he, `as Tom Erskine.'
Vol. I. 7
I remember having seen something like that
recorded of Sheridan. Old Sherry paid himself as
great a compliment as he ever had paid to him,
when he uttered that remark. Take him all in
all, sir, I consider Erskine the most accomplished
advocate that ever spoke the English language. I
was educated in England, and I have had the
pleasure
of hearing him and most of his contemporaries,
Fox, Burke, Sheridan, Pitt, &c. I do not think
that Erskine was much of a statesman;facts
prove, indeed, that he comparatively failed in the
House of Commons; but I believe he would have
made a better statesman than either of his
contemporaries
could have made advocates, if I may
institute
such a comparison, and if they had been
advocates
they would not have equalled him. He was
a fine-looking man, and a most accomplished
gentleman
,
and then he had every weapon of oratory
at command. His argument was lucid; I was about
to say Johnsonian, but there was more naturalness
in it, if I may so express myself, than there was in
that of the great lexicographer, owing to his
analogy
and illustrations being derived from simpler
sourcesmore from nature, not so much from books.
He never used his imagination merely to adorn
his most brilliant adornment contained illustration
and argument: here he differed widely from
Curran
,
who often let his imagination run away with
him, a complete John Gilpin frolic, leaving his
admirers
as much amazed as were the folks of
Islington
,
wondering, too, what he was after. Fox, as
an advocate, would have reasoned better; Pitt
would have had more subtlety; Sheridan more wit
much more. Great as Erskine was in
cross-examining
a witness, Sheridan would have surpassed
him. But admit all this, and before an English
jury, in the generality of cases, Erskine would
have excelled them. Burke I never considered an
orator. Sometimes, from the violence of his
temper
,
in very madness, like the Pythoness, he would
be eloquent in utterancein language, he always
was eloquentbut he often wanted true oratorical
inspiration, and lamely affected,
acted
it; as when,
for instance, he drew from his pocket a dagger,
which, no doubt, he had pocketed for the occasion,
and flourished it in such a histrionic manner.
My political impressions have been such,
replied
Bradshaw, as to lead me to think that Burke
was more splendid than profound; and yet who
does not admire the lofty enthusiasm with which
he pours forth his whole soul for the ancient
regime
?
With a holy devotion, Old Mortality, as
Scott describes him, leaned over the tombs of the
departed covenanters, to revive their names upon
the marble; with a similar feeling, Burke would
clear away what he calls rubbish, foulness, and
degradation
from the old monarchy of Francelike
the antiquary, he washes the relic, and finds it a
common stone; he had better have been like the
other antiquary, who refused to wash what he
pronounced
an ancient shield, for fear it would prove
to be a pot-lid. Yet I admire him; I think him,
perhaps, the master spirit of his day.
No, indeed, sir; you are wrong, you are wrong.
I know that the generality of scholars would agree
with you, and be disposed to laugh at me; but I
have lived long enough in the world to dare to
think for myself. I admire Burke's brilliant
imagination
.
He was meant for a literary character,
if nature ever means a man for any thing. I am
no defender of the French revolutionI mean of
its atrocitiesbut I often think of what Paine said
of Burke, that `He pitied the plumage, and forgot
the dying bird.' Burke, sir, in my opinion, dressed
the iron hand of despotism in flowers, and then
exclaimed
,
how beautiful! The serpent which had
stolen into the lily of France, and become torpid
there, he would have you place in your bosom and
warm into life. He seems to say, It hath no
sting, it is incapable of ingratitude: I know the
fable
says the contrary, but what's a fable! He
would present that lily to you poisoned with that
serpent's contact, and with one of his best bows,
request my dear sir, or miss, or madam, that you
would wear it as a nosegay. Burke enthrones
prejudice on the ruins of some old feudal tower,
and then would have the world bow down to it in
political idolatry. He reminds us of the heathen,
who makes unto himself an idol and then worships
itno small portion of his worship proceeding from
a reverence of his own handiwork. He could
defend
all sides with equal ability, or, rather, he could
defend a sophism best; for his was an imagination
that did not illumine, but dazzlenot the light that
enables us to see clearly and distinctly the objects
before
us, but the lurid blaze that flashes in the tempest
not the beacon-fire, burning on the steep, to guide
the shipwrecked in safety, but its deceiving
resemblance
,
that whelms them in ruin. Burke threw
the gorgeous splendour of his imagination over the
departed tyranny of France, as we throw the pall
over the bier to hide the sense of the cold, distorted,
blackened corpse beneath, that died in convulsions.
He goes farther; he chants over it an incantation
to raise the dead withal. And what spirits he
would call from the `vasty deep' of despotism!
Understand me; to his splendid intellect, I pay the
respect of profound homage; but I believe that the
most of his political acts were dictated by an
uncontrollable
temper; that his inspiration proceeded
from his frenzy; and that his conduct towards Fox,
when they differed with regard to the French
revolution
,
was all that is censurable. That one
act shows the man to my mind.
Bradshaw could not but smile at what he
considered
the wildest prejudices; just as he was
about to reply, the servant entered to announce
dinner. They dined alone: with the exception
of an aged house-keeper and one servant, there
was no one beside themselves in the room. The
room was furnished with an austerity of taste.
From the books, busts, and pictures around it, any
one would have taken it for the abode of an
intellectual
man. After they had dined, and while
they were taking their wine, Bradshaw rose, with
enthusiasm, to contemplate closer a splendid bust
of Chatham, which had, even during dinner, and
notwithstanding the temptation of the viands and
the fascination of Glassman's conversation,
occupied
a considerable portion of his attention.
YesI knew it was Chatham, said he; I
knew it by instinct, as Falstaff knew the true
7*
Prince. This is Alexander Hamilton. What a
striking bust! It reminds one of the ancient
heads. And this is Byron. Ah, is it a good
likeness
?
Yes, sir, very much like him. It was given
to me by one of his friends, Mr. . He is
almost
the only great man of my day, whom I
cannot
say I personally knew, so far as to have had
some conversation with him. I once saw Byron
in the theatre; that is very much like him. I
keep it for the likeness; the execution of the
picture
is not remarkable. I stood, unobserved, and
watched him for some time; it was in Drury
Lane; Kean was playing Othello. I thought him
an unhappy man, and affected, though not so much
so as you might imagine. His personal
appearance
was deeply interestingthere was that in
him that would please a woman: his face was fine
intellectual in its expression, yet not devoid of
sensuality; it combined, at once, manliness and
beautythere, the fulness of the chin, in the
picture
,
is very much likethe eye is not so good;
the expression of his face changed momently. I
thought his hair, from its look, was indebted much
to the barber for its curl. That of Alexander
Hamilton
is a first-rate likeness. He had quite a rosy
cheek, which you would not believe from looking
at that bust; he was a dressy man, toothat is,
what we would call dressy now-a-days. He was,
also, a great beau.
Did you know Burr?
Oh, yes. I saw a great deal of Burr when
youngabout the eye, you remind me of him.
Have you never been told your eye was like
his?
Yes, sir, I believe I have.
There is much of a resemblance; and, sir,
you must know it's a high compliment. I never
heard a man speak of Burr in my life, who did
not speak of his eye. Your eye is more
impulsive
in its expression than his, if I may so
express
myself. His eye was keen, quick, fiery;
and yet the most common observer would know
him to be a man of self-control. The keenness
of his look contrasted strangely with the
calmness
of his brow, and reminded one of the flame
of the volcano bursting from the ice-bound brow
of Hecla. He was a man of great personal
neatness
,
and generally dressed in black; plain, but of
the richest. He combined the gentlest and most
seductive address with more command than any
man I ever sawand he was a very small man.
I have heard jurymen say that they never could
take their eyes off of him, when he was
addressing
them: each thought that Burr was looking at
him. When I think of his character, I am
always
reminded of some of the most distinguished
Italian and French politicians. Burr should have
been cast in the stormy time of the French
revolution
;
he would have equalled Talleyrand in tact,
and Napoleon in energy. I believe it. His
character
and operations were unsuited to the simple
machinery, and the honesty of our republican
institutions
.
He did not enough wait upon events
and developmentshe tried too much to force
them. Alexander, a prince born to power, might
dare to cut the Gordian knot, which he could not
untie. But, in our country, you must learn to
untie it; or, if you do cut, it must not be with
the daring of Alexander, nor with the exhibition
of surpassing strength, as Richard the
Lion-hearted
,Melec
Ric,in Scott's beautiful tale of the
Talisman, cut the steel mace, when Saladin
requested
a display of his prowess. No! you must
cut it as Saladin cut the cushion of silk and down,
with
sleight of hand
. You must wait patiently.
In this respect, Talleyrand would have excelled
Burrbut in no other. In an age of great men,
Burr is one of the greatest.
I agree with you, replied Bradshaw, in
your estimate of Burr's talents; but I think these
sleight of hand tricks give one the reputation of
being
a political juggler, that, in our country, injures
a man more than any thing else. Honesty, I
conscientiously
believe, is the best policy,I mean
the best selfish policy,the policy for success.
And then it is the only policy which will console
you in defeat.
Why, replied Glassman, I ever mingled,
but very little, in politics. I have been once or
twice forced to take part in them; but, even in
success, I always found the play was not worth
the candle. And, then, think of its uncertainties.
Now you are on the crest of the wave,
mountain
high,and the next moment you are in
the slough of despond. I always preferred the
even tenor of my profession. This ducking of
the head to every plebeian dog you may meet, I
never could, nor would do, for his votethere is
personal debasement in the thought. I would salute
any man through courtesy. I applaud the
sentiment
of him, who replied to the reproach of one
who reproved him for speaking to a negro, by the
remark, `That he would not let a negro surpass
him in politeness:' there is chivalry in that; I can
find nothing but self-debasement in the other.
Bradshaw mused for some time, abstractedly,
when Glassman interrupted him, by asking
Who is that young man who was with you
last night, named Willoughby?
He is a Kentuckian, replied Bradshaw, and
he possesses all the chivalry that is attributed to
his country. He is a young man who expects a
large fortune from his uncle, and has come here
to attend the law lectures this winter. We call
him, familiarly, Kentuck. He is the most truly
independent and generous fellow I ever met with.
He is very proud of his state, and reminds me of
the preacher, who, in describing the beatitude of
heaven, capped the climax by saying, `In short,
my beloved brethren, heaven is a Kentuck of a
place.' .
I like such spirits, exclaimed Glassman. Is
he a man of talents?
Yes, sir, a great deal of natural talent, but
uncultivated
,
yet there is shrewd common sense, an
observation of character, and an energy about him,
which lead me to think, at times, that he will be a
distinguished man. I am satisfied he will, if he's
ever thrown in some great crisis of human affairs
then he'll either make a spoon, or spoil a hoon.
In such conversation, several hours passed.
Glassman
was much struck with the bearing and
conversation
of Bradshaw, and, when they parted, he
pressed him warmly to call and see him often. If
you get into any knotty point of law, said he, in
which I can be of any service to you, command me,
don't fail to do itor upon any point of practice,
no man can learn the practice from books. Read,
rather
,
a few standard works thoroughly, than many
promiscuously. Understand every thought of the
author
,
as you go along. Sit and think over what you
have readthink steadily, not impulsivelythink
long. Keep not your habits of study for your office;
study as you walk the streets, here, there,
everywhere
.
I do not mean that you should lose
yourself
in abstractionsby no means; but that you
should observe things around you, and understand
exactly their relative positionsnot only things, but
men, and women, too, said Glassman, smiling.
You must keep your intellectual armour on, and
always have it bright. Eschew prejudice; be not
too much influenced by first impressions, but weigh
them well; they are instincts, and often tell the
truth. Acquire self-possession, but not
heartlessness
.
Act towards women without one particle of
foppery or affectationbe natural with them, and
be gentle: they are best won, as the summer sun
wins the dew from the rose, and causes its bud to
blossom, gradually, with an insinuating power.
When you go a wooing, make not your intentions
known too soon; it throws a woman upon her guard,
and she watches every avenue to her heart,
arguseyed
you
will have twice the toil to win her.
What we win with great toil, must have rare
excellencies
to reward us; if it have not, we are
sadly
disappointed. I was going to advise you against
wedding a very poor girl, but I had better warn
you against a rich one: you can make money, if
you try; and your wife will not only love, but
respect
you, if she owes
all
to you:if you owe all
to her, why, she must not only love, but respect
you, very much, if you do not often hear of your
indebtedness. But marry for love, be she rich, or
be she poor. You think this strange advice from
me, don't you? It is good advice. I could read
you a homily on it with a sad moral. You are a
young man of penetration, Mr. Bradshaw, of
sagacity
cultivate
it: 'tis better than all the books
that ever were written. Books tell us what has
been, just as a man would tell usand both books
and men may distort and misrepresent: sagacity
sees through them. In your intercourse with men,
treat them with all courtesy, but not sycophancy.
Be rather too proud than too humble. Understand
which way men's interests lead them, and observe
them in little things. Many a man braces himself
up to heroism in great things, who is no hero at all.
Perhaps his heroism is forced upon him, as courage
is forced on a cornered rat; he acts well upon
compulsion
,
and obtains a reputation for it that lasts
him through life, which he no more deserves than
would the rat a reputation for courage.
Practise
oratory: in our country it is more powerful
than the two-edged sword in the strong hand, in
battle. Read the old English authors; they are
the besttheir thoughts are the solid metal: the
moderns have hammered it out. Be natural in
your speaking, and have a manner of your own.
Obtain self-possession, and the power of looking far
a-head, while you speak; see your way through
before
you start. Never go on at a venture, unless
you know your subject, and then 'tis no venture,
because you are like the pilot who knows the
whereabout of the quicksand, and sees the shore.
That is a man of talents, of glorious talents,
thought Bradshaw, when he left Glassman; but,
perhaps, he wants
vim
a little; he thinks too much
about side-blows; his bump of caution must be
prodigious
yet,
he's a man of great experience, and
he thinks most acutely. Why did not Chesterfield
succeed as eminently as Chatham? Chesterfield
was a man of talents; no one knew the world
better
;
but he wanted energyor, rather, he was too
cautious to go a-head much; he was afraid of so
many side hits, and back hits, that he was always
looking around, and about him, to see exactly how
he stood; he never thought of advancing till it was
too latetill he saw some one before him.
Chatham
had too much pride; several times it nearly
wrecked him, and it often marred his influence;
but, by Jove, if Chatham had had as much caution
as Chesterfield, he never would have been as
distinguished
a man as the Earl of Stanhope. Here's
a day gone, and I've not read one linelast night at
the party, too. Mary looked well; I never saw
her look better. This morning, what a delightful
walk! Mr. Clinton Bradshaw, you must quit these
vanities; they are idlesse, all. What good will
they do you a year hence? But I've spent the day
profitably. To my books, to my books; I must get
into that chapter on executory devises, and puzzle
through what my Lord Thurlow says on it. I must
stop at the library, however, and have some new
novel to qualify it. I'll take no supper, but straight
to my office. I agree with Mr. Glassman in a good
many of his notions, but he has too bad an opinion
of men and of women. He's a man that thinks for
himself, though. When I heard him express his
sentiments on Burke, I thought he must surely be
a Jacobin, but he is rather aristocratical in his
views. I suspect that he is, personally,
aristocratical
,
and, politically, republican.
At night, and long after Bradshaw heard the
raps of different of his friends at his office door, but
they were unanswered. The watchman cried past
twelve under his window, before he quit his legal
studies, notwithstanding his dissipation of the
previous
night. Then he ensconced himself in bed,
with the light placed at his bed-head, and it was
not until he had glanced through the fashionable
novel he had obtained at the library, that he
composed himself on his pillow to sleep.
Vol. I. 8
CHAPTER VII.
Bradshaw's
father, as we have observed, lived
about five miles in the country, on a farm which
had been in his family for several generations
since the early settlement of this part of the
country
.
It was situated near the city. It consisted
of two hundred acres; the most of which was in a
state of high cultivationthe rest in wild
woodlands
.
Mr. Bradshaw, Clinton's father, whose
Christian
name was David, tilled it himself, assisted by
a few slaves. The farm lay between two roads
which led from the city, and was known
throughout
the whole county as the Pilgrim's Purchase;
this title having been given to it by its first
proprietor
,
who named it in honour of his forefathers. The
house was an old-fashioned one, of but one story,
built of large gray stone, with a long, projecting
roof, very thick walls, and long, narrow windows.
It was built on the top of a hill, which gently sloped
to a plain, that spread out in a beautiful meadow.
Immediately at the foot of the hill, the ground was
rough, and full of small rocks, that, in some places,
projected several feet above it. A beautiful, small
stream wound among the rocks and glided off to
the south, where its waters were greatly
augmented
.
Over the stream, which was called sometimes
the Branch, and sometimes Bradshaw's Branch,
or Carlton's Branch, according to its location and
to the names of the owners of the property through
which it passed, though it generally bore its
first-named
title, grew in some places trees of great
size, to which numbers of wild grape-vines clung,
stretching through the whole tree, and sometimes
falling from its branches in luxuriant clusters. In
other places, (we are speaking of that part of the
stream seen from Mr. Bradshaw's house,) it glided
through unshaded banks, except here and there a
knot of wild brushwood. To the left of the house
was a fine garden, and near it a noble barn, along
the eaves of which boxes were fixed, in which
innumerable
martens built their nests in summer.
Near, were all the necessary out-houses of a
well-stocked
farm; and they all had an ancient
appearance
.
Around the house was a number of noble
oaks, beneath which the grass grew long, and of
the darkest green. Behind the house was a large
grove, from which, with great care, Mr. Bradshaw
had had all the under-growth cleared, and every
spring the leaves were carefully removed, so that
the soil formed a beautiful turf, in many places for
yards. Around the foot of some of the largest oaks
grew a beautiful moss, of a silky softness, which
sometimes crept up the trees. Imbosomed in the
grove, and half hid by the trees, the white palings
of the family grave-yard could be seen. Every
thing about the Pilgrim's Purchase wore an air of
rural comfort and careful husbandry. The fences
were all good, and here and there the prying eye
would discover a horse-shoe a-straddle of the rail
or a bit of iron, which had been picked up in
ploughing
,
thrust into the hole of the post. The
fruit-trees
were properly trimmed, and away down in
the meadow, the hay-stacks were raised and strictly
guarded with a temporary fence. The appearance
of the farm and house was very much in keeping
with the character of their owner. Mr. Dayid
Bradshaw was a plain, fine-looking, old farmer, of
the methodist persuasion, and strictly pious: he
was one of the best neighbours and firmest friends
in the country round. His ancestors had always
maintained a most respectable standing, which had
given to the family a popularity and influence,
when they chose to exert them, which was rarely,
that had not diminished in his hands. In all affairs
of interest to his neighbourhood, Mr. Bradshaw took
an unobtrusive, but influential part. He got up
the project, and carried it through, of building a
country church near by. He was mild, yet
decided
:
any one who knew the father would
recognise
the son, from the family likeness; though the
father had none of the ardour, and fiery energy
of his child. The parent's example, however, had
done much to give the son self-control.
Mrs. Bradshaw, the mother of Clinton, had been
a lady remarkable for her personal beauty, her
gentle manners, and her intelligence. She took
great pride in the proper management of her
household
;
and though in her dress the plainest lady in
the neighbourhood, for, like her husband, she was
a methodist, yet the carriages of her fashionable
neighbours were as often seen at her door as at any
other. Her marriage was a love-match: her
father
was a worldly man, who had been wealthy,
and who lost none of his high notions with his
wealth; he was very much displeased with his
daughter, who was an only child, and motherless,
for marrying a farming drudge, as he used to call
Mr. Bradshaw; but, in his old age, when deprived
of every thing, his greatest solace and comfort, next
to the society of his daughter, was that of her
husband
,
under whose roof he died. There was
another
inmate of the Pilgrim's Purchase whom we
must not forgetEmily Bradshaw, the sister of
Clinton. Emily Bradshaw and Mary Carlton had
been friends from their childhood. Emily was a
year or more the older, but they had grown up
together, and all their early associations were with
each other and Clinton. Her form was slender
and delicate: she had the intellectual expression
and cast of features of her brother, but they were
softened into womanly meekness and beauty. She
was as gentle as the dove; and her life had glided
along so far, like the stream before her
paternal
doorcalmly brightlooking up to heaven
and reflecting its beauty: but she had that
acutely
sensitive temperament, that is feelingly alive
to the ills of others; with any and every one's
distress she truly sympathized; thus, though her
life passed without sorrow of her own, she felt the
sorrow of others, and had experienced, in this way,
the vanities of life. Spending much of her time
only in the society of her mother, she had ample
time for reading, of which she availed herself.
Every book of any interest was obtained for her
by her brother; and, as he frequently rode out to
8*
the farm, and spent the night there, and almost
every Sunday; for he loved to go to the country
church, and meet his old friends, they frequently
saw each other, and the conversation was often on
books. In this way, Emily's taste for reading was
strengthened and improved.
Behind Mr. Bradshaw's house, through the woods,
about half a mile, stood the splendid mansion of the
Hon. Samuel Carlton, the father of the young lady
who has been already introduced to our readers.
His estate was very large, and he lived,
apparently
,
in great magnificence, with the occasional
display
of ostentatious hospitality; but he was
money-making
and rather close; very wordly, and
possessed
of considerable talents. He was
exceedingly
ambitious of political distinction, and it gave him
no slight trouble to curb certain points in his
temper
and character, which, if indulged, he was aware,
would not contribute to his popularity. He had
held, for several years, a seat in Congress. His
origin
was humble, and not known in the city where
we open this narrative. When commencing life,
he had emigrated to it, and commenced the
practice
of the law. He soon after ran away with an
heiress of one of the first families, and possessed of
one of the largest fortunes in the state, who died in
giving birth to Mary Carlton, their only child. Mr.
Carlton remained a widower, and gradually retired
from practice, devoting his time to speculations in
property with the money he received from his
deceased
wife, and to politics. He acquired an
immense
fortune.
Mr. Carlton was what you would call a
fine-looking
man; portly, with regular features, but a
narrow forehead, and a rather small, but keen, eye.
In his personal appearance he was very neat. His
wife's maiden name was Holliday, a connexion of
the Hollidays of whom Bradshaw and Mrs. Perry
spoke at that lady's party. They were one of the
oldest, wealthiest, and most respectable families in
the state; one of the Hollidays held a high
judicial
station under the colonial government of George
the Third. They were very much displeased with
their relative for her marriage with Mr. Carlton,
and all intercourse was suspended between them,
until her death, when they requested Mr. Carlton
to let them take care of her infant daughter, which
he angrily refused. Mr. Carlton knew human
nature
,
and understood the worth of the Bradshaws.
In fact, actuated by her Christian and neighbourly
feelings, Mrs. Bradshaw attended the bed-side of
his dying wife, and, at the earnest request of the
father, and in obedience to the dictates of her own
heart, took the infant to her home. The earliest
recollections of Mary Carlton were of the Pilgrims'
Purchase, and its kind inmates. They were, to
her, father and mother, sister and brother. For
years, she and Emily Bradshaw pressed the same
pillow, and knelt by Mrs. Bradshaw's knee, night
and morning, and repeated the same prayer.
Clinton
was their early playmate. To the country
school, which lay through the woods, between Mr.
Carlton's and the Purchase, they all went together,
for years, when Clinton's health permitted his going;
and when it did not, the girls would sport, in their
play-time, round his couch, and do all they could
to relieve his suffering. They would read to him,
sing for him, gather for him the wild flower, and
the best fruit;and, in return, as he grew stronger,
and his health became established, he did all he
could to requite their kindness. Did they wish to
take a ride, Clinton would get their horses, and see
that all was right; did they wish to walk, Clinton
was by their side. He would read to them the
new book, or recite passages from the new poem.
Did they wish any piece of finery from town,
Clinton's
pony was saddled; and to him often did they
confide the choice and the colour. Though Clinton
attended the college in the city, for years before he
commenced the study of the law, yet he frequently
spent weeks in the country; and, in the summer
time, he would ride home almost every evening.
The girls always looked for his coming, and felt
disappointed and lonely if he came not. Latterly,
since he had commenced the study of the law, his
visits to the farm were much less frequent; and,
for the last two or three years, Miss Carlton had
taken up her residence at her father's estate, and
spent there most of the time which was not
occupied
in town, by her various teachers. However,
there was not a day passed, while she was in the
country, that the girls did not meet; and any
temporary
absence only served to endear them the
more to each other. Notes and letters passed
constantly
between them, when separated, in which
every thing was told with the freedom and
frankness
of unreserved conversation.
The neighbourhood of the Purchase was a very
respectable one, and the intercourse social and
friendly. The distinctions of society, known in
the city, were not here recognisedor, if
recognised
,
it was only in greater respect and kinder
attentions. The whole neighbourhood worshipped
at their county church. Religious meetings, too,
were frequently held in the school-room in which
many of the elders of the neighbourhood had
conned their horn-books. At either of the places,
when there was religious service, the inmates of
the Purchase almost always attended, and were
always
expected by their neighbours, between whom
and themselves the kindliest greetings, and the
most friendly offices, passed.
Gentlemen, said Bradshaw to Willoughby
and Cavendish, one day, the beautiful Indian
summer is upon us. I feel as if I wanted to take a
little holy-day. I've been pretty hard at it
lately
.
Suppose, this afternoon, we go out to my
father's
;
to-morrow will be Sunday; we'll visit the
county church, and go round and see some of the
old farmers: you'll be as welcome, Willoughby,
as if you were in Kentuck. What say you?
They accepted the proposal; and it was agreed
that they should start, towards evening, on
horse-back
.
Good morning, said Bradshaw. I'll walk
down to the market, and tell old Pete we are
coming.
But where shall we meet this afternoon?
asked Willoughby.
Why, I'll meet you any place you appoint
or suppose you all meet me at Jackson's livery
stable, at five.
Agreed, agreed! they exclaimed, as
Bradshaw
left them to see old Pete.
What kind of folks are the Bradshaws?
asked Willoughby. I believe you have been
often there, Judge, haven't you?
Quit that judge-ing, if you please,
Willoughby
.
Yes, often. They are first-rate people. The
old gentleman is one of the finest looking men
you ever saw; but he is as plain as a pike-staff,
and a rigid methodist;but, sir, you will see
more dignity of manners in him than in the chief
justice. He will welcome you like a prince; he
possesses the real old-fashioned hospitality; he
will throw his doors open to you, and you may
just do as you list; he has family prayers
regularly
he
don't ask you to attend, but he is pleased
if you do attend. Attend, if you wish to realize
your conceptions of a Madonna, and see Clinton's
sister at prayers. She is the most beautiful girl,
in my opinion, in the state. I know it is said
Mary Carlton has no rival, but I don't think so;
to be sure she is transcendently beautifulwith
the most brilliant eye and the richest lip I ever
saw, and she looks as if she would dare all, where
she loved; but I like the pale brow, the dark hair,
and the winning gentleness of Emily Bradshaw
much better. Kentuck, you don't seem to admire
our beauty.
Yes, I do, replied Willoughby; I admire
beauty every where: but, as Burns says
`I look to the west, when I go to my rest.'
If your heart stands unchanged the ordeal
here, you'll be a `true lover,' as the chap says in
the farce.
Willoughby laughed, and saidI don't know
how beautiful Bradshaw's sister is, but, I must
say, the prettiest girl, decidedly, that I have seen
east or west, is Miss Carlton. I don't know what
kind of sentiments you can have, Cavendish, to
object to a lady that `would dare all, where she
loved.' I wouldn't have a girl who wouldn't dare
all.
And suppose you didn't act exactly to please
such a dare-all lady? asked Cavendish.
But, suppose I did! A woman has her rights
as well as a man.
A disciple of Mrs. Wolstoncraft, exclaimed
Cavendish.
Pooh, said Willoughby, if these are your
real sentiments, you are laying up unhappiness
for yourself beforehand. I wonder if Bradshaw
has not some idea of Miss Carlton?
I have thought so, replied Cavendish. She
evidently prefers his company to any one's. It is
hard work to read Bradshaw. It is evident he
likes her: but I never could discover whether it
was love. He has that gentle, attentive way, to
every woman he knows. Bradshaw thinks more of
his studies, and of overshadowing success, than of
any thing else. His love would be as strong as his
ambition; he would be a hard rival to get over;
he would play `Allan A Dale' in fine style, if he
could not succeed in any other way.
CHAPTER VIII.
According
to arrangement, Bradshaw and his
friends visited the Purchase that afternoon. They
approached the farm as the sun was setting. That
glorious luminary, surrounded by a gorgeous host
of clouds, was hiding his disk behind a range of
hills, which bound the Purchase on the west. The
various hues of the foliage of the Indian summer,
shone beautifully in the parting rays. Cantering
gaily on, the young men felt that exhilaration of
spirits
,
which a ride on horse-back seldom fails to
impart
,
even to the aged. Bradshaw struck his spurs
into his steed, as they bounded on, and glanced round
on the scene with a compressed lip, but a flashing
eye. Even the Judge's gravity relaxed;though
not a graceful horseman, he was a sure one, and
he dashed on too, remarking, with something like
a smile, I like this. As Willoughby gave the
reins to his steed, he stretched his hand to the
setting
sun, and said:
There, Bradshaw! there's a scene: the sun's
face looks like a jolly old toper, who has taken his
last glass, and who is looking round, with a face full
of joy, on the table. How beautiful the hill-tops
look!and the foliage! the foliage! What is there
in the oriental lands superior to this of the west.
The sun's glancing now upon old Kentuck, in her
glory. He's laughing upon her hills, and dancing
upon her streams. Those must have been glorious
times in the early settlement of the west, when her
free spirits were roving over hill and prairie, and
when there was just danger enough from the
savage
foe to keep up excitement, and to make men
proud of the life and strength which they felt their
own prowess must maintain.
Very glorious times, said Cavendish, with
wild Indians behind the trees, lurking to shoot and
scalp you. No! the pleasure that I now feel is in
the perfect sense of security. I know there are no
Indians here; my saddle girth is strong, and I can
manage my horse; and there's health in the breeze.
If we were now riding in the west, in early times,
as an Irishman would say, I would not be with you.
I'd rather be snug in a smoky office, poring over
a law book.
I know it, Judge, replied Willoughby. If
you had been among the pioneers all around the
region of the scalp lock, you would have gone gray
for fear of losing it, while the lock itself would have
been silvered o'er. But, when the country was
cleared, you would have been first rate on the
judgment-seat, with a log shanty for a court-house,
where a lawyer would have to take his coat off,
and go at it, like all wrath, to earn any thing of a
fee; and where they would have to run down a
jury, as they do now in Indianacatch them, man
by man, and tie them to a tree, till they've got a
Vol. I. 9
dozen, and then bring them, tied together, to
prevent
their escape, into the court-house.
In those early times, said Bradshaw, there
must have been a great field for the display of
eloquence
.
Men, who follow mainly their impulses,
must be greatly moved by oratory. Henry Clay is
a very great man, no doubt; but, then, he had a
great field, Willoughbyhe had a great field.
Yes, that's a fact, replied Willoughby. I
remember seeing, somewhere, a tale of Davies
Joe Davies, as he is called in Kentuckhe who
was killed at the battle of Tippecanoe, where the
gallant Harrison commanded, which illustrates the
effect of eloquence upon a Kentuckian. The tale
states that a stranger, from one of the eastern states,
was travelling in a distant part of Kentucky: he
was attracted, by a great crowd, to a log house, in
which, when he entered, he found the court for the
county sitting. A case, I believe, of seduction,
occupied
the attention of the court. Pleased with
the powers of the defendant's counsel, the stranger
stopped to listen. After the speaker concluded, a
man in a hunting-dress arose and addressed the
jury, for the plaintiff, in reply. He began
awkwardly
,
but he warmed as he went along, handled
the testimony in a most masterly manner, and
concluded
with an overwhelming burst of eloquence,
that melted the audience to tears. The stranger
was so struck with the speech, that, as the
assembly
broke up, he inquired of a rough-looking
Kentuck
,
who the last lawyer was. The Kentuckian
looked at him with surprise, observing`You must
be a stranger in these parts.' `I am,' said the
stranger. `I thought so,' replied the Kentuckian,
`for nobody but Joe Davies ever made me cry by
the tin-full.'
[1]
[1]
This incidentwhether fact or fiction, I know notforms
a very pretty story in Hall's Magazine, or the Cincinnati
Gazette
,
I forget which.
As they wound up the hill, the scene appeared
more and more striking. The noble grove of oaks
behind the house, with its rich variety of hues,
looked even richer in the sun-set, while the
venerable
mansion, with its comfortable out-houses, and
highly cultivated grounds, presented a picture of
repose and peace that contrasted delightfully with
the city scene which the young men had just left.
As they approached the gate, old Pete's son, young
Pete, was perched on the top of the gate-post,
waiting for the cows to come up, instead of going
after them, as he had been ordered. Young Pete
had taken his present elevated situation for a
double
purposefirst, that he might keep a sharp look
out towards the house, and learn, as soon as
possible
,
if his mother, who attended to the duties of the
dairy, should have any intention of stealing a march
upon him, with purposes unfriendly to his quiet;
and, secondly, that, while taking his ease, instead
of running after the cows, he might command a
view of them, as they strolled leisurely along,
occasionally
stopping to crop the herbage on the sides
of the lane, and observe if any of them had a
disposition
to turn back, or to stop so long, as to
render
his activity imperious. Young Pete had on
one of Massa Clinton's old jackets, which
Clinton
had worn when a boy, and which was too
large for its present wearer. The pockets were
crammed full of marbles, tops, and bits of twine,
with which Pete set snares. His head was graced
with an old hat, without any crown in it, and with
the rim torn off in front, so that the vision of the
wearer might not be intercepted. He had a round,
shiny face; his mouth seemed made for a broad
grin, as it was perpetually developing his ivory from
ear to ear. With his lower extremities, which
were graced with a thick pair of coarse shoes, he
was drumming against the gate-post, on which he
was seated, while he patted his thighs and whistled,
in harmony. Occasionally, he would stop, as if
struck with a sudden thought, count and recount
his marbles, to see that none were missing, and then
stow them away safely in his pockets; or he would
examine his twine, to be satisfied that there were
no weak places in it, that might let a rabbit off;
or he would glance up at some bird that was taking
roost in a tree near him, and then at a stone on
the ground; but his love of ease, after a slight
struggle
,
would prevail over his more warlike purposes.
As soon as young Pete heard the tramp of the
horses, and the voices of the horsemen, he got up on
the post, to see who was coming. By goley, said
he, jumping down from the post, and throwing the
gate wide open, there comes Massa Clinton, and
that gentlemans what looks like a preacher, that
Massa Clinton calls Judge; and another gentlemans.
Pete, keep your eye open, niggeryou'll get
something
whiter than a red cent. Holding the gate
officiously open, he waited the approach of Massa
Clinton and his friends.
Well, Pete, asked Bradshaw, how are all at
home?
Sarvant, Massa Clinton, said young Pete,
doing
his best at a bow: all's well, sir. Miss Mary's
come out this morning.
Ah, did she!Hold your hatthe devil: you're
like my Lord Bacon: you love the blessed rain of
heaven upon your head.
[2]
[2]
Lord Bacon, we are told, would uncover his head in riding
out, even, sometimes, in the rain.
Catch, then! The shining
metal, for a moment, glistened through the air, and
the next it was safe between young Pete's palms.
Pete eyed it, as the horsemen dashed on, and said,
I was jist guine to chuck you up and catch you,
but fool who! if I miss you, you'll hide in the grass,
like that fip the tother day. Gaul darn it, I can't
find it, no how! I stood right in the spot, and
chucked up a stone, but it wouldn't fall in the
right place. Come in, cows! Come in! I'll buy a
Jews-harp, some more marbles, some gingerbread,
and have some red cents left. Massa Clinton's the
best massa 'bout here, jist as he's the 'cutest. Pete,
you're no fool for a nigger, neither. Young Pete
here observed his mother advancing, with a
stealthy
step, towards him, with her right hand
ominously
behind her.
Oh, mammy! exclaimed Pete, as soon as he
could make his voice reach the maternal ear, I've
had a tarnal fuss with them cows. Massa Clinton
and them gentlemans what come with him, dashed
up an' scattered 'em every which way. He gin
me some money, though, mammy, an' I'm guine,
9*
soon as I git my supper, down to the road to buy
you some 'bacca.
That's right, Pete, said his mother, dropping
a stout switch behind her, as she spoke; drive
'em quick round to the yard, and put up the bars.
I want some 'bacca badly.
At the door of his hospitable mansion, Mr.
Bradshaw
welcomed the friends of his sons in a manner
that justified the eulogy of Cavendish; by his side
stood Emily Bradshaw and Mary Carlton.
Mary, said Bradshaw, this puts me in mind
of old times.
Come, sir, not such old times neither; we're not
so ancient of days. If we are, my memory is vivid;
for it seems to me as yesterday.
As Bradshaw entered the house by her side, he
whispered, May it always seem so, lady fair.
At the board of Mr. Bradshaw, under the care
of his daughter, there was elegance as well as
abundance. The evening glided on delightfully.
Seated in the corner, in a comfortable
rocking-chair
,
Mrs. Bradshaw employed herself in knitting,
every moment glancing round with a delightful
smile, and occasionally mingling in the
conversation
.
Cavendish sat beside old Mr. Bradshaw, much
interested in a conversation with him as to the
probable
decision of the court on a writ of mandamus,
which had been granted in a religious controversy.
Willoughby was engaged in conversation with Miss
Bradshaw. At a stand, a little apart, sat Mary
Carlton, with a pencil in her hand, making
grotesque
figures, and writing names on the blank leaf
of a novel, while her long curls fell over either
cheek and touched the book before her, leaving
uncovered a neck white as snow. Bradshaw sat
beside her, with his elbow on the stand, leaning
his head on his hand: he mingled in the
conversation
whenever it became general, which was every
few minutes, for a passing remark or two, when,
again, every one would turn to his immediate
neighbour, and Bradshaw would address Miss
Carlton
,
or answer some remark of hersshe looking
up at him from the paper momently, with a face
expressive of every emotion, as it passed through
her mind. Sometimes she would throw back her
curls with a happy laugh; or bury her face in
them, and seem to be busily drawing, as he spoke;
or glance through them with so arch a look, that
whoever chanced to catch it, though engaged at
the time in earnest conversation with another, could
not but smile pleasantly at its beauty and
expression
.
At ten o'clock, the servants were called in to
prayers: after reading a chapter in the Bible, Mr.
Bradshaw offered up a prayer to the throne of
grace, with that impressive fervour that comes
right from the heart, and goes right to it. The
girls, with most sweet voices, then sang a hymn;
and the old folks retired, and left the young ones
to themselves.
After Mr. and Mrs. Bradshaw retired,
Willoughby
sat, with folded arms, musing for some time.
At last, he exclaimed, as if he were expressing his
own thoughts, unconscious to whom he spoke
Bradshaw, how I like the face of your father!
He looks as if he had the blood of the pilgrims in
him. I
feel
he would have stood on the pilgrim
rock, with the ocean behind him, and wilderness
before, with a firm reliance upon that Being to
worship whom, in freedom, he had sought the spot.
Where the deuce did you get your ambition from,
and your tact, and worldly energies?
From the world, said Bradshaw, smiling, if
I have them. But, continued he, gravely, the
lessons I have learned under this roof will ever, I
hope, keep them in just subjection. Kentuck, I'm
glad you like my father: I thought you would. I'm
prouder of him than if he were a duke. You must
know, that I consider, if there is any aristocracy
in this free land, I belong to it. Not that I
consider
any stagnant, wasting reservoir of merit in
my ancestors should do me any good, but only if
such honours are to count in the game of life, I lay
claim to my share.
But you would rather count by
tricks
, would
you? said the Judge, who was very proud of
being
descended from one of the old families.
No, Judge, not exactly, replied Bradshaw,
smiling; but I would have honours easy, a fair
deal, honest players, and then go a-head for the odd
trick, which should not be won by
trickery
.
There's a knave in every pack, Bradshaw,
said Cavendish.
I know it, Judge; but, remember, he counts
among the honours, and takes a trick, too, your
honourable knave.
The next morning shone upon the inmates of
the Purchase one of the mildest and mellowest of
this delightful season. A thin haze rested over
the landscape; the branch rippled along like a
sheet of silver, over which the weeping willow
hung still green, while the other trees bore the
red and yellow leaf. It was determined that they
should all go to the county church; Mr. and Mrs.
Bradshaw, as usual, in their chaise, and the rest
on horseback. A servant had been sent to Mr.
Carlton's for Mary's favourite horse; and, at the
proper hour, the party could be seen on their
winding way through the woods. The church
was situated about two miles from the Purchase,
at a place called the cross roads, where a road that
ran parallel with the turnpikes of which we have
spoken, intersected another that connected them.
These cross roads were made for the convenience
of the different farmers who lived off of the
turnpikes
.
There were no buildings at the cross roads
but the church and a farm-house, the owner of
which attended to the duty of having the church
swept and lighted. This rural place of worship
stood on a rising ground, in a high primeval forest
that towered above and around, and formed, in
summer
,
a delightful shade, beneath which the horses
and various vehicles of conveyance of the
worshippers
might be seen whenever there was preaching.
The church itself was built of such stone as was
found in the neighbourhood, and very plain: it
was erected on the ruins of a log meeting-house
that had been built in the early settlement of the
country, in which the rude forefathers, who were
sleeping in the grave-yard near, had worshipped
with their rifles in their hand, to guard their
families
around them, and their altar, from the
cruelty
and profanation of the savages. In the
clearing
which had been made to build the log
meeting-house
,
was the grave-yard. A neat fence had
been erected round it when the new church was
built, immediately behind which it stood. Many
of the head-pieces at the graves had sunk
considerably
in the earth, while various others leaned
in different directions in the dark, rank grass.
An aged oak, that had grown to an immense size,
stood in the right corner, at the lower end of the
enclosure; immediately at the foot of which was
a grave, where, according to tradition, he, who
had contributed most to the log meeting-house,
and given the ground on which it stood, slept.
In the opposite corner was a weeping willow that
bent inwards towards the graves, and bowed its
branches over them as though it felt the sorrow
of which it was the emblem. Many willows,
besides
,
and some cedars, with the wild sweet brier,
and, here and there, a clump of alders, grew over
the last repose of the sleepers. Every thing
around, as a painter would say, was in keeping.
The large gray stone that composed the church
with the tiled roof, to which the overshadowing
trees had given a mossy appearance, made the
building seem much older than it really was.
The Sabbath, in such a scene, was truly the
Sabbath
.
A party would ride up and fasten their
horses under the trees, and join some group
of friends who had arrived before them, and who
were waiting for the coming of the preacher,
when the most neighbourly salutations would be
given and received. Here, a rustic beau,
bedecked
in his best, would assist a rustic belle from
her palfrey, and fasten him to some tree, on which,
perchance, he had been carving her initials, in his
best style, surrounding them with a double heart,
in which sacred enclosure he hoped some day to
carve his own: while, there, some old couple were
descending from their ancient vehicle, assisted, may
be, by the country doctor, who inquires, with a most
sympathetic physiognomy, after the old lady's
rheumatise, and narrates some cure which he
had just effected in neighbour Tomkins' right leg,
just at the knee-joint, that had been sorely afflicted
since last winter. In the corners of the fences, and
lolling against the trees, on the sunny side, might
be seen the negroes, in various lazy groups, talking
in a low voice. Some old aristocratic family black
would, with officious zeal, hold his young Massa's
horse, and boast of him as he walked away; while
his wife or daughter would speak of their young
Missus, and tell how many beaux she had. These
old servants have as much family pride as their
masters. On this occasion, young Pete was in the
woods, within sight of the meeting-house, but in
rather an unfrequented place, with a whole troop
of little blacks around him, displaying his various
treasures of marbles, gingerbread, twine, red cents,
and fips, with the zeal of a connoisseur, who
exhibits
a diamond, whilst he pronounces it of the
best water. By his officiousness in attending upon
Willoughby and Cavendishholding their stirrups,
tightening their girths, &c.,he had contrived to
levy a contribution upon both of them. Early in
the morning, he slipped round to the grocery store,
added to his stock of marbles, bought his mammy
some 'bacca, himself a great hunck of gingerbread
and a Jews-harp; and, with his change jingling in
his pocket, came, whistling, to church. His jacket
was buttoned, by one button, just above the
pockets
,
so that their openings, or mouths, were drawn
down tightly over their accumulated treasures, that
projected luxuriantly on either side. A large,
old-fashioned
pin, that, by rights, belonged to Mrs.
Bradshaw, flanked the button, and made assurance
doubly sure. When he unpinned his jacket, he
carefully deposited the pin in his cuff, and then,
unbuttoning the garment, he exclaimed
Now, niggers, keep your eyes open! Do you
see this little childthis white alley? said he,
showing a white marble, after wetting it in his
mouth; look at the streaks in it. She's a little
pealershe cost two of the prettiest red cents you
ever seedshe's my man! Who'll play, niggers?
There's twine, that the rabbits 'll love to have round
their necks. There's fips for you, niggers! five of
'em, and look at them red cents. Look at this
Jews-harp! it ain't iron, it's silver; I can make her
sing betterer than 'ary lady at that are church,
but my two missusses. Here, said he, taking out
of his hat, the top of which he had tied with twine,
so that it looked like a sugar-loaf, a large piece of
gingerbread, here, niggers, here's some
gingerbread
for you; this nigger's got his belly full. Wait
till church is guine in, and we'll go down to the road,
and I'll treat the whole on you to some
cherry-bounce
.
Take care! take care! there's massa
Clinton
,
and them gentlemans, and young missusses. I
must tend their horses! exclaimed young Pete,
running towards the church. Here, gaul darn
it! Joe Carlton keep that marble for me, said Pete,
as a marble bounced out of his pocket. On he
went, not having time to button his jacket, which,
nevertheless, he held together with his elbows
pressed down on his pockets.
The young men gathered round Bradshaw and
welcomed him. It was evident, that he was a
great favourite, and that they were proud of his
acquaintance. He had not the least show-off in
his manner; on the contrary, he seemed almost
boyish, as he grasped their hands, inquired after
their parents, and spoke of their schoolboy pranks
together. Even the oldest men seemed anxious to
speak with him, and listened, when he spoke upon
any subject, not as they generally listen to young
men, with restiff impatience or indifference, but
with affectionate respect. He knew all the
country
belles, from the blacksmith's daughter, a pretty
girl, by the by, to Miss Carlton. His manner was
the same to all. They greeted him joyously, asked
why he had not been to see them, and told him he
must be sure to ride over. All the negroes, young
and old, knew him; and, as he passed them, they
were sure to speak to him, and receive a kindly
remark: so was it with his sister and Mary
Carlton
.
With sober and quiet dignity, the congregation
were soon all gathered into the church, like, to use
the Scriptural phrase, the sheep in the fold. The
sermon was a plain, practical oneupon good
works, such as all denominations of Christians
Vol. I. 10
might subscribe to, without offence to any of their
sectarian notions of faith.
After the service was over, a number of the
young gentlemen and ladies of the neighbourhood
rode over to the Purchase, and spent the
remainder
of the day there. Cavendish was known
before
in the neighbourhood, and popular. It was
pleasing to observe how quickly Willoughby
became
a favourite. His frank manners, manly
deportment
,
fine person, and general intelligence
interested
every one. He seemed so soon to catch
the hue of the society around him. He gave
pleasure
not by attempting the arts of pleasing, but by
giving himself up to the social impulses of his
companions
.
There was so much heart in his
manners
,
as Emily Bradshaw observed. He was a
young man of fortune; or rather he had the
expectation
of a very large one, at the death of his only
relative, an uncle. Willoughby was an orphan,
and the only blood connexion that he had in the
world was this uncle.
In speaking once of his uncle to Bradshaw,
Willoughby
said: My uncle, Bradshaw, is one of the
strangest men you ever saw: he is generous, at
times, to a faultthat is, when the wind blows
rightand he'll chirp about like a bird: you'd
think, to see him then, that he never had a sad
momentafter a while, he falls upon what he calls
one of his dark days, and then every thing goes
wrong with himhe hates to part with a fip, gets
tetchy, wayward, usurious, and fancies his best
friend his foe. It proceeds from ill healtha
disorder
of the liver, which the doctor told me once,
in confidence, for he dare not tell the old
gentleman
,
he thought partially affected his mind. He
has no childrennever was marriedand he
received
,
by inheritance, a large estate, to which he
has all his life been adding. He has now the largest
fortune in the west. He has treated me with
wayward
harshness several times, but he always made
more than an atonement. Generally, he gives me
every thing that I wantand, I really believe, is
sometimes angry with me because I don't spend
more money; but he is a strangely suspicious being.
CHAPTER IX.
As
the fall advanced, the younger members of
the bar, the students and others, at the suggestion
of Bradshaw, formed a debating society. They
met night after night, preparing a constitution and
adding to their numbers. Bradshaw exerted
himself
to get up the institution and to infuse an
esprit du
corps
into the society. He would dwell, among his
companions, with no common enthusiasm, on those
accounts in the lives of eminent men, which tell of
their first efforts in debating societies.
Practice is the thing, he would say, and we
must go a-head; `keep moving, dad, keep moving,'
as young Rapid says in the play. We must keep
moving with a high purpose. Without going back
to the ancientsto the cave of Demosthenes, and
his shaven crown, and six months'
self-imprisonment
to
Cicero's trials and studies, and a hundred
others; look at the moderns! Poor Curran, by Jove!
we are told, that his wife and family occupied the
room in which the debating society to which he
belonged
metthey let him occupy it because he had
no otherand he had to move out bag and
baggage
,
wife and children, every Saturday night that
they might meet. When old Bob Lyons took him
his first fee, Curran said himself that the only
furniture
of his room was a bed, table, a few broken
chairs, a pregnant wife, and three children. What
a beautiful passage that is in his speeches, where,
addressing Lord Avonmore, between whom and
himself there had been a misunderstanding, he
reminded
him of their early associations; Avonmore
burst into tears. Avonmore was, in those days
which Curran referred to, not worth a sixpence
himself. When Curran was at college, the faculty
were about censuring him for his slovenliness; in
self-defence, he told the anecdote of Avonmore.
`Mother,' said Avonmore, `I wish I had eleven
shirts!'`Why so, Barry?'`Because, mother, I
think, a man, to be a gentleman, should have the
full dozen. Do ye take? Curran had but one
a first-rate excuse for not changing. Erskine went
to the Robin Hood debating society night after
night; by practising there, he acquired that
command
of his powers, which enabled him, in his very
first speech at the bar, to come out all excellence.
Burke first signalized himself at a debating society,
by opposing a journeyman baker, who, Goldsmith
said, was fit to be lord chancellor. Look at our
own great men! Judge Chase, the signer of the
Declaration of Independence, happened to go into
a debating society in Annapolis, and there heard
William Pinckney, who was but an apothecary's
boy. `I do remember an apothecary,' realizing
Shakspeare's description, no doubt. Chase was so
struck with his talents that he advised him on the
spot to study law; and, as Pinckney had no means,
Chase took him into his own house. Henry Clay
10*
made his first effort in a debating society, in
Lexington
,
Kentucky, I believeyour hailing place,
Willoughby. When Clay rose to speak, instead of
addressing the president of the society, he said `
Gentlemen
of the jury.' This shows that Clay often
thought of making a speech before he did make
one; and if he had not often thought of it, he would
not only have been embarrassed at first, but, in all
probability, he would have failed completely. I
tell you what it is, most of us must get our bread
by the wagging of our tongues, and I am for
commencing
the practice early. Washington Irving,
in speaking of a woman's tongueand we may say
it of a man'ssays it is the only edged tool that
grows sharper from constant use. Ay, Judge, I see
you smile! You think children should not play
with edged tools. I know it; but remember, we are
apprentices to a trade that requires the use of these
edged tools, and if we would not cut our fingers
with them when old, we must use them when
young. `Words are things;' and in our profession,
it is scarcely saying too much, to assert that they
are every thing.
The debating society was formed, and gradually
increased until it numbered upwards of a hundred.
The society held its meetings in a very large hall,
over an engine housean appropriate place for
spouting, as Bradshaw was wont to remark
where they had crowded audiences every public
evening. On every other evening, only, were the
public admitted, because there were many
members
who wished to break the ice, but who shrunk
from doing it before a large audience, which might
embarrass them so much as to prevent their
proceeding
;
an event that is not so likely to occur
before
a smaller audience, composed only of members
of the society, with whom the speaker is personally
acquainted; and, if it did occur, the mortification
would not be so great. Besides, it would not
redound
to the credit of the society, to have its
members fail in a public attempt; and it is one
of the most disagreeable things in the world, to a
sensitive mind, to witness it. When the society
was first got up, some of the students of the law
were for having it exclusive. But Bradshaw
laughed at the idea. If you can convince us,
gentlemen, said he, that intellect is confined
exclusively
to our profession, agreed, and we will have
our debating society a theatre for displaying it, and
we will all be stars. But
Genius is of no country; her pure ray
Spreads all abroad, as general as the day.
There is both rhyme and reason in those two pithy
lines of Churchill, the satirist. Your notion would
be a good subject for his muse, if she would stoop to
it from her supreme dominion. Ay, and genius is
of no profession, either. By Jove, I know a young
blacksmith, round the corner, to whom some of us
will not be able to hold a candle. No, sirs, I am
for having every young man join, who is
respectable
,
be he who he may, or what he may. Let us
have our society upon republican principles. Let
the majority elect the officers and decide the
questions
;
and, as a matter of courtesy, on public
evenings
,
we must invite our audience to vote upon
the merits of the debate. Let our constitution and
by-laws be as simple as can be, so that we may
have no disputes about them: for what is more
tedious
than such disputes? Notwithstanding the
republican
principles I have just avowed, I was going
to propose that we should put every fellow in
Coventry
,
who makes a long speech upon constitutions
and by-laws.
Bradshaw spared no pains to improve himself in
speaking and composition. Though he had not half
the reputation for studious habits that many of his
fellow-students had, yet he
thought
much more than
any of them. He was not so often seen with a
book or pen in his hand, and he was often caught
in his little room, over the office of the gentleman
with whom he read law, with his arms folded, in
a state of abstraction, or stretched out, apparently
listless, on three or four chairs, or walking up and
down his room, talking to himself; but, generally,
in all these moods, he was unravelling some
intricate
question, or repeating the thoughts of some
author in his own language, that he might the more
impress them on his mind; or he was preparing
himself for some discussion before his society, and
making over and over to himself a train of
argument
,
which, though he put not one word of it on
paper, he, nevertheless, had as pat, as much by
heart
, as if he had committed it all to paper, and
then to memory. This is, perhaps, the best way
to study; for then the student carries about with
him ever his intellectual gifts. When he writes a
speech and commits it to memory, in the act of
writing he only seeks to put his thought down, and
in speaking, to pick it up. In this habit, he is apt
to lose or injure his powers of extemporizingfor
the mind is as much influenced by
habit
as the
body; and having accustomed himself to speak
prepared
language, no matter how well he may be
acquainted with his subject, he cannot speak
without
that preparationconsequently, his mental
exercise
,
when speaking, is but an act of memory,
from which the excitement that arises in the
creation
of an argument, or even in expressing it, in
extemporaneous
language, is banished. This makes
a speaker a mere actor; and, though he expresses
his own thoughts, his mind is a reservoir, and not
a fountainit has none of the gush and glow, the
sparkling vivacity, and the crystal clearness, of the
spring.
Found, as often as we have said Bradshaw was,
without pen or book, it gave him a reputation
rather
for idleness than industry, among those who
did not know him well; a reputation which, with a
Sheridan-like vanity, he was at no pains to
contradict
;
when the fact was, that in mental industry,
as we have already observed, he equalled any of
his compeers. From such habits of study as
Bradshaw's
,
many men have obtained a reputation for
idleness. Patrick Henry, for instance; who can doubt,
that when watching for hours his fishing-cork
without
even a nibble, or when roaming days through
the woods, that he was forming those bright
creations
which astonished his contemporaries. When
Sheridan's friends thought him asleep in bed, he was
in bed, it is true, but was preparing his speech for
the evening in the house. Curran's favourite habit
of study was with a violin in his hand, running
over some of his favourite tunes: those who saw
him indulging his musical taste, just before making
his great efforts, thought, doubtless, he was very
idle, and that his speeches were all miraculous
creations. So they were miraculous creations, but,
as Moore said of Sheridan, like a skilful priest, he
prepared the miracle of the moment beforehand.
Much has been said of the extemporaneous
reply
of Mr. Webster to Mr. Hayne, in the Senate
of the United States, on Foote's resolutions,so it
might have been extemporaneous as to language,
but the great constitutional argument which that
speech contains, has been the elaboration of Mr.
Webster's political life.
Bradshaw had every natural advantage to make
an orator:a fine person, most graceful manners,
one of the most expressive faces in the world,
capable
of every variety of expression, and a voice loud
and clear in its high tones, while its lowest were
silvery
,
and as distinct as Kean's the tragedian, and an
eye like an eagle's. At the table of Mr. Glassman,
who was very fond of theatricals, and who esteemed
acting, in some respects, the sister-art to oratory,
he frequently met the distinguished actor, B.
Once after dinner, Glassman and B, recited
different passages from Shakspeare, and they
called on Bradshaw to do the same. With some
diffidence he complied. They were much struck
with his powers, and the tragedian used all his
eloquence to induce him to join the stage.
Why not, said he, you will make much
more money than you possibly can at the bar, and
then the applause of the theatre is as gratifying as
that of the bar.
Bradshaw did not state his reasons for not
complying
with the advice of the tragedian: he,
however
,
pleased the actor so much, that they became
very intimate. Bradshaw took lessons in oratory
from him, and he derived from his instructions
great practical advantages.
That's it, that's it, the tragedian would
exclaim
,
after Bradshaw had recited for him some of
the best passages of the drama,
O, what an Ovid was in Murray lost!
So said Pope of his friend Mansfield, and so may
I, with a little change of the line, say of you,
O, what an actor was in Bradshaw lost!
Be carefulyou waste your voice too much:
that is, you too often make it exert its utmost
powers; if you were to perform a tragedy
Richard
the Third, for instance, or Learyou would
be exhausted before you got into the fifth act, for
which you should husband your energies. In
speaking a speech, you will, perhaps, be more
liable
to exhaustion, because you must go on without
a breathing spell. It is execrable to hear a man
speak after his energies are exhausted. Pray you,
avoid it, as Hamlet would say. By the by, that
speech of Hamlet to the players, is the best advice
in the world to your profession as well as to mine.
If I were you, as a speaker, I never would study
a gesture for a particular passage: it is proper in
our profession, but I doubt if it would suit in yours.
On the stage, whether our feelings are in
cue
or
not, we must go through the part as it is set down,
and, of course, when we come to the affecting
passage
,
we must use the appropriate gesture. In
this respect the orator has the advantage of the
actor. You are not compelled to be pathetic,
whether your feelings will or not: But we, though
not in the `melting mood,' must assume the feeling,
though we have it not, when we reach that
passage
in Othello, where the melting mood is
necessary
.
You will be careful never to attempt the
pathetic, the awful, the sublime, or even the
ridiculous
,
but where you feel it. There is such a
sympathy between heart and heart, that the
commonest
man in your audience will find you out if
you do. Remember this, that when you have
waked a feelingan impulseno matter of what
passion, you can easier pass to anotherits very
oppositethan you can call up a feeling from the
dead level. You understand me: I mean that
when your audience are excited, you can easier
make them both laugh and weep, than you could
make them laugh, if they were not excited. I
told you not to prepare a gesture for a
particular
passageyou should not. If there is any
imperfection in your gestureif you are too
hurried
,
for instancecorrect itcorrect all such
imperfections, until your gestures impulsively
assume
a naturalness: Naturalness! sacrifice any
thing, every thing to nature. I would rather see
a speaker awkward and ungainly, where he felt,
than ever so graceful and appropriate where he
did not feel. Canning, for instance, had thrice the
grace of Brougham, but Brougham produced
much greater effectwas more powerfulthat
is, in plain language, he felt deeper what he said.
Some one has said, I forget who, that a gesture
should be `felt, not seen.' That is a just remark.
Oratory is like Pope's description of beauty. It is
not the eye or the brow that we call beauty; and
it is not the tone, the look, the intellect, the
gesture
Demosthenes
to the contrary,
notwithstanding
that
we call oratory,
`But the full force and joint effect of all.'
Bradshaw applied himself closely to his legal
studies, but not so closely as to neglect polite
literature
or general information. On the contrary,
he made himself familiar with all the great
English
poets and prose writers: in the interval of his
law studies, he resorted to them as recreation.
He accustomed himself to composition, and
occasionally
wrote for the press, not only prose, but
sometimes he attempted poetry, for which he
had a taste. Often, after a long deliberation on
the subject to be discussed at his debating
society
,
he would write out an argument, pro and
con, on the question, and then go to his society;
and without taking with him a note, or repeating
a line of what he had written, he would enter into
the debate. In this way, not only by the force of
his great natural talents, but by his industry, he
surpassed every member of the society, although
there was a great deal of talent in it, and men
much older than himself. There were some who
detracted from him, it is true; for when was there
Vol. I. 11
high talent that had not detractors? but this was
only with a few members of the society who envied
him: with the great majority, and with the
visiters
,
he stood without a rival. Cavendish would
often press hard upon him, not in oratory or
general
information, nor in powers of language, but in
close argument, and in dry, quaint humour.
Willoughby
,
in wild declamation, keen remarks, and
odd phraseology, would sometimes produce a strong
impression; and Jekyl, the blacksmith, of whom
Bradshaw spokethough his pronunciation was
bad, his sentences ungrammatical, and his manner
awkward; and though he possessed comparatively
very little information, yet by the dint of powerful
native talent, to borrow an illustration from his
own craft, he would weld his arguments together
with such sledge-hammer force and directness,
that it often required all Bradshaw's eloquence,
with appropriate quotation, varied knowledge, and
great powers of argumentation, to remove the
impression. Jekyl possessed a remarkably pure
heart and mind,he had no envy in his
composition
.
Bradshaw had broken his father's chase,
and drove round to the blacksmith-shop, at which
Jekyl worked as a journeyman, to have it mended.
While he was mending it, Bradshaw entered into
conversation with him, and was pleased.
Afterwards
,
in his walks, he would often stop in and
converse with Jekyl while at work. In this way
an intimacy grew up between them; and often,
after his day's work, Jekyl might be seen walking
round to the room of Bradshaw, where they would
sit and converse for hours. Bradshaw proposed
Jekyl as a member of their debating society; and
in spite of the opposition of some of the members,
whose aristocracy was offended, he had him
elected
.
Jekyl had no wit or humour, nor powers of
retort, and was, withal, very sensitive. Some of
the membersand particularly one named Talbot,
who possessed considerable talent, and more
malignity
would
frequently ridicule his bad
pronunciation
and grammatical errors. The blacksmith
would suffer in silence; for, as we have observed,
he had no talent for reply. On such occasions,
Bradshaw always came to the rescue of his friend:
his indignant eye and withering sarcasm, had
silenced
such remarks for some time, when, on one
occasion, Talbot, who had been beaten in the
debate
by Jekyl, in reply, was guilty not only of
ridiculing
his grammatical errors and bad
pronunciation
,
but of the mean personality of alluding to his
occupation. Bradshaw rose indignantlyit was a
public debateand said, Mr. President, is it
necessary
for me here to repeat the well known anecdote
of a celebrated character, who had originally been
a shoemaker, but who rose by the dint of great
talents
,
and in spite of many obstacles, to distinction
and power, and who was reproached with his
former
vocation by a certain person. `Sir,' said he,
in reply, `by my industry, and with what gifts
God gave me, I have arisen to be what I am: if
the gentleman who taunts me with what I was,
had been bred a shoemaker, he would have been
a shoemaker still.' Sir, I will say this for my
friend, the
blacksmith
, that if some ten or twenty
years hence, the gentleman who has been so
courteous
in this debate, should then throw the smithy
in his teeth, he may relate the anecdote which I
have alluded to, with perfect applicability to that
gentleman and to himself.
Bradshaw uttered this in a feeling and dignified
manner; the whole audience, many of whom were
mechanics, responded to it heartily, with a burst
of applause: no uncommon tribute for Bradshaw
to receive, but which was peculiarly grateful to
the feelings of Jekyl, and humiliating to Talbot;
for they both felt that the sentiment was
applauded
,
as well as the utterer. Talbot never forgave
Bradshaw; for among the audience were some of
the most fashionable belles and beaux of the city,
his acquaintance, who were in the habit of
attending
the public meetings of the society, which was,
in fact, a place of fashionable resort. On Jekyl
it produced as deep an impression, but of a far
different kind. He was a lover, a painfully
sensitive
one; and he had brought with him to the
debate
,
on this evening, the young girl whom he
was wooing, who accompanied his mother and
himself. He was deeply attached, and tremblingly
alive to the issue of his attachment; for the maiden
had not yet been won. Bradshaw's manly and
high, yet courteous bearing, and the promise of a
splendid career, which his efforts at the debating
society had augured for him, already made him
the town talk. This simple incident was,
therefore
,
remembered by Jekyl with abundant
gratitude
.
As the assembly broke up, he grasped
Bradshaw convulsively by the hand; but his
emotion
would not let him say one word. Bradshaw
caught the beaming eye of the maiden full upon
him. With a quick sagacity he saw how matters
stoodhe saw, too, that Jekyl observed her happy
expression, and as he shook the blacksmith's hand,
he whispered to him significantly,
Go a-head, my dear fellow; `Faint heart
never
won fair lady.' Remember, this is both
literally
and metaphorically true. That night
Jekyl
took heart, told his love, and was accepted.
If he had sunk beneath the taunt of Talbot, and
it had passed unanswered, would he have been
accepted
?
Upon such slight things depend our weal
or wo. Suspecting Jekyl's love affair, put
Bradshaw
in mind of Selman's; and, as he left the
debating
society, with Cavendish and Willoughby,
and took an arm of each, on their way to
Fleming's
,
he observed
As Selman never takes part in our debates,
and as Miss Penelope frequently attends, we must
be true to our conspiracy of helping him on, and
make him president of the society. What say you?
Ha! ha!good! said Kentuck. I thought
this evening, as Miss Penelope has such
admiration
for oratory, that if Selman does not come
out, he might hurt his suit. It's a first rate idea
to make him president, for then he will not be
expected to speak; and, as he can't, it is just the
thing.
Not long after this debate, one was held on the
question,Whether woman was equal to man in
intellect? Bradshaw maintained the superiority
of man's, though he thought they were of a
different
order: that man's was like his frame, strong,
11*
towering, muscular,and that woman's was like
hers, delicate, yielding, graceful; that
she
expressed
best the thoughts that develope and
cultivate
the affections, and tell of their gentle
sympathies
and fond, dream-like hopesthat she best
controlled the youthful mind, and taught it, at her
knee, those duties which mould the after being,
and make it what God intended;that
he
expressed
best the dark and daring, and ambitious
emotions, those of power, of mastering passion in
a wayward naturethat he was meant to govern
his kind, as he had governed in all ages of the
world. He concluded by saying, woman had the
best heart and man the best head. Many of the
sex attended the debate, and Talbot was the
zealous
advocate not only of their equality, but, in
his zeal, and inspired by their presence, he
proclaimed
them superior to man, and pronounced a
high-wrought eulogium on them to that effect.
While he was speaking, Bradshaw wrote the
following
epigram on him, and handed it to
Cavendish
,
who was mischievous enough, when Talbot
took his seat, to read it aloud. It caused a great
laugh at Talbot's expense, and rankled in his
spirit.
EPIGRAM.
Talbot, proclaimer of great Nature's plan,
Announces woman, master of the man;
And says she came not as lone Adam's mate,
But, coming after, came to legislate.
Methinks I see him, in his proper station,
Tied to her apron strings of legislation;
Minding, with henpecked humbleness of mien,
The scolded dictates of the thundering queen
Giving to her his breeches and his vote,
And decked as woman, in her petticoat.
To save him from his lady's dread undoing,
Poor Jerry Sneak called loud on brother Bruin;
But Talbot, like the Grecian, loves to yield;
When stern Zantippe,
reigning
, took the field,
And from the upraised window hurled the shower
The sage looked up with blessings on her power.
That woman is your equal, who can doubt?
Sure, modest merit soon would find
that
out!
Alas! in your philanthropy of mind,
You make yourself a standard for mankind.
CHAPTER X.
Through
the winter, Bradshaw studied hard,
prepared himself diligently for the debates at his
society, and seldom listened to the voice of
pleasure
.
Miss Carlton remained in town during her
father's absence at Washington, where he was
attending to his congressional duties, or rather
writing home letters, franking papers and
packages
,
and endeavouring to find out not what was
the best measure, but what would take best; in
short, attending to the personal considerations of
a re-election. His daughter improved beyond all
rivalry in every mental and fashionable quality;
and, as she ripened into womanhood, her
loveliness
became more and more attractive and
dazzling
.
Mary had not yet come out; that is,
set up formally to visit and be visited.
Nevertheless
,
many were the students of law, young
merchants, and young men of fashion and fortune,
about town, who called to see her, and took
every
occasion to join her in her way to and from
school. Among the latter named gentlemen, who
employed their time in cultivating their whiskers
and propping up the posts at the corners of the
streets, was Mr. Bates, who might frequently be
seen lounging near the corner, by which she passed
in her way to school, waiting to escort her there.
Her way was through the court-house square,
where she would frequently meet Bradshaw, as he
passed to and from his boarding-house. Bradshaw
would hurry along with his cloak thrown carelessly
over his shoulder, often, in the coldest day, without
it; and though he would, apparently, be thinking
of any thing but the scene around him, as, in fact,
he generally was; yet he saw what was passing,
as might be known by his instant recognition of
any one whom he knew, however slightly. An
observer would have been struck with him, even
in passingthe quick, momentary, penetrating
glance he threw on every passer-byhis frank and
free salute to every friendthe respectful bow to
age, the graceful touch of the hat to every casual
acquaintanceand the urbanity and perfect ease
with which he would lift it to a lady, showed the
ease of practised courtesy, and the
self-sustainment
of self-respect. Whenever Miss Carlton met
Bradshaw, they always had something to say to
each other, much to the annoyance of Mr. Bates.
She would say, Remember, Clinton, you go to the
ball with me to-night; or, I have a letter from
your sister, and if you want to read it, you must
call and see me; or, I am going with the
Hollidays
to the theatre to-night, and I expect you for
a beau: as you know Mr. B so well, I like to
hear you criticise his acting, &c.
In a fit of jealousy against Bates, who was very
attentive to Miss Perry, as well as to Miss Carlton,
Selman had told Bradshaw of the conversation
concerning him, which he overheard between
Bates and Turnbull, at Mr. Perry's party. The
morning after Selman told him, Bradshaw met
Miss Carlton, as usual, with Mr. Bates by her side.
Good morning, Miss Carlton, said he, you
and I used to be schoolmates, you remember, and
we still go to school, though not together; I to the
law, and you to the Miss Copelay. Pray, how long
has
Miss
Bates been your school-mate?
This came so unexpectedly on Miss Carlton, and
was said in such a manner, that she could not
refrain
from laughing; and as she did not like her
present school-mate, she quickly replied,
About a month, sir.
All this was overheard by a number of young
men, who were stationed at the corner
acquaintances
of Mr. Bates. He was a very effeminate
fellow, and they bored him nearly to death with
it. It effectually stopped his gallantries to Miss
Carlton. Time rolled on. In the mean while,
Bradshaw had delivered several addresses before
different literary societies of the city, written a
series of numbers on politics for the press, which
were extensively noticed, and made many political
speeches at the town and ward meetings of the
people: he was becoming a great favourite with
all classes. Bradshaw was not yet admitted to the
bar, but he would often muse and speculate,
sometimes
with a melancholy, sometimes humorous
emotion
on the feelings and characters of his friends
and acquaintances, who were admitted and
waiting
for business, or who were on the eve of being
admitted. Every young lawyer, and particularly
the idle one, remembers his admittance to the bar,
and his first efforts. How vividly he recollects the
alternations of hope and fear, as he contemplated
the near and nearer approach of the day when he
is to stand before the committee appointed to
examine
him. At one moment he determines to put
a bold face on the matter, and dash right a-head.
At another, the ghost of his departed hours rise
up before him, and frighten him from all propriety
and all law. Sometimes, like the ghost of Banquo, it
will not down, and desperately he determines to
quit the law altogether. He thinks, over all the
law he has read, and deuce take it! he cannot
remember
a first principle. Certainly, certainly,
says he, my law, like Bob Acre's courage, oozed
from the end of my fingers, when I wrote that
note, requesting to be examined. I'd better quit
the law altogether, thinks he, for a momentmy
constitution can't stand it. `What! quit it,' says
Pride, `just on the eve of an examination? what
will the world say,' and if Pride should be
reconciled
to what the world would say, up starts
Poverty
with a peremptory, `You can't, sir.'
Poverty
is an absolute tyrant, even in a republic, and
must be obeyed. Then the poor student will
catch up first, one law book, and then another,
hastily glance over the first case that presents
itself, finds he knows nothing about itlooks
at anotherdon't know it. Well, I'll read it
through, I may be asked this very case. He reads
it for awhilecloses the bookglances his eye
upward
,
as if to scan futuritythen into the fire, as
though a cloud had passed over the ceiling, and
obscured
his visionjumps upbuttons his coat tight
over his heart, like one about to brave an eminent
periladjusts his neck-cloth, and walks hastily
out to meet his fellow students, and talk over the
characters of each and every member of the
committee
of examination. O, ye gray beards of the
profession! if ye have sins, they are then assuredly
remembered. If ye have the virtues of charity
and good humour, your want of legal knowledge
is called any thing but a fault; and the fact, that
you have never rejected a student, is remembered
while your consistency of character is eulogized.
The important hour arrives, another, and the
long agony is over. The next day, a pithy
advertisement
announces that  , Attorney
and Counsellor at Law, offers his professional
services
to the public; and it tells where his office is
to be found. That said office is designated by a well
painted piece of tin, which tells the twice-told tale
to the indifferent public,
ATTORNEY AND COUNSELLOR
AT LAW.
My gentleman thinks, at first, that he has the
world in a sling. He sits, installed in his
professional
chair, like the man in the `Arabian Nights,'
with his glass were before him, which it has taken his
last cent to purchase, and which he thinks he will
sell at great profit, and accumulate great wealth;
and how he will have a sultana at his feet, whom
he will indignantly spurn: he suits the action to the
word, and, lo! the glass ware flies into a thousand
fragments. Thus, too often dreams the young
lawyer
,
and thus to fragments fly his hopes: they die,
though, as our friends die, with a treacherous
promise
of returning health to-day, yet passing away,
to-morrow, to the clod and to the worm, followed
by others, and by others, till he standsalone!
At last, he volunteersall great men have
volunteered
:
Curran, Erskine, Pinckney, Webster,
Wirt, Clayand he determines to volunteer, too.
Now comes on a second trial, as nerve-rending as
the first: to manage the case, to examine and
cross-examine
the witness, to argue before the court the
point of law, and to address the jury. That which
he had looked to as the
summum bonum
of all his
youthful aspirations, is within his grasp; but it is
not as it seemed. He may fail! But, then, who
ever succeeded in his first effort? Curran
completely
failed. Erskine said he never could have
got on if he had not felt his wife and children
pulling
at his gown for bread; (I wish I had a wife
and children, for a moment thinks the new
attorney
,
and counsellor at law.) Sheridan failed, and
andbut, no matter,I'llI'llastonish the
natives
yet. In the mean time, as the copy-plate
says, I'll do my best, and leave the rest.
Bradshaw, in contemplating his admittance to
the bar, was not much disturbed by the feeling
above described, but he had the very temperament
to be thus disturbed, if he had spent his time in
idleness. He was singularly constituted: to a
sensitive
and imaginative mind, he added great energy
and action, a subtle knowledge of men, and a just
perception of facts. He understood the relative
situations
of men and things, without suffering his
Vol. I. 12
imagination to throw one of its rainbow tints across
the clear vision of his judgment. In him, genius
and common sense were combined. Whenever he
mingled in the world, in whatever scene he might
be, he was always studying character; and while
he had the sagacity to understand it, he had an
acute sensibility, which appreciated and
sympathized
with the emotions of every one, no matter
how dissimilar to his own. Though subject,
constitutionally
,
to great depression of spirits, by
keeping
his energies always alive and active, he
generally
dispelled them; and when gloomy views of
the world, and of himself, crossed him, he went
forth and mingled with the crowd, determined to
brace himself for every encounter. Being thrown,
by his early sickness, upon his own mental
resources
for amusement, he had endeavoured to
acquire
the philosopher's great precept, Know
thyself
.
He felt that he must keep over himself
over his passionsa strong guard; he felt this the
more, as he knew the watchman had sometimes
slept, or yielded to the allurements of the rioters
whom he should have quelled.
As we have observed, Bradshaw had a very
extensive
acquaintance, which was not confined to the
higher circles of society. At the political meetings,
he had become acquainted with men of every class;
with the keepers of the lowest groceries and
taverns
,
as well as with the highest, and he knew
their highest and lowest customers. In the large
city in which he lived, there was a criminal court,
exclusively for the city, in which offences of all
kinds were tried, and where there were, of course,
many criminals. In an election for mayor of the
city, a young man whom Bradshaw knew, had
committed an assault and battery, for which he
had been indicted. He came to Bradshaw, and
was very anxious that he would defend him.
I somehow feel, said the young man, that
you will do me better justice than any body else
and all my acquaintances advised me to come to
you.
Garson, I would defend you with the greatest
pleasure, said Bradshaw, but I have not yet
been admitted to the bar.
I wish to mercy you would be admitted, Mr.
Bradshaw, and defend me. They accuse me of
stabbing, which I never did. It will be a serious
business with me: my wife is troubled most to
death. What shall I pay you, sir?
You're a good client, said Bradshaw, smiling;
but wait till I have defended you. Call round
this afternoon, at three o'clock, and I'll tell you
whether
I can or not. If I cannot, I will recommend
you to a good lawyer.
Garson had scarcely left, when Cavendish
entered
the room.
Well, Cavendish, said Bradshaw, (Cavendish
had been admitted some time,) how comes on the
practice?
Toll, loll, said Cavendish: with hard
scratching
,
I shall manage to live and let live.
I believe, said Bradshaw, that I shall be
admitted
,
not to the civil court, but to the city
criminal
court. I mean to attend the lectures,
particularly
those on practice, again. The criminal
law is simple, and, I flatter myself, I understand it
as well as some of the gentlemen who practise it
though I may not have as great pretensions as they
have to being a
criminal
lawyer. However,
Garson
,
a young drayman, who thrashed a fellow who
interrupted me at a political meeting, one night,
has been indicted for stabbing a man. He wants
me to defend him, and I think, under the
circumstances
,
I ought to appear for him.
I think so, too, said Cavendish. All you
have to do, is to pass over to the court housethe
criminal court is now sittingand get some one to
suggest to the court that you wish to be admitted.
Old Price has the greatest kind of notion of you,
and he will appoint a committee on the spot. The
old fellow says that the court over which he
presides
is of as much more importance above the civil
court, of as much more importance (here
Cavendish
imitated the judge's peculiar manner) as are
men's lives and liberty of more importance to them
than their property.
Bradshaw entered the court, and had the
application
made. The court, on the instant, appointed
Mr. Shaffer to examine him. Mr. Shaffer was a
formal, yet, where he took a liking, a frank old
gentleman, with a great deal of eccentricity. He
possessed great tact and eloquence in defending
criminals. He was a gentleman of the old school
of the bar, a kind of legal antiquary, who retained
all the old habits. He still cultivated a queue and
powdered his hair; and, though very old, retained
his intellect, as might be seen in his quick
twinkling
gray eye.
I feel, your honour, that, in fulfilling this
duty, I shall lessen my own feesbut it gives me
pleasure, Mr. Bradshaw. Shall I now attend you,
sir?
Bradshaw left the court with Mr. Shaffer. As
they were leaving it, the old gentleman cut his eye
at him, and asked, Mr. Bradshaw, can you make
a glass of whisky-punch?
Yes, sir, said Bradshaw, and drink one, too,
if you will do me the honour of drinking with me.
Ah! exclaimed the old gentleman, then you
are qualifiedI will make out your certificate
quite qualified to be a lawyer, according to the
present method of making them.
Suppose we walk into the oyster house, that I
may prove my qualifications; and you will then, if
you please, sir, give me the certificate.
They entered the oyster house, or, to give the
establishment the title with which its owner
designated
it, the Court-House Restaurateur, where
Bradshaw proved to Mr. Shaffer that he was
doubly
qualified for admittance, and where the
veteran
showed that he was amply qualified to judge of
such qualifications.
Mr. Bradshaw, remarked Mr. Shaffer,
gladdening
over the memory of other days, while he
revived it, the times at this bar are not as they
used to be, sir; I never felt myself, sir, I never
felt myself since they tore down the old
court-house
,
and built this. To be sure, sir, the old one
was an old affair, it had none of the tinsel and
bedizzened finery of this, with your damask
drapery
over the judgment-seat, where the image of
12*
the goddess sits as her prototype swings over a
tavern door, and she hears just about as much
wrangling and brawling. This is a splendid affair
a splendid affair our new court-house. You
don't remember the old onegive me the splendid
eloquencethat's the kind of splendour for a
court room; and the old halls echoed it in my
young day. `When I was young, ah, woful when!'
as some one sings. Scott's character of Pleydel,
in his Guy ManneringI heard you speaking of
it in conversation the other day with the Judge
is just the fac simile of our lawyersI mean of
what our lawyers used to be, sir. In those days,
sir, the profession lived like men; yes, sir, like
gentlemen: they took their ease, sir, and they
attended to their business with a free and easy
spirit. They loved their wine, sir, and they
enjoyed
it. Why, Mr. Bradshaw, now-a-days, sir,
you must perceive it yourselfnow-a-days the
souls of our lawyers are wrapped up in speculations
and per centage: they have money to lend, sir, at
fifty per cent. interestand they care no more
for the dignity of the profession than if there was
not such a thing. No, sir, the spirit of chivalry
in our bar departed with the old court-house; and,
as we lawyers would say, sir, there was no animi
revertendi. Often, sir, often do I call up those
days; but they are becoming a bitter memory. I
stood upon the spot, the other day, where the old
court-house stood, and, like he who came to the
place of his birth, and asked for the friends of his
youth, Where are they? and echo answered and
said, Where are they? Thus I asked, Where are
the noble spirits of by-gone daysthe true
models
of what the profession should be? Echo's
was the only answer; and I felt a sense of
desolation
heavy on mesigns of dotage, I suppose
the present generation would tell me. It may
be, sir; it may be. I am an old bachelor, with
no kin nor kind, except an infirm brother, much
older than myself. I am the last of my race, as
a man and a lawyer`Who is there to mourn for
Logan? Not one.'
You mistake the feeling, indeed, sir, said
Bradshaw, touched with the old gentleman's
evident
emotion. The oak, that by its vital strength
has outlived its companions, braving many
winters
,
and spreading its leafy honours in many a
summer, is the noblest oak of them all. We seek
its patriarchal shade with reverence; and the wild
vine by, that would have crept, but for its
support
,
clings to it and towers.
Mr. Bradshaw, said Shaffer, his eye
glistening
,
I appreciate your sympathy with an old
man's regretsthat feeling which honours age,
sir, is a blessed one; no matter in whose person
it is honoured. I might read you a long lecture
upon our profession; but, sir, another time.
Remember
,
you must not forget to give old Nancy
a dollar or two on your admittance; she claims it,
sir, from all, and has, for these fifteen or twenty
years past, from every lawyer who is admitted.
I know but one man who ever refused; and that
was that fipenny-bit fellow, Scragsa sample of
your modern lawyers, Mr. Bradshaw. She
berated
Scrags so roundly for it, at every place she
met him, and treated him with such contempt
and derision, that I believe the fellow, gingerly
dog as he is, would give one hundred dollars to
escape the odium. Nancy has great popularity in
the class from which he gets many of his clients;
and she has lost him many a one by laughing, in
her rough way, at his pretensions, and telling tales,
which she has no qualms about inventing, or
rather
colouring, of his blunders in the practice.
I know her very well, sir; her care-for-nobody
manner and her shrewdness have often amused me,
said Bradshaw.
She is an odd fish, sir. To speak plainly, she
has been a harlot, is a hag, though she pretends to
be religious; and, I have no doubt, often feels so.
Nancy is good-natured, when unprovoked, and
generous
to the poor and miserable of her own class.
She has, withal, a great observation of character;
and she knows the private history, and the little
indiscretions of every member of the bar. As a
jockey would say, sir, she can strike the sore place
offend her, and she'll do it. For many years,
she has, every morning while the court sat, arranged
her table in the area, and sold cakes and apples.
When the old court stood, sir, she frequently made
her appearance there with a figure and finery
widely in contrast with her present appearance.
She was then, though none of the youngest, even
then, quite a good-looking woman, with a bright
eye, fine teeth, and a fair complexion. Since, she
has had the small-pox, has lost her teeth, and her
face is the very fac simile of an old saddle-cover.
I like to speculate upon character, sir; my
profession
has led me a great deal among mankind, when
they were moved by the deepest and darkest
emotions
.
I have discovered this, that many a one,
whom we would think, at first glance, entirely
depraved
,
often cherishes affections of the gentlest
and holiest character. Not only has Nancy good
points of character,some of the best,but she
had an affection for a drunken husband, a
worthless
dog in every respect, that was unsurpassed.
Nancy had been a camp girl, in the revolution.
She could tell as many tales of some of the British
officers, as she can of our bar, sir. Well, her
husband
deserted, and miraculously escaped, and she
with him. They settled here when the war was
over, and they lived near the old court-house.
When he would lay out o' nights, in his drunken
frolics, she would search the whole town for him:
it was then small, and could be searched. I
remember
her well, with the light in her hand,
looking
and inquiring after him. Well, sir, she found
him, one night, crushed to death, in the street: a
vehicle of some kind had passed over his neck. On
her own shoulders, unassisted, she took him home.
I have seen criminals, sir, on the eve of
condemnation
,
and on the eve of being executed, and I have
seen their relatives and friends with them, in every
variety of wobut I never saw deeper anguish
than that woman exhibited. I happened to meet
her bearing the body into her house. Yet she was,
at that very time, unfaithfulnotoriously so, to her
husband; and her unfaithfulness, it is said, caused
him to take to the bottleor, rather, was his
apology
for taking to it as often as he did. He would
drink, he said, any howbut Nancy's ways made
him drink more; for, though she did treat him well,
and take him out of the gutter, yet he knew where
the shoe pinched. Now, the dog knew just what
she was before he married her, but he would drink,
and wanted an apology. She, being more the
soldier
of the two, acted upon her own responsibility,
and sought no apology or justification for her
errors
.
Delighted at having a pleased listener, Mr.
Shaffer, who had a high respect for Bradshaw,
continued
Josey
is another character, sir: the old
fellow who sweeps out the court-roomhe has
followed
that vocation ten years, at least. Observe
the difference: Nancy knows every suitor and
every
witness who attends court; Josey about as many
as the first day he commenced to sweep it. Every
acquaintance that he makes, except with the judge,
lawyers, and a few otherswho, by some peculiar
circumstances, have impressed themselves upon his
memorypass from his recollection, as the
sweepings
pass from the hall, under his skilful broom.
There is quite a taking between old Josey and
Nancy. It amuses me often to see him, leaning
upon his broom, and her, with her hands poked into
her pockets, but with her head set back with an
air of other days, conversing together; Josey
The Lord be merciful to all his people! this is
a woful and wicked world! exclaimed Nancy, who,
at this moment, entered the Restaurateur, and
threw her basket of apples and cakes on the
table
,
with a total disregard to the fate of its
contents
;
so much so, that several of her best pippins
bounced out on to the floor, unnoticed. The
Lord have mercy upon us! this is a wicked world
high and low, rich and poor, are 'bout the same
so much alike as two pippins. Ay, here ye are,
Mr. Shaffer, and ye, young Mr. BradshawI put
the question to ye, tell me, can a judge take the
benefit?
What! the benefit of the act, Nancy? asked
Shaffer.
Yes, the benefit of the act, as ye call it;
getting
rid of yer debts by paying nothing,
exclaimed
Nancy.
Why, certainly, Nancy, why not? a judge has
no privilege from arrest, except when court sits.
A judge may go in debt, if people will trust him,
just as Judge Harper did; and he may take the
benefit, just as I am told the judge has.
Ay, the thing's donethe Lord love us. Well,
I just say this, that the judge has condemned many
a better man than he is himself.
Why, what's the matter, Nancy? is the Judge
your debtor? asked Shaffer. I have not seen
you so much moved since the olde timesince
the days of the old court.
None of yer ripping up old scores, Shaffer,
none of thatthe old court house is gone, and let
by-gones go with it; replied Nancy, indignantly.
But I am not thinking of myself, now. I am
thinking of old Josey Mulvanythe way he has
been treated, would rise up in judgment against a
saint, if a saint could act so like an unchristian
sinner. He is a lone man, as I am a lone
woman
;
many a weary day has he swept yer old
court house, or yer new one, I mean, to save a
little penny to keep his old age. And where is it?
I ask ye, where is it? gone to the prodigalities and
abominations of his honour's pleasuring. I'd give
my last apple for eggs to pelt him; a pretty Judge
to decide right between man and man, and to
spend the hard yearnings of a poor old man, trusted
to him for safe keeping.
How much money of Josey's had the Judge,
Nancy? asked Bradshaw.
How much! exclaimed Nancy, why, two
thousand and five dollars!hard yearnings, day
and night, wet and dry, hungry and coldjust by
the labour of his hands, and by the sweat of his
brow; for, Josey is not a man who can twist and
turn through the world, and pick up fips doing
nothing
,
till he raises dollars. It's sinfulthere is a
curse in God's providence for such treatment. He
looks just as if he thought nothinglike a man
sleepy with drinkthe heart's heavy when a man
looks that way. It's worse than a wake, it's worse
than a wake: a man had better be dead than have
nothing to live on. If he had so treated me, I be
bound I would have spurred up to him. I would
let him know a piece of my mind, before a full
court-house. Here is Josey, now. Come in, Josey,
and take a little comfort.
A small drap, if you please, Mr. Bunley, said
Josey, with a dejected look, advancing to the
bar.
If liquor is made for any thing, continued
Nancy
,
'tis for the comfortless. I used to tell my
husband
,
Jonathan LapeI called him Johnnysays I,
`Johnny, there's no 'casion for ye to drink so; ye've
got a good house over yer head(I was the
provider
,
as ye know, Shaffer)ye've got a good house
over yer head, and what for should ye drink?and
so perpetually, like the old sewer?'for Johnny was
a man who would drink any where, and any thing
that had drunkenness in it.`If,' says I, `ye feel a
little out of sorts(as a body, ye know, will feel)
take a little of the bestthe best can't hurt ye, but
don't drink like a hog in a swill tub. Ye know,
yerself Shaffer, that I was true and tender to
Johnny
.
I don't know that you were
true
, Nancy; I
thought you were tender, replied Shaffer.
Shaffer! she exclaimed, indignantly, cutting
her eye at Josey, to see if he observed the
emphasis
on
true;
on observing that he was engaged in
swallowing the brandy toddy, and did not; she
continued
,
mildlyYes, ye may well say, I was
tender
to him; for it was on my very door-sill, when
I was bearing his dead bodywoes meon these
old shouldersI didn't think he was dead then
I met yerself. An awful night I spentye left
me to raise some of the neighbours, Shaffer, and a
long, long time ye staidat least, it seemed so,
and I dared not leave him for fear he might come
to, and want helphe was stone dead. Here
Nancy suppressed her emotions for a moment, and
then continuedI defy the whole world to say
but that I buried him decently; and the first
money
that these hands yearnt, I paid old Philpot
fifty dollarsI done part in washingto put over
him a white marble tomb-stone, and ye yerself,
Shaffer, wrote the description, (inscription,) for me.
Vol. I. 13
I did, Nancy, said Shaffer; and he reached
his hand towards her basket, to take a chestnut,
which she observing, pushed close up to him,
saying,
Help yerself, Shaffer; ye're as welcome as the
blossoms in May.
How did this loss happen, Josey? inquired
Bradshaw.
Why, sir, replied Josey, I thought a judge
couldn't break; and folks kept talking and talking
agin the savings' bankso I told the judge one
day, when I was sweeping out, that I somehow
thought the bank was rickerty-likeand I axed
him if he would take care o' my money; he said
he would, and I gin it to himthat was next
Christmas come a year. This morning I was
belated
,
and I was jist a dusting round the insolents'
(insolvents) room, when the clark was reading
about the benefit of the act people, and I heard
the judge's nameI thought a judge couldn't take
the benefitand it was read off plain debtor to
Joseph Mulvany two thousand and five dollarsit
ought to have been two thousand and ten, for I
gave him five yesterdayI couldn't help calling
right out to know if that was me, and Mr. Blakely
said it wasthe brush fell naterally right out o'
my hand; and I don't know what's happened
since.
Don't be afraid of the drop, Josey, it can't
hurt ye; and come home and take a mouthful o'
warm dinner with me. Ye can leave yer lone bit
in the court till another time.
After taking a drop herself, Nancy and Josey
departed together to her house. For some time,
there had been a matrimonial engagement,
depending
between these two; and after they had
got to Nancy's house, and had dinner and a few
more drops of comfort, Nancy, between-whiles,
telling Josey of the hardships of the war, by way
of reconciling him to his misfortunes as evening
approached, said,
Now, Josey, I'll jist speak to you like a plain
honest woman. Yer situation at the court-house
being all alone in that ere big building at night,
and you getting old, was ventersomefor
afflictions
strike old people sometimes at onceand I
am old and loneso the word has been spoken
between
us, ye know, that we would come together.
Now, if yer two thousand and fiveor ten, it
ought to bedollars were safe, Josey, ye, yerself,
would have to axe for the time, and get the
license
.
But you mustn't go to that big building
to-night
ye'll
feel sad and awsomeif ye staid
here, folks would scandalize an old woman, and it
becomes us to nuss a good name: so, if ye e'en say
so, I'll jist step to the court afore it shuts, and get
the clark to make a license, and I'll stop in to
Parson Gowler's, and bring him along.
That evening, Nancy was made Mrs. Mulvany.
CHAPTER XI.
Bradshaw
appeared for Garson, made a very
able defence for him, and he was acquitted. This,
with his previous reputation as a speaker, and a
young man of great talents, threw him into a very
extensive criminal practice. He defended every
one who applied to him, from a petty larceny,
through all the grades of crime. In this way, he
became acquainted with almost every criminal, and
with every constable, watchman, and rioter in the
city.
One day, Jekyl called to see him, and invited
him to his wedding. I am going to be married,
said he, to-morrow evening. I have a shop of my
own now, as you know, and I am doing a pretty
good business.
How do you come on with that newspaper?
asked Bradshaw.
Why, I assist Branson in writing for it
occasionally
;
he thinks my plain way of scribbling, and
my being a mechanic, help it along with my
brother
mechanics. When I first wrote little pieces
for my own amusement, he looked over the
grammar
and punctuation; but since, I have applied
myself
hard in what leisure time I had, and I now can
write grammatically, I believe, and punctuate with
correctness. I attend strictly to my business through
the day, but at night, and on Sundays, I study close
and I have learned, while working in my shop,
to arrange my ideas, so that I can go home and
write them right off. I wish I had more time. I
improved myself the most when I was sick, and
staid at your father's. It was the happiest time of
my life. Rebecca, when we are married, will help
me on a good deal. She has some little money,
five hundred dollars, with which I can extend my
trade; and she makes these patent stocks, by which
she gets a good deal. I think I might buy out,
probably, Branson, in the Mechanics' Advocate.
I should like to do it. But it seems to me like
presumption
,
in taking the control of a paper. It is
only a weekly paper, to be sure, but it has a good
circulation among the mechanics, and they
generally
pay well; but I never could make it
fashionable
,
or get it among the merchants.
I'll tell you what it is, Jekyl, said Bradshaw;
think seriously on the subject. You can obtain
valuable correspondents, I know. There's
Willoughby
;
his sketches of Kentuck character are
admirable. Those pieces of his, published in the
Patriot, have been copied and praised every where.
I saw one of them, the other day, in an English
paper, and spoken of very highly. Cavendish is
always taking notes of the trials at court, and it
would give him the greatest pleasure to furnish
you with the leading cases. As for myself, why,
you know, if I can do any thing for you, I am
entirely
at your service, not only in the way of
scribbling
,
13*
but, if you are pushed to pay off your hands,
I could occasionally help you out. I obtain pretty
heavy fees from some of the rascals whom I defend.
I sometimes spend them in booksall sortssee
how I have stocked my libraryor in other ways,
which don't make me such a grateful returnand
if you would come and borrow it from me, and pay
it when you choosewhen it is convenientit
would do me a service, for I should study more
and feel better. Think well on it first, Jekyl, and
when you decideif you let me know some time
before you take holdI can obtain for you some
communications that may be of service to you. So
to-morrow night you are to be Benedict, the
married
man, hey? Well, I don't know when my turn
will come.
On the appointed evening, Bradshaw attended
the wedding, and was delighted with the
unsophisticated
character of the couple. He met there
many of Jekyl's friends, with whom he was very
popular. It was late when he left; and he stopped
at a grocery, kept by a celebrated
electioneering
character, near by, which made him very
late on his way home. It was a cloudy night; the
wind blew in gusts, and the lamps, not being well
protected from it, shed an uncertain beam, which
rendered objects indistinct and deceptive.
Sometimes
the wind would entirely subside, and the
flame of the lamp would be erect, shedding over
the pavement a steady track of light; but, in an
instant, objects would be so changed to the eye of
Bradshaw by the flying dust and flickering flame,
that he would fancy impediments in his way, and
turn to avoid a shadow. Having found some
difficulty
in passing up the Main Street, owing to
obstructions consequent upon laying and
repairing
the hydrant pipes, in that more public way,
Bradshaw took a round-about direction, and
entered
a more lonely and less respectable avenue.
Several outrages had been committed at this
period
upon passengers; and in the loneliness of the
place, and from its character, Bradshaw, though
courageous, felt that there was very little chance
of assistance, should he be beset. The night grew
darker, and the gusts of wind louder and more
frequentin the pauses of the gusts his steps
sounded along the streets without any
interruption
to their echoes. All at once a voice broke
forth from a by-street, leading into the one on
which he trod some ten or fifteen yards above
him; and, as he advanced, he heard a person, who
seemed to be a lad, say, Don't hold me so tight.
Some one replied, very gruffly, I know you
of old, you young rascal; you have escaped me
before, but you don't do it this time, by gad.
You think you've a right to set the town to rights,
do you? I've set it to rights, too, I can tell
you; this very night I made one of your fellows
feel this pantron, though he was a man, and had
stolen a genteel suit to play gentleman in.
I've been with nobody but Carnish, and big
Bob, to-night, replied the other; and the street
is as good for me as it is for you, though you be
a watchman.
Where is he now?
I don't know, was the reply.
If I get you into the jail once, I'll have it
poured into younow mind me. They say you
have been stealing, and to jail you go.
By this time the persons entered the street in
which Bradshaw was, at the moment he reached
the intersection. They proved to be a watchman
and a lad, both of whom Bradshaw recognised.
The watchman was a strong, athletic man, named
Johnson, who was known to be cruel, and at once
a coward and a bully, and vindictive in the
extreme
.
The boy was called Fritz, a notorious
character, and known to the police for his
viciousness
,
and a certain dash of wild justice and
magnanimity
which blazed out in his worst actions. He
had several times been indicted for assaults and
house-breakings; but he had always contrived to
escape, either by his own ingenuity or that of his
counsel. He possessed one striking virtue in the
eye of a lawyerhe always paid his fee: and if
he had no money to pay it at the time the
service
was rendered, his promise to pay was
religiously
kept. Bradshaw had twice appeared for
him, and had succeeded in getting him off; he
had a sort of liking for him.
Without letting Fritz know that he recognised
him, Bradshaw said to the watchman, Johnson,
how are you? I see you are a good officer.
Ay, lawyer, is that you, replied Johnson, in a
tone of assumed frankness, though it wanted the
real click. I expect I've got a case for you,
this fellow's been going the nag again. I suppose
you'll be for clearing him; though I hope you'll
and he spoke angrily, not think it necessary to
abuse me to do it, as you did before.
Why, Johnson, replied Bradshaw, you must
not blame me, my good fellow. I did what I could
for my client; and I puffed you up in another case
a sin for which I have yet to account; and let
me tell you, a much greater one than the other;
Fritz, how goes it? I see you're in durance vile.
Vile enough, sir, replied the boy; but I
didn't expect to see you down our way.
Bradshaw explained why he was there; and as
the watchmen led Fritz towards the watch-house,
which was precisely in his route, though many
squares off, he walked on with them. Johnson
was evidently displeased, and Fritz as evidently
pleased, that Bradshaw had joined them. The
accusation of theft, which Johnson had made
against the boy, had dashed him; for he inquired,
in an anxious tone, of Bradshaw, if he would be
his lawyer. Bradshaw replied that he would, and
was on the eve of lecturing him on his course of
life and its inevitable consequences, thinking it a
fit occasion to produce an impression upon him,
when he recollected that it would be of no use in
the presence of the watchman. They walked
along in silence for some time; Bradshaw had fallen
behind, and the watchman strode on before,
holding
the boy by the collar, and almost dragging him
along. After many steps in silence, Bradshaw heard
the watchman say, as if unconscious of their
presence
,
and speaking to himself, I had a dl of a
rough scrape along here before to-night.
What did you remark, Johnson? asked
Bradshaw
.
Nothing, replied the watchmen; only there
is a good many spats along here, by these lanes
and alleys; and I reckon, if this fellow, (shaking
Fritz) goes the voyage, there will be some less.
Here the watchman and his charge crossed a
narrow lane, which intersected the street.
Bradshaw
had fallen so far behind, that he did not
reach the crossing until they had passed it. He
heard footfalls, as he thought, approaching in the
lane, and, as he was about crossing it, he saw a
person start from under a door-way, as if he had
stepped from concealment, and he heard a voice
say,
Cor, hist! or Cornish! he could not
determine
which, we must save him before he gits
to the watch-house. A gust of wind caused the
lamp at the corner to waver, just as Bradshaw
stepped past it, and the form was lost in darkness.
He stopped for a moment to listen, and tried to
penetrate the shade, but in vain; he saw nor heard
no more, except the utterance of his own name
spoken, in a tone as if to inform another person
who he was.
Under all the circumstances,Fritz being his
client, the watchman a malicious fellow, who was,
perhaps, transcending his duty, Bradshaw did not
feel himself bound to communicate to him what he
had heard; for if he did, it might not prevent the
attempt at a rescue, and the watchman would
spring his rattle, and raise an excitement, which
might militate against Fritz on his trial. It, also,
would greatly have added to the unkindness of
the boy's treatment. Johnson hated Fritz for some
pranks of old, which he had played him, and he
only wanted the least colour of excuse to cloak his
revenge. Bradshaw determined to turn down the
next cross lane, that he might not be a witness of
the affray, if one should arise. He reflected
from the person at the corner naming him, that
he was known; and he thought it more than
probable
his presence would have no effect in
deterring
them from their designs. They knew him,
perhaps, to be Fritz's counsel, being his friends they
had most likely witnessed his trial, in which
Bradshaw
drew Johnson's character in no flattering
colours
,
and they of course believed him to be well
disposed toward his client, and no favourer of
Johnson
.
By this time they had reached the cross
street; and Bradshaw remarked, I go this way
so good night to you.
Fritz said, in a subdued voice, Good night, sir;
but don't forget me.
You know I will not, Fritz, said Bradshaw;
while Johnson remarked, Well, Lawyer, if you
will go that way, good night to you.
They parted, Bradshaw turning down the cross
lane. He pursued his way, thinking over the
characters
of the individuals whom he had just left.
Fritz, he fancied, under different circumstances
might have been all that was noble, while, thought
he, it would require all the regenerating influence
of Christianity, of which my father is so fond of
speaking, to make any thing of Johnson, but a low,
selfish, cunning knave.
Bradshaw determined, if he met Fritz's friends,
whom he thought he knew, though not by name,
to advise them against attempting his rescue. The
lane and the surrounding neighbourhood were filled
with persons of the lowest order, and of the most
depraved habits. Bradshaw was in their very
head quarters. However, on he went, regardless
of what might be the consequence. The lane,
though long, was lighted but by two lamps, placed
at either end: there had been one in the middle,
but it had been so often broken and replaced, that
at last not even the post was left by those who like
not the tell-tale glare. As Bradshaw approached
the place where it had stood, three men passed
him; he could distinguish that one of them had on a
cloak, and that all had clubs, but he could
discern
no more. One of them struck with his club
three times on the pavement as they passed, and
almost immediately afterwards, it was observed,
He's not one of us; he's a ruffled shirt fellow:
let's bring him to. Bradshaw felt that he was in
some danger, but he resolved, as the best means of
acting, to meet them as they turned to overtake
him.
Who are you? inquired one of them, very
roughly. A friend, if you give me no cause to be
your enemy, replied Bradshaw, in a calm, but
fearless tone.
It's Mr. Bradshaw, who was Fritz's
lawyer
,
whispered one of them to his companions,
which Bradshaw overheard.
I tell you what it is, boys, said Bradshaw; I
don't know who you are, and if I suspect truly
what you are after, I don't want to know, for if
you attack Johnson, you will only get yourselves
into troubleI may be compelled to be a witness
against youand you can't save Fritz.
Fritz! Fritz! in danger, exclaimed all of them
at once, we must save him, come what may.
From this, Bradshaw thought he discovered that
they were not the persons whose conversation he
had overheard at the corner. He, therefore, told
them the circumstance, knowing that, if they
thought Fritz had friends at hand to save him from
the clutches of Johnson, they would not follow after
him. He remarked, also, Boys, you had better
let it alone. I will do what I can for Fritz, and
you could not overtake them before they got to the
watch-house, or to that part of the city where
Johnson
could get speedy help, if you should attack
him.
You are in great danger, in being here, sir,
said one of them; for there has been a great fuss
in the lane to-night, and the boys are up, with the
devil in them.
I am in the middle of the stream, boys;
returning
is as bad as going on. What shall I do?
They conversed with each other apart, about,
as Bradshaw thought, giving him the word, as
they called it. One was in favour of giving it,
while the others strenuously opposed it.
But we must see him through, said one of the
opposers, for he helped Fritz out of two scrapes,
and, if he takes a lark's case in hand, he's true as
steelas if he took a king'sand he can just about
fan that dd states attorney out.
They came up to Bradshaw, and the one with
the cloak, assuming to be spokesman, said, We will
Vol. I. 14
walk with you to the end of what we call our
bounds, sir.
If you think that I am in danger, I will be
obliged to you, if you will, said Bradshaw.
Attended by these guardians, Bradshaw
proceeded
onward; the one with the cloak walking by his
side, and the others behind. They did not straggle
along in the reckless manner in which such
characters
generally deport themselves; but, on the
contrary
,
they walked like persons who had purposes and
reflections of a decided, perhaps, sombre cast.
Connecting
all this with the watchman's manner and
conversation, Bradshaw could not but think
something
serious had occurred. They walked on in
silence
,
till they heard foot-falls a-head of them, when
one of the two behind stepped before Bradshaw,
and joined the persons advancing. Some
conversation
took place between himself and them, and
he walked with them until they met Bradshaw;
when he took his place beside his comrade, and
the others passed on. The persons who passed
were three in number, and, as far as Bradshaw
could guess, in the almost total darkness that
surrounded
them, one was Fritz.
After a moment or two, Bradshaw broke silence,
by asking, What is the reason that the street is
so still? I have understood that there were fun and
frolic going on here at all hours.
Why, said the one beside him, there was a
ball here to-night, at Dean's, and one man, that
nobody knew, was dirked, and another clubbed
they pretended to be first-ratesthe watchmen
came down and there was a scattermentI
believe
,
one of the chaps quarrelled with the
watchman
the
boys soon got to covey.
Here a door opened, and a light streamed forth.
It occurred to Bradshaw, that his companion
with the cloak seemed anxious to avoid his
observation
;
for, as the light shone upon them, he stepped
back to those behind. The wind was blowing
furiously
:
in a moment, it died away, when a
startling
shriek was heard in the direction of the house
from which the light had appeared.
There was no fun in that holler, said one of
the boys. He had scarcely spoken, when a
voice, seemingly that of a woman, was heard,
apparently
,
in mortal difficulty, exclaiming, Oh, God,
are there none to help me! For mercy's sake, sir,
for mercy.
Boys! exclaimed Bradshaw, buttoning his
coat, I can't stand this, I must see what's the
matter. As he spoke, he ran towards the house.
Mr. Bradshaw, you had better not; something
will happen to you, exclaimed they all at once
but, unhearing or unheeding, Bradshaw rushed on:
he opened the street door of a mean frame house,
where he thought he heard the voice of distress,
and stopped to listen. In a moment, he heard
another cry, which seemed to be at his very ear.
He stepped hurriedly in, and fell, in consequence of
the floor being lower than the street. He started
to his feet, unhurt, and saw a light through a crack
of the door; as he advanced towards it, a voice said
in supplication, Indeed, I'm not what you take
me for.
Not what you take her for! exclaimed a
female
voice, tauntingly, She yells as if she was the
Virgin Mary, instead of the trull of any body.
Another
cry for help, and Bradshaw burst open the door
and sprang into the room. On the floor, in one
corner
,
shrinking from a ruffian, as if she would have
pressed herself through the wall, was a beautiful
girl, in the most fashionable attire, with her hair
loose upon her shoulders, and her bonnet off of her
head, but confined to her person by the string
holding it to her neck; her dress was disordered,
her cloak on the floor, and her whole appearance
and manner, but too plainly told her fears. In
another corner of the room was a bed, on which
were lying, with their tawdry finery on, two
women
whose characters a glance could read, and
who were, evidently, much intoxicated: by their
bed stood an old stained table, on which were a
light and a bottle of liquor. A fire burned on the
hearth, and was supplied with fuel from another
corner of the room, where a quantity of old barrel
staves, and shavings were scattered about. In the
opposite corner to that in which were the women,
was another bed. Standing over the girl, and
holding her by the wrist, was a ferocious-looking
ruffian, whom Bradshaw recognised in a moment,
as one who had been found guilty of stabbing a
man with intent to murder, and who had contrived
to escape from the officers, as they were taking
him to the jail late on the evening of his
condemnation
:
a reward of one hundred dollars had been
offered by the sheriff for his apprehension. He
had, just before Bradshaw entered, removed a wig
and pair of false whiskers from his head and face,
and was in the act of throwing them on the bed
when Bradshaw stood before him. He started, and
involuntarily attempted to replace themfinding
that he was seen, he mashed them in his hand,
and exclaimed, facing Bradshaw,
What do you want here?
I heard the cry for help, sir, as I was passing
by, said Bradshaw, and I came in to see what
was the matter.
Save me, for God's sake, sir, save me!
exclaimed
the girl, springing towards Bradshaw.
I have been misled here; I know not these
people
.
Not know me, Jane Durham! look at me
now
,
and know me, exclaimed the man.
She looked at him intently for a moment,
clasped her hands, and exclaimedMy God!
Henry Adams. But, sir, said she, wildly,
turning
to Bradshaw, I did not know him until this
momentand if I do, he has no claims upon me.
I am nothing to him. O, sir, if you love your
sister
if
you love your motherprotect me.
Do not be alarmedcertainly I will, said
Bradshaw.
Certainly you will!will you? exclaimed
Adams. What claims have you to her, sir? Is
she your w?
She is not, said Bradshaw; nor shall she
be yours, without her consent.
Go, you ruffle-shirted rascal! Begone!
leave that thing where you found her, or I'll
brain you.
The third word had scarcely passed the man's
14*
lips, ere Bradshaw rushed to the hearth, in which
some of the bricks were loose, seized one, and
hurled it at him. It missed him, just grazing his
head, and made a great hole in the plaster of the
wall where it struck. When Bradshaw moved to
the hearth, Adams thought that he was leaving
Jane Durham (the girl) through fear of him, and
he advanced, and again seized her. She shrieked
fearfully. Bradshaw caught up the part of a
hooppole
,
three feet in length, and thick, from the
rubbish
in the corner, and Adams had just time to
dodge his head, when the stick descended with
such force upon his shoulder as to fell him to the
ground.
Murder! murder! exclaimed Adams. Moll,
call the larks. Don't murder medon't murder
me.
Here one of the women staggered to a door in
the side of the wall, and the other leaped from
the bed, and, with a demoniac countenance and
the most horrible imprecations, advanced upon
Jane Durham. Bradshaw seized the woman by
the shoulder, and, with a violent shove, pushed
her into the heap of rubbish;at that very
moment, Adams, who had recovered his feet,
sprang and caught him by the throat. You
shall die the death! said Adams, as he pressed
him to the floor. Bradshaw's presence of mind,
on the instant, saved him. He seized Adams as
he fell under him, and, as if there were a posse
of watchmen at the door, called out, Come on,
Johnson; we have the prize! The ruffian let go
his grasp in a moment. Bradshaw, who wanted
him to run, still affected to hold him. They
struggled
an instant, when Adams broke away, and, with
the speed of thought, disappeared through the
door, up the stairway, where one of the women
had gone. Bradshaw caught up the girl's cloak;
threw it around her, and hurried her into the
street. They had scarcely proceeded ten steps,
when Adams, discovering the artifice which had
been practised by Bradshaw, mustered his
associates
,
who were rioting up stairs, and rushed out
in hot pursuit, determined on revenge. As soon
as Bradshaw heard them burst open the door, he
drew the girl into the skeleton of an old frame
building, whose windows, doors, and floors were
gone; and they hid from observation in the
angle
formed by the chimney. They had scarcely
placed themselves there, when the ruffians reached
the house.
Run on a-head, Joe, said Adams; Pete and
Blackey have gone the other way. May be,
continued he, to his companion, they've hid in
some of these old buildings. I'll kill 'em, by
hell, if I come across 'em.
Saying this, Adams entered the door. Come
on, said he, to his companion.
No, I won't, said the other, without a
light. If he's such a desperate chap as you say,
he'll blow a man's brains out, or dirk him, in the
dark.
Adams paused a moment; and then seeing part
of the white dress of the girl, spread, as it were,
against the wall, as she crouched into the corner,
he entered, with uplifted club, and, with all his
force, struck the dress within an inch of her head.
Just as Adams struck, Bradshaw, whose dark
dress prevented him from being seen, but who
could see the faint outline of his adversary's
person
between him and the door, grasped the
hooppole
,
which he still retained after the encounter
in the house, and dealt Adams such a fearful blow
over the head, that the ruffian fell senseless to the
ground, like a lump of lead, without uttering a
groan. Adams's companion, at the door, ran off,
without saying a word. Bradshaw put his hand
down, and felt the temples of Adams; finding that
he was perfectly senseless, he caught the hat from
his head, felt by his side for the club, and
whispered
the girl in a quick, low voiceTake off
your bonnet, and put on this hat. Courage!my
pretty girl, courage!our lives depend on it!
There, wrap your cloak round you. Don't let the
wind blow your cloak open, and show your white
dress. Here, take this club in your handcarry
it under your arm, as a watchman carries his
pontoon
.
If we meet them, don't you say one word;
but, if we get into a row, while I engage them, do
you escape.
O! don't leave me! don't leave me! said the
girl.
By this time they had stepped over Adams, and
entered the street. The wind still blew in wild
gusts, while, occasionally, it was still as a summer's
eve. Fortunately for Bradshaw and his charge, it
was darker than it had been; though the drifting
clouds occasionally permitted the star-light to
appear
.
Away before them, in the distance, they
saw the faint glimmering of the lamp, at the end
of the lane.
Don't put your arms through the arm-hole of
your cloakthey will discover you by your white
sleeves. Step as firmly as you can, continued
Bradshaw, in a whisper, as they walked on. Give
me that hat, and take mine: that covers your eyes,
and you can't see where you tread. No! no! give
me mine again: the rim is so narrow 'twill show
your curls, if a light should flash on us. No, no, I
must not let you take my arm; if they should meet
us, they will take us for dandies at once, and
attack
us.
They rapidly approached the lamp at the end
of the lane. As they advanced, though Bradshaw
could not hear steps, yet he knew there was some
one approaching, for, every now and then,
something
would obstruct the gleam of the light. All
was darkness and silence; not a light could be seen
from any of the houses, nor a voice heard.
Bradshaw
was satisfied that, if they got into any
difficulty
,
he must rely upon his personal strength, and
what stratagem he might practise; and he felt now
his perilous situation more than he had before.
The steps of persons advancing were now distinctly
heard.
Step firmly, my brave girlstep firmly, said
Bradshaw, in a quick whisper; and, when he got
within ear-shot of the approaching persons, he said,
in an angry, decided tone, that made the poor girl
at his elbow start, and grasp his armHere come
two other watchmen;we must turn back with
them, Johnson, and join the watchman above, and
catch that scoundrel and his gang: there's a
reward
offered for them. As soon as they heard
this, away they ran, cutting across the lane. One
was the fellow who ran away from the door when
Bradshaw knocked down Adams, and the other
was the person whom Adams had sent on to
overtake
Bradshaw. Bradshaw and his charge passed
on to the lamp in safety. He could not but smile,
as the light struck the beautiful features of the
girl, to behold the inappropriateness of the ruffian's
hat, with the delicate and chiselled outlines and
lady curls which it shaded; and then the club
under
her arm, and the masculine step which she
affected
,
contrasted strangely with the extreme
delicacy
of her form, and the fright and anguish upon
her countenance. Her face lighted up with a wild
gleam of joy, as they passed the light; but it was
succeeded by an expression, sad as the gloom of the
darkness that, in a moment more, encompassed
them. Bradshaw began to reflect, as he hurried
rapidly on, that, perhaps, he had killed Adams; and
that he had endangered his own life for a girl whose
character could hardly be goodfor one, at least,
of whom he knew nothingfor whom he had
acted
knight-errant, and was leading, he knew not
where. Well, thought he, be this girl who she
may, if she is frail, she is beautiful; and if she does
sell her favours, she has, at least, the right to
decide
who shall be purchaser. Besides, her great
distress was evident; and be that as it may, I would
have served the scoundrel right, who dared to use
such language to me, if I had killed him on the
spot.
As these thoughts passed rapidly through his
mind, Bradshaw conducted his charge on, and they
entered the street to which the lane led, and which
was parallel to the one where Bradshaw met
Johnson
and Fritz. The street on which they had
entered
led to the heart of the city, and to what is
not always characteristic of the hearts of things or
men, its most respectable part.
Bradshaw had just cheered the girl, and told
her they were out of danger; when, immediately
before them, as the stars twinkled forth, and the
gusts of wind ceased for a moment, they saw five
or six men standing in a strange silence.
What shall be done? said one of them, whose
voice Bradshaw thought was Johnson's, the
watchman's
;
these fellows have murdered the man!
shall we leave him till morning?
Leave him till morningno, that's against the
regulations; there is no place where we can put
him, and he must be taken to the watch-house.
Johnson, step up to the next lightthere's some
boxes thereyou can put one against the wall,
and get the light outshade it with your hand,
and bring it here, and let us see who he is.
A strange thrill ran through every nerve in
Bradshaw's body.
It's no use, said Johnson, to get the light. I
shall break my neck, may be, in getting on the
box.
Johnson, I don't know what's got in to you
to-night
,
said the other man. Here, some of you
hold his head up till I run for the light.
The man accordingly went. Let us cross over
to the other side, said the girl, and hurry on.
No, no, said Bradshaw, I want to see who
the man is. Bradshaw stepped up to the men,
just as the one who had gone for the light returned
with it. He recognised Johnson, and thought he
had not his usual officiousness. As the light shone
upon the faces of the by-standers, Johnson turned
and discovered Bradshaw.
Ah! Mr. Bradshaw, said he, this is a late
hour, I did not think you were such a bold rover.
There's danger in these places.
I've found it so, said Bradshaw, anxiously
pressing by Johnson to look upon the body. It
was that of a middle-aged man, as far as
Bradshaw
could see by the light, dressed in a new
suit; and he looked as if he were not a townsman.
The features were rough and pallid; and across
the right eyebrow there was a terrible gash. The
hair was matted with bloodthe eye glazedthe
muscles of the whole face relaxedthe mouth half
open, and the lip livid.
He's as cold as a wagon-tire. said the
watchman
who held the light. Who knows him?
Feel his pulse, said Bradshaw; and, as he
spoke, he stooped and felt it himself. He's not
dead; his pulse beats faintlyvery. You'd better
break up one of these boxes, form a litter, and
carry
him to the watch-house.
The watchman with the light, held it up to the
features of Bradshaw, to see who it was that had
the presumption to speak so authoritatively to the
guardians of the night; but, on discovering
Bradshaw
,
he saidYes, Lawyer, that'll be the best
way.
Jones, said Bradshaw, addressing him, step
here, one moment: let me say a word to you.
As Jones and Bradshaw walked apart, Johnson
approached close to them, seemingly with the most
intense anxiety to hear what Bradshaw was
communicating
.
Bradshaw told Jones that Adams was
up the alley, and advised him to go up and take
him, and get the reward.
But, can't you go with us to show us the
place, asked Jones.
I might, but for this person whom I defended
against him. How far must I escort you, my fair
ally?
Oh! Mr. Bradshaw, don't leave me, said she.
Cannot one of these watchmen see you home,
Miss? asked Jones.
Yes, yes, sir, any thing, if Mr. Bradshaw is
engaged
.
I'll see you home myself, my pretty ally, said
Bradshaw, come, take my arm and we will go.
Perhaps I should not wish him farther harm, as he
is, doubtless, hurt already; but he stabbed a man
under very aggravated circumstances, and his
conduct
to you shows that he deserves punishment
that he should not be permitted to go at large.
I don't want him hurt, said the girl, but, I
wish he was awayI don't like to be in the city
where he is. My God! there seems to be a
fatality
that dogs me like a blood hound. Those
women
,
those women on the bed! shall I ever be
what they are? Mr. Bradshaw, how shall I
express
my gratitude, and what is the gratitude of
one like me?
Vol. I. 15
Don't think of that, my fair ally. I declare,
you make a right good watchman. Which way
shall we turn?
This way, if you please, sir; I live in the two
story brick, in the lane, just above Mr.
Glassman's
.
Ah, just above Mr. Glassman's! Do you know
Mr. Glassman?
Yes, sir, said she, faintly.
He left town to-day, I believe?
Yes, sir, I believe he did.
Bradshaw was anxious to ask her concerning
the ruffian Adams, and how she came in the house;
and at the mention of Glassman's name, he felt a
much greater curiosity, but he refrained from
asking
any questions; as it was evident to him she
did not wish to speak of herself, and if questioned, in
the overflow of her feelings, she might tell
something
which she afterwards would regret having
revealedand farther, when Glassman was named,
it occurred to him, she might be so situated with
regard to that gentleman, that delicacy towards
him required he should not seek her confidence.
They soon passed the residence of Glassman, and
arrived at hers; she passed quickly up the steps
three in numbersupporting herself by the
railing
.
Walk in, sir, said she to Bradshaw.
Thank you, my fair ally, but 'tis late.
Do walk in one moment, sir, said she, till I
see that all is safe.
They found the door unlocked, and they walked
in togethershe threw the room door open; the
room was small, but elegantly furnished. It
contained
a sofa, a side-table,full of books,and a
piano: many beautiful pictures adorned the wall.
On the table burned a candle that glimmered in
the socket. Lying on the hearth-rug, before the
fire, asleep, was a black servant girl.
Phbe, exclaimed Jane Durham, pushing her
with her foot, Phbe, get up, get up.
The servant started, and seeing her mistress
with Adams' hat upon her head, she exclaimed,
thieves! lustily, taking her for a robber.
Don't you know me? said her mistress,
throwing
the hat on the floor.
Bless me, Miss Jane! Miss Jane Durham! said
the servant, clasping her hands togetherI've
been looking every where for you. I wondered,
and wondered. Oh! I've been so frightened. Here
she rubbed her eyes, and saw Bradshaw, she
started
,
looked at her mistress for a moment, and said
no more.
Shut the door, Phbe, said her mistress, and
hand Mr. Bradshaw some refreshments, from the
side-board in the next room. Will you take wine,
sir, or something stronger?
Bradshaw, who felt chilled and somewhat
exhausted
,
smiled, and said, he would take
something
strongerthe direction was, accordingly,
given to the servant
Bradshaw could now more closely and calmly
observe Miss Durham; she could not be twenty.
She was very beautiful, her features regular and
delicate, her eye dark and dazzling, and the
expression
of her countenance shifting and variable.
Her form corresponded with her features.
Bradshaw
could not but observe the beauty of her
hand, and the paleness of her brow, as she sat on
the sofa, and without looking in to the glass arranged
her hair. Her manner was forcedfor, while
adjusting
her curls, and conversing with Bradshaw,
she would gaze for a moment, thoughtfully
anxiously
and
then, by an effort, appear
self-possessed
and cheerful.
After partaking of some refreshment, Bradshaw
rose to depart.
May I hope to see you again, sir? said Miss
Durham, with rather a confused air.
Certainly, I anticipate that pleasure, my brave
and beautiful ally, said Bradshaw, shaking hands
with her, as he left the room. She followed him
to the front door, and said
Mr. Bradshaw, think of me as you may,be
what I may, my gratitude shall not be less pure or
less enduring.
Don't speak of that, don't speak of that. Good
night to you; and he pressed her hand once more,
and departed.
Well, thought Bradshaw, as his solitary step
echoed along the pavement, this is an adventure.
How that villain pressed my throat! With what
lightning-like rapidity one thinks, when in danger!
There is no doubt of it, excitement goes a great
way in developing mind. I thought of my whole
life, in an instant, when that villain sprang upon
me. Great revolutions call forth intellect. Why?
Not only because every thing is turned topsy turvy
then, but because, surrounded by peril, man's
ingenuity
and intellect are more activehe must
escape the dangers that continually threaten life and
limb,sagacity, like a sentinel on a watch-tower,
encompassed by the enemy, must not only be
wakeful
,
but ever watchful. A bonnie lassie, and
Glassman
!
How he reminds me of Sir Roger de Coverley
honest, where women are not concerned. Well,
this vice is a pleasant thing, but the responsibility
the responsibility.
15*
CHAPTER XII.
About
twelve o'clock the next day, as Bradshaw
was seated in his office, he heard a voice down
stairs, exclaiming, Bradshaw, where are ye,
man?
Here, Nancy; walk up.
Yer a pretty attorney and counsellor at law,
to have yer office up into a third story. Do ye
think, man, that the people will be pilgrimating up
to ye? Have ye got already to be a counsellor of
such importance?
No, Nancy, not exactly; I am not a counsellor
at all, yet.
Not a counsellor! What do ye mean? Ye have
paid me my feea five dollar bill, instead of a
oneScrags, that lump of meanness, refused that
and generous ye were. Ha'n't ye admitted yet?
Ye are funning. I have heard ye often plead.
Why, not to the civil court yet, Mrs.
Mulvaney
;
only to the criminal; and I was admitted
there to defend a friend of mine. I have no great
anxicty to begin the practice, until I know more
about it. I mean the civil practice.
Ye speak like a wise man, for a young one:
'Taint always the horse that's first entered that
wins the race.
You are right, Mrs. Mulvany.
Don't Mrs. Mulvany me, now, Bradshaw;
call me Nancy. Nancy, I may say, is my born
name; for I've had it all my born days. Mrs.
Mulvany
is well enough with folks that don't know
me. Not that I'm ashamed of Josey's name. It
would make any lone woman like me respectable.
But Nancy my first husband always called me,
and Nancy I like folks to call me; for sometimes a
voice seems like his, and it puts me in mind of
times long gone, when I was young, and my name
sounded to me, and most when Richard called it,
like a bird's note in spring time.
Nancy, you are sentimental this morning.
Sentimental! if ye mean, by that, high-flying
notions that don't turn out true, it's wrong to nuss
them. They come across all of us sometimes.
Bradshaw
,
do ye know the girl, Jane Durham?
Bradshaw smiled at the penetrating glance
Nancy cast on him, and said, I saw her last
night.
Did you never see her before last night?
Not that I remember of, yet it seems to me
that I have; but Nancy, must I undergo a cross
examination?
Not if it will criminate yerself, Bradshaw, as
ye lawyers say; but the poor girl is in a woful
trouble, and she thinks that ye can help her out.
She was a kind of crazy like this mornand she
called on yer name, but not like a poor thing in
histeriky fits, calls on a man that has misused
and deceived her. I ha'n't felt for a human cretur
so much for manys the day. She says that ye can
help her out of her trouble, and she wants to see
ye. Will ye go?
What's the matter with her, Nancy?
What's the matter!why, the poor thing's
accused
of murder, outright murder, and Johnson
the watchmanthe wretch!to treat a woman
sodragged her from her bed early this morn
before
Squire Bailley, and the Squire committed her
to prison. I met them as I was going to market
to get some of the best fruit,ye know if a body
don't go early, they can't get the bestand he was
dragging her on in a manner, that made me berate
him till he behaved more decenter. And, as I
knowed the poor girl, apples and every thing jest
went clean out o' my head, and I went with her.
She told the magistrate that ye could tell where
she was in the night? Johnson don't like yedoes
he?
I believe not, replied Bradshaw.
I jist saw as much, for he treated her worse
when she spoke of ye, and he wanted to drag her
all the way over to the jail. But I opened on
himand made him get a backand I paid for it
myself, and went with the poor thing to the jail.
I wanted to get the jailer, old Presley to do well
by her, and he would and wanted to, but Johnson
spoke so by her, that he locked her up in the
common
room. Johnson abused her for every thing.
The dark spot gathered on Bradshaw's brow till
it lowered with the fiercest passion, which Nancy
observing, remarked
Bradshaw, if the poor thing is any thing to ye,
if ye've ta'en her from Glassman and she's yer
mistress, as ye call it, yer bound to do by her.
Bradshaw here hastily explained to Nancy all
he knew of the girl, and of the events of the
previous
night, and askedWhat of her and
Glassman
?
Why, as ye know Glassman so well, Bradshaw,
being as yer so often with him, I thought ye knew
his character, but may be he did not like to tell a
young man, and a man kind and smooth-spoken,
and looking like ye, of such things. I bethought me,
when the girl spoke of ye, how ye stood. And as
I used to call to see her, and sell her apples, and
she never spoke of ye, I did not know what to
make of itbut when the heart's wrung, it says
what at other times it hides. Well, it's jest sois
it? Ye must do yer best for her, Bradshaw.
Assuredly I will, Nancy; but who is she accused
of murdering?who is she?where is Glassman?
Why, she is jest accused of murderinga man
inlane last night, I couldn't gather much of the
case afore the magistrate, only I know that
Johnson
swore hard agin her.
Did he swear that he saw the man stabbed by
her?
Yes! yes! he swore every thing.
Who is she, Nancy?
Why, she jist lives in the little brick above
Glassman's, in the lane. She is with Glassman.
She never told any thing about herselfand she
has such a way, that I never asked her. Though
she be `a mother, an' no wife,' as the ballad sings,
yet, I tell ye, there's many a wife that's worse.
Glassman's gone somewhere, on some spreeGod
only knows where. I expect the poor thing's been
inveigled to Dean's, by some way or other that she
didn't dream of. I've no trust in Johnson, and I
told him so, plump down. I didn't like the way he
acted, no how. But, Bradshaw, ye must go and
see the poor thing. It ain't best for a young man
to go on these missionsbut ye'd best go. Ye was
with her last night, and I promised, faithfully, to
send ye.
I'll go, at once, said Bradshaw. This is
pretty much of a mission for a young man like me,
as you say, Nancy. The girl is certainly
beautiful
,
and the impression haunts my mind that I have
seen her somewhere. Come, Nancy, suppose you
walk over.
No, I'd best not, honey; it's pretty much of a
walk, and ye'd best see her alone. She'll speak
more freely to ye. I'll go myself, this afternoon.
Poor thing! her trouble's sad to see and hear.
The jail was a considerable distance off, in the
outskirts of the city. A wall surrounded it, making
a large enclosure. In the jail lived the jailer, with
his family, consisting of a wife and three or four
children: one of them a grown girl, by a former
marriage, named Lucy. Bradshaw knew the jailer,
Job Presley, very well. Job, considering his
situation
,
which he had held for many years, was a very
kind-hearted fellow. He valued himself greatly on
his knowledge of human natur, as he pronounced
it, and was, also, in his own opinion, a great
politician
,
and acute in the law. Bradshaw understood
him exactly; and while most persons thought old
Job rough and unfeeling, the fit representative of his
profession, in all ages, (as, in fact, he seemed to
them,) Bradshaw appreciated him; and, as he loved
to study character, he would often stop at the jail
to see the prisoners, his clients, and to have a talk
with Job, and draw him out. Bradshaw also
delighted
to chat with his daughter Lucy, whose
guilelessness
and simplicity, he said, reminded him of
the flower blooming in the very shade of the Upas.
Lucy had seen and heard enough of vice to know
well of it; but it affected her heart no more than
would the perusal of the Koran affect the
Christian
,
who had already studied, understood, and been
profoundly penetrated by the truths of his Bible.
Job's apartments were in one corner of the jail,
and were kept as neat, by his tidy little wife, as if
they were rooms in a palace. She was a talkative
woman,as what woman is not?and somewhat
self-willed; but she was very kind to her
step-daughter
,
Lucy, and so they got on very well. Job was a
forbidding-looking man at first sight, and always so
to one who was not an observer. He was quite
neat in his dress, for a jailerfor, though his
clothing was coarse, and he wore a great jacket,
which almost covered his hips, into the pockets of
which he generally thrust his hands, yet he kept
his apparel scrupulously brushed. He was
standing
on the steps of the jailnot at the entrance to
his own rooms, but to the prisonlooking, through
the grated gate in the wall, out upon the few
passers-by
,
in the outskirts of the city. The wall was
as high as the second story of the jail, and the steps
on which Job stood were not fifteen feet from the
gate, and directly opposite to it. As soon as
Bradshaw
came up to the gate, they saw each other.
Job, said Bradshaw; how are you? Will you
let me in?
Certainly, Squire, and out whenever you choose,
and that's what I can't say to any one in these
walls, except to old Job Presley himself. So
speaking
,
he unlocked the little gate, that was imbodied
in the more ponderous one, and let Bradshaw in.
Bradshaw shook him cordially by the hand, and
Job proceeded, with his usual caution, to turn the
key.
Job, what news have you to-day? asked
Bradshaw. There's rather a stir to-day, sir?
There was a murder committed at Dean's, last
night, or somewhere about them lanes, and we've
got a pretty girl, a very pretty girl here, on the
charge, that don't seem used to these things. I'm
glad you've come: she said, she wanted to see you.
I expect it's a hard case. Johnson kind of persuaded
me she was a common thing, but I didn't believe
it, at the time. However, as he seemed to insist
upon it so, I thought I'd best be safe, and lock her
up with the rest. I asked Johnson if she was any
thing to you, and he said not. I never saw her
before
.
I know, from human natur, that she's not
used to these things.
By Jove! you're right, Job; as far as I can
gather from what I have heard, and know of her.
I'll apprenticeship myself to you some of these
days, to learn character.
Why, Mr. Bradshaw, said Job,
self-complacently
;
I've seen all sorts of characters in my
day. And I've studied them from a jail-bird to a
Governor; but I've seen the most of the worst kind,
and it's my candid opinion of the best kind that
they're not much to be trusted.
Job, I believe you're right. Come, my good
fellow, and let me see the girl. What kind of a
girl is she, Job?
Why, sir, as I may say, one of the
prettiest-looking
girls I ever saw. My daughter Lucy thought
well of her, and so did my wife; they're acute,
quite acute, in understanding woman character.
They now entered the jail. It had a great
hall through it, from which a flight of steps
ascended
to the upper stories. The thick oak floor,
the ponderous iron gratings and bars, the
handcuffs
and chains against the walls, all reminded one
forcibly of the locality. On either side of the hall,
strong doors led to the apartments of the prisoners.
Two doors secured each entrance; one was a grated
door, through which those of the prisoners who were
suffered to come out in the passage from their
wards or cellswhich were built on each side of it
could speak with the jailer, or such of their friends
as were permitted to see them. There were
different
cells for solitary confinement, and well
furnished
rooms for the gentleman debtor who
preferred
a suite of apartments, and was able to pay
for them. Below was the dungeon deep for the
irreclaimable
malefactor. Job himself led the way
to the room in which Jane Durham was confined.
As the keys turned in the locks of the passage door,
a loud laugh was heard from a room at the other
end of the passage. Job and Bradshaw entered the
Vol. I. 16
passage, and the careful jailer locked the door after
him. When they reached the door of the
apartment
in which the females were confined, four or
five squalid, haggard faces, some still bearing the
traces of beauty, appeared at the grate. They
gazed at Bradshaw intently, and one of them turned
quickly round, and in a tone that Bradshaw
overheard
,
said, Old Moll, here comes Job with her
chap, and he's a gentlemanyou'd better mind.
Let 'em come, replied a voice within. Old
Moll has had her day, too, and now she goes in for
the plunder.
Bradshaw and the jailer entered. There was a
fire in a stove in the middle of the room; the air was
confined and hot, and of such a noxious and
unwholesome
nature, that it seemed to have
contagion
in its very breath.
What have you got your stove so hot for?
exclaimed Job. Do you want to burn out all
your wood in the morning? What do you put your
meat in the stove, and leave it there, for? You'll
breed a fever!
While Job was speaking, Bradshaw looked round.
A woman, whom, at a glance, he recognised to be
the one, who, on the previous evening, sprang from
the bed at Jane Durham, when he rescued her
from Adams, and who was called old Moll, was
hastily
endeavouring to conceal something under her
mattress. On a mattress, beside Moll's, leaning on
her arm, with haggard look, and deshevelled hair,
stripped of her shawl, bonnet, and gown, and
endeavouring
to cover her neck and shoulders, with
a miserable, dirty and torn blanket, was Jane
Durham
.
Her look of utter destitution and wo struck
even old Job forcibly, accustomed as he was to such
scenes.
Who did that? Who stripped this young
woman
?
asked he, in a loud imperative voice, and
and with an angry look, that made even old Moll
start. The one that did it's got to be locked up
by herself, I can tell you that. O! no matter, sir,
said Jane Durham; she is welcome to it alllet
her stay here, sir, and keep allput me for God
sake in the cell, and not her. Oh, Mr. Bradshaw!
I'm undonea miserable forlorn and destitute
wretch. I sent for you, sir; but I've no claims on
youI've no means. You risked your life for me
last night, and knew me not. 'Twas kind in you
the great God will reward you. I'm innocent
I'm innocent of this charge! As sure as there is a
holy Providence above us, I am innocent of this
chargebut I am, indeed, a miserable wretch.
She fell upon the bed, and hid her head in the
blanket. A big tear stood on the iron cheek of old
Job, Bradshaw spoke nothe folded his arms,
while indignation seemed to predominate in his
feelings against Johnson first, and then against the
jailer for putting the girl in such a room. But a
moment's reflection curbed his anger against Job;
and when he saw the tear upon his cheek, he
forgot
it. Bradshaw knew that the only way to get
any favours for the poor girl was to manage Job;
and he left his office with the determination to do
so.
Job, said Bradshaw, that woman Moll has
the girl's clothes hid in her bed, there.
So she has, said Job. Mr. Bradshaw, you've
a quick eye, sir, and he advanced to Moll's bed, to
take the clothes.
Moll, with a face of unblushing effrontery,
exclaimed
,
They're mine! they're mine!the hussy
stole them from me last night; and
You lie! said Job; and seizing her, led her out
of the room to a cell. She made no resistance, as
she knew it was of no use. When Job left the
room with old Moll in charge, instinctively and
without reflection, he locked the door after him.
We've got a man among us what'll happen?
said one of the wretches, with a discordant laugh.
The others said nothing, but looked silently at
Bradshaw, doubtless with a wish to discover the
connexion existing between him and the girl.
Here, Miss Durham, said he, lifting her shawl
and gown from the bed of old Moll, and handing
them to her, arrange your dress; don't be alarmed,
you shall be removed from here.
Bradshaw spoke in a soothing tone, and as he
laid the shawl and gown on the foot of the bed, he
turned away that he might not observe her. The
women, wretches as they were, were struck with
his delicacy, and an involuntary respect seized
them.
Old Moll, who had been taken up by the
watchman
,
in the night, while they were in search of
Adams, as soon as Jane Durham was locked up
with them, took from her her bonnet, shawl, and
frock, and began abusing her in the most horrid
language, telling the women around, that Jane
Durham had come to her house, raised a fuss, and
made off with a fellow, after having stolen her
dresses and killed one of her friends. Moll made
Jane Durham bring her bed, and place it beside her
own, and, after taking Jane's bonnet, she amused
herself with reviling and tormenting her, much to
the gratification of most of the inmates of the room,
who took a hellish delight in witnessing the distress
of one so young and beautiful, enjoying the
anticipation
that she would soon be what they were. One
or two would have taken the poor girl's part, but
for their fear of old Mollthe hag, who was a
notorious
character, mocking them, if they even looked
commiseration, or refused to join in reviling and
taunting their prey. We cannot rehearse the
scene.
Job now returned, opened the door, and,
entering
the room, said, Squire, you must pardon
me; I am so much in the way of locking the door
after me, that I forgot you were in.
It's no matter, Job; I wished to remain. And
while Jane Durham was hurrying on her dress and
looking for her comb, to keep her hair from her
face, Bradshaw recounted to Job the events of the
previous evening, and all that he knew of her, with
regard to Glassman, remarking, Glassman is away,
I don't know where. I shall attend to her case,
if he does not; and, Job, you must move her out of
this place.
Yes, that must be done, sir: I hate to lock her
up in one of these cells, and I don't know where to
put her.
Job, said Bradshaw, you see the girl is young
and beautiful, and your knowledge of the world
16*
correctly told you at first, that she was not used
to these things. She's evidently modest, and any
man's daughter may be misled by a man like
Glassman
.
Yes, Squire, you're right, said Job. I
shouldn't ask Mr. Glassman to my house, humble
if it be. I have full confidence in Lucy, Squire,
but, Mr. Bradshaw, throw temptation in nobody's
way. Glassman's a bit of a rascal, I suspect, if he
is a great lawyer. But what shall we do with
this poor girl?
Job, there's no danger of her escaping. Haven't
you a room any where, that you could put her in?
I'll pay whatever it may cost. Have you no room
in your part of the house that would do?
Why, yes, said Job, I've got rooms in my
part of the house, as you saybut it's a movement
I never made before, and I've been jailer here six
yearsand then there's my familymy wife.
Oh! I don't think your wife will object to it,
Job.
Mr. Bradshaw, said Job, quickly, I am
master
in my own house; but still the women have
their rights. The girl spoke to my wife and Lucy,
and they wanted me to put her somewhere else,
and not lock her up here in the common room, but
Johnson over-persuaded me. It ain't that I think
the girl will hurt my family, but I don't know who
she is exactly; and the most knowing men may be
mistaken in human natur.
That's true, Job; but, I hardly think you are
mistaken in this case?
Well, Squire, I don't think I am. Let's take
the poor girl out into my office, and I'll see my
wife and Lucy, and see what can be done.
The women looked on in amazement, to see old
Job show so much feeling. The three left the
room. Job, as usual, locked the door, and tried it
with great care, and then led the way to his office,
where he and Bradshaw left the girl, and
proceeded
to the part of the jail in which his family
were. Jane Durham felt a relief, that almost
made her cheerful; she had overheard most of the
conversation between Job and Bradshaw; she felt
that they took an interest in her, and Bradshaw's
kind attention, and his service to her the previous
evening, led her to believe that she was not
altogether
friendless. Bradshaw and Job had scarcely
proceeded ten steps, when Job observed,master,
though he boasted himself in his own family,
Mr. Bradshaw, I wish you would go on and speak
to my wife and Lucy about this poor girl.
Women
have their rights, you know, Mr. Bradshaw?
You can explain all of it, to put their minds to rest,
as to what she is, and I'll go and bring her along;
she has a mighty pleading look, and then, she's
monstrous pretty.
Well, thought Bradshaw, this is speedier done
than I thought it would be. No bail allowed on a
charge of murder? I don't believe she has
committed
any murder. There's something wrong in
JohnsonI'll come across him like a flash of
lightning
,
some of these days, the scoundrel. Better
get the girl in Job's family, if I can, than have to
manage with Bailley, the magistrate, or have a
sitting
of the judges on a question of bail. Besides,
what bail could she get? there's no bail in murder.
If I could manage it, I would have to be bail
myself
couldn't
beI've not the property. Besides,
if the girl is kept here, and where Job's family can,
occasionally, see her, it will have a good effect
upon her. I must manage to see Glassman.
There's one thing certain, there'll be all sorts of
tales flying all over town about me. Well, let
them fly. The girl is most beautiful. The
mental
agony that she has suffered! There is a sin
registered against her betrayer, deep as the mark
upon the brow of Cain! Can he be Glassman?
With these and similar reflections, passing like
lighting through his mind, much more rapidly
than we have recounted them, Bradshaw entered
the apartments of Job's family.
Miss Lucy, my jaileress of hearts, how do you
do to-day? Where is your mother, and how is
she?
O! Mr. Bradshaw, is that you, sir? Walk in,
exclaimed Lucy, ceasing her occupation of
rocking
the cradle, in which she appeared mechanically
engaged, with her knitting, untouched in her lap.
Mother's well, she's gone up stairs a minute.
Lucy, what were you thinking about, so
earnestly
?
About a poor girl, sir; who was brought in
to-day
,
accused of murder; my heavens! O! she is
so beautiful, sir, and so sorrowful. I don't believe
she is any more guilty, than that sleeping baby.
I never felt so bad before, for any body. Daddy
didn't want to put her among the other people
but Johnson, the watchman, insisted it was best.
The poor thing, sir, said she knew you. And
Lucy gazed earnestly at Bradshaw.
The wife of the jailer, at this moment, entered
the room.
Good morning, Mr. Bradshaw, said she; I
thought I knew your voice. Lucy was telling
you about the girl this morning. She said she
knew you; (a look, keener than Lucy's,
accompanied
this remark of the worthy Mrs. Presley.)
She's very pretty, and, indeed, I am sorry for
her.
Here Bradshaw recounted to the jailer's wife
and daughter, in his eloquent and powerful
manner
,
the whole scene of the night; and, also, the
situation of Jane Durham in the jail. He told
Mrs. Presley that her husband wanted to put her
in one of the rooms of their establishment; (here
the jailer's wife bridled.) But, continued
Bradshaw, your husband and myself thought I
had better tell you the circumstances, and ask
your advice, and how you felt on the subject.
Yes, observed Mrs. Presley, with a smile;
I thought she was wronged when I first saw
her.
So your husband told me, madam, remarked
Bradshaw. He said that you saw instantly she
was a different being from those he locked up.
He observed, that women understood women
much better than men.
You may well say that, Mr. Bradshaw. Let
me see, there is the room just beside us, that opens
into this; we can lock the door that opens into the
yard, and she can have thatthere's a bed and
chairs in it; not so good as she has been used to,
may bebut people can't always choose. She
can stay there a spell, and if we like her, and
there is no objection made, she can put what
furniture
in it she wants, if she turns out what we
think her.
After paying a compliment to their kind
feelings
,
which Mrs. Presley received, consciously,
and Lucy, blushingly, Bradshaw left them, to find
Job and Jane Durham.
As Bradshaw approached the jailer's room, he
heard old Job, in a high key, speaking to some one,
who, by the voice, he recognised, instantly, to be
the lawyer who refused to pay Nancy her fee.
I tell you what it is, Mr. Scrags, said Job,
the thing can't be done, sir. The man is in for
counterfeiting, Mr. Scrags, and he's been in
before
for robberyhe's a great jail-bird; and it's
against human natur, standing as I do, jailer of
this establishment, to take the irons off of that
man, much less to give him the freedom of the
passage without his irons, and no report from the
doctor that he's sick, and no word
I'll get you word from the sheriff, and be
dd to your human
natur
, as you call it, said
Scrags, angrily.
Well, Mr. Scrags, replied the jailer, you
may damn human natur just as much as you
choose, it's all one to me; though a man may just
say, that if human natur's damned, the whole lot
of us is gone, that's all. But, Mr. Scrags, when
the order from the sheriff comes, the order is to
be thought on. By an act of the session of the
general assembly before last, I believe it's in
the eighth volume of the statutes,I know it's
in the pamphlet of rules for the government
of the jail,it is enacted and provided, that
there shall be trustees appinted to look into the
affairs of the jailand they must look into the
affairs of the sheriff, too, with respect to the jail.
And
Ha! ha! ha! roared Scrags, half in jest and
half in anger. Job, you had better turn lawyer
at once, and commence business. I have no doubt
that the whole bar will take you in at consultation,
and every litigant will employ you. Ha! ha!
Job Presley, Esq., attorney at law. Ha! ha!
good!
They might employ a worse man, Mr. Scrags,
and not go far, exclaimed the offended Job.
I have no doubt of it, Job, said Scrags.
From your intimacy with criminals you've
learned the criminal law, and, with rascally
debtors
,
the civil lawhey!
My manners, sir, said Job, if you allude
to that, (for with all Job's boasted knowledge of
the law, he did not understand the distinction
between
civil and criminal law,) are just what God
gave me, and never put on to serve a purpose;
and, as for my criminal information, I got that
from the lawyers who come here to get tender
mercies showed to their clientsget their
legirons
offso that they may give leg-bail to Job
Presley some dark night. Then I shall be in the
right trim for studying the law, which you
advise
,
Mr. Scrags; as my discharge, as jailer, would
leave me nothing to do.
Scrags felt that he was wrong. He was on the
eve of damning old Job for a scoundrel,
notwithstanding
;
but he reflected that he might finesse
with the jailer some other time,so he forced a
laugh, and departed.
Mean while, Bradshaw had entered Job's
office
,
where Jane Durham sat in the corner, with
her head bowed down, and her veil drawn over
her face. He was about speaking to her, when
Job, who had stepped out during his altercation
with Scrags, returned. Wiping the perspiration
from his forehead, Job remarked
That Scrags needn't think to circumvent me.
He can't do it. Take the irons off of that jail
breaking fellow, hey! and give him the liberty
of the passage! He'd be off before you could
say Jack Robinson; but not before Mr. Scrags
had been paid for advising me to take the irons
off of him.
Why, Job, said Bradshaw, you came out
upon him in style.
Now, didn't I, Squire? When a man
pretends
to be a gentleman, why, says I, let him be
a gentleman; and when he's a rogue, let him be
a rogue. Kitely that died,the mail robber,
you didn't know him, Mr. Bradshaw, did you?
YesI believe I did, replied Bradshaw; a
good-looking fellow that died here a year ago.
The very same, replied Job. He died of a
putrid fever; and one night, when he was very bad,
I watched with him. It was the morning before he
died: a man, you know, sometimes seems to get
better
just afore he dies. Well, I somehow liked him,
and I set up with him. It was about midnight. I didn't
hear a single chain more in the whole jail. Kitely
and I got to talking confidential. He told me he
did not think he would live; and, as I'd done a
favour
to him, he'd tell me something. About a week
before he was taken sick, I had taken the irons all
off of him, because Scrags asked it, and he
complained
.
What do you think,it's as true as you
set there, Mr. Bradshaw,Kitely told me that he
had given Scrags one thousand dollars to get the
irons taken off of him, and to furnish him with a
file, and implements to get out. He told me just
to move his bed a little, and I could see the hole
he had dug, before he got sick. Sure enough, I
moved the bed, with him on it, and there was the
hole. Laying on the wet earth, that he had
crammed in his bed, made him sick. I turned to
ask him more questions, when he fumbled at his
bed head a minute, and brought out a purse. `I
saved this from him,' said he, in a trembling voice,
`he got all but thishe was a traitorhe brought
a letter into me from a friendhe didn't know what
was in it.' Here poor Kitely, said Job, had to
lay back and gasp for breath: he raised himself
upon his arm and went on`He didn't know what
was in it. The letter told me that if I escaped,
Scrags had got my friend to promise that he would
receive me and secrete me; and when the reward
was offered for my apprehension, he was to betray
Vol. I. 17
me, and Scrags and him was to share the reward.
I sent for Scrags, yesterday, hoping that he would
come to see me. If he had, and there had been
strength enough in me, I'd stabbed him to the heart.'
Them was his very words, Mr. Bradshawhis very
words; and he stretched out his hand, with the
purse in it, and he said`Yes, Job, I've saved this
from him,take it, Job, and give it to your
daughter
Lucy, the day she gets married, or any day you
like. There's no ill luck in it, JobI came
honestly
by it, as I am a dying man. Give it to your
daughter Lucy, Jobshe'll save this jail, as long as
she lives in it, from God's curse. Give it to her
I wish it was a million. I heard her persuading
you to move me from here, when I was first taken;
but I would not be moved, because I'd be
discovered
.
She has sent me every thing to tempt a
sick man's palate; and, day by day, she asks me,
through my window there, that looks out into the
yard, how I am, with a voice that sounds like an
angel's.' Yes, said Job, with deep emotion, his
very words; and he put the puss into my hand, and
pressed it, and fell back deadcold and clammy as
the clay under him. But, what was I talking
about? continued Job, rubbing his hand through
his hair. Mr. Bradshaw, did you speak to my
wife and Lucy consarning this young woman?
Yes, said Bradshaw. Your wife, Job, likes
your idea, and so does Lucy. Miss Durham, said
Bradshaw, addressing her, I will call and see you
this afternoon, when you are more self-possessed.
Don't be alarmed: Job will treat you kindly. Make
up your mind how much you can tell me of your
case. Think over the whole case. Here's Mrs.
Presley and Lucy. Good bye.
Jane Durham burst into tears as Bradshaw
departed
.
Lucy and her mother led her to their
rooms. Old Job went with Bradshaw to the gate,
to let him out.
Mr. Bradshaw, said Job, don't tell to any one
the case ofpoor Scrags and Kitely, that I told
you. I've never told it to mortal man before. It's
no use, you knowScrag's word would be taken
before mine; and then, if it was not, who would
believe Kitely? Scrags would say. I've felt all
unhinged to-day, ever since I saw that poor girl in
the room. All at once, it came over me, suppose
Lucy should be so placed. It's wrongI know it's
wrong, for a man to have these kind of feelings, like
a woman. This is the first time I've had 'em since
Kitely died, and that's a year gone.
CHAPTER XIII.
When
Bradshaw left the jail, he resolved to call,
in his way home, at the office of the Squire,
Bailley
,
who committed Jane Durham, and learn from
him the testimony against her. The more he saw
of her, the more deeply interested he became in
her case, and the stronger became his conviction
that she was more sinned against than sinning.
Johnson's conduct satisfied him that there was some
foul play. Nancy had observed Johnson's anxiety
to commit her to jailthe jailer's account farther
proved it; and, connecting this with what
Bradshaw
,
himself, marked in his conduct, when he met
him and Fritz, and, also, when standing by the body
of the murdered man, he felt convinced that the
watchman had a mysterious agency in the affair of
the night. For his enmity to himself, Bradshaw
could easily account. He had, as we have already
observed, severely commented on Johnson's conduct
in a certain trial, before a crowded court, and in a
manner that one of the watchman's temper could
neither forget nor forgive. And then Glassman
Glassman always appeared, in his mind's eye, when
he thought of Jane Durham. I must find
Glassman
,
thought he: no one seems to know what
has become of him; but I'll speak to the
magistrate
;
and this afternoon I will learn from the girl,
herself, the real facts. The office of the
magistrate
lay directly in Bradshaw's way to his own
office
.
He entered it, and found him within, seated
at his table, behind a railing, constructed for the
purpose of keeping the curious crowd at a proper
distance from the magisterial person. Familiarity
begets contempt, says the proverb, of which Mr.
Bailley had thought, as well as of the safety of his
books and papers, when he ordered the railing to
be made. Around the stove, within the railing,
were several constables, cussing and discussing
the police affairs of the day with the representative
of justice. The subject of conversation, when
Bradshaw entered, was the murder, and the arrest
of Jane Durham. Jones, the watchman, whom our
readers remember went for the light, when
Johnson
refused, was saying
It's a strange kind of a business to meit's mixed
up so that I can neither make head nor tail out of
it. Johnson swears here this morning, that when
he heard a rumpus in at Dean's he rushed in, and
saw the girl give a knife to one of the fellows, and
tell him to kill the rascal if he wanted her to think
well of him. The fellow took the knife, yet neither
of these chaps that's been arrested does Johnson
swear to as being the man; but he says he would
know the man, if he saw him. Mr. Bradshaw, good
morning, sir;and Jones advanced to Bradshaw,
and they stepped aside.
Jones, how did you come on last night?
inquired
Bradshaw.
17*
Badly, Squire, badly,we went up the lane,
to the house you told me of. We couldn't get
lights for some time. We found old Moll there
drunk, and she said she had none; and when we
did get 'em, the wind blew them out; howsomever,
we lit 'em again; but by the time we got 'em in
again, the bird, if he was there, had put. One of
the fellows told me, who is a kind of a half stool
pigeon
,
that he was much hurt; but that he had been
carried off. We had to give it up: the murder
and the fuss before had made them keen of scent.
But we're going to-night, a whole posse of us, to
see if we can't catch him.
I've a great mind to go with you, said
Bradshaw
,
reflecting that if he did, he might elicit
something
in the case of Jane Durham.
Squire, you would do us a mighty service, if
you only would, said Jones.
What time do you go?
Not before eleven o'clock. If they should see
us prying about there while they were stirring,
they'd pass the word, and we shouldn't see hide
nor hair of em.
But had you not better go in the day time. If
he is hurt very much, you may find him stowed
away somewhere; or you could, at least, reconnoitre
the premises.
Yes, that's true, said Jones; but we know
the whole premises; and night's the best time to
find 'em, for they'll be drinking and carousing round,
and be off their guard.
Well, said Bradshaw, I will go with you.
Shall we call round at your office, sir?
No, I'll stop in at the watch-house. Jones, what
is the testimony against the girl?
Why, Squire, bilious, very bilious. Johnson
swears that he saw her give a knife to some fellow,
but the fellow's not found.
Where's the man?
He's round at D's Hotel. We took him
there from the watch-house this morning. We found
out who he ishis name is Samson Carpenter.
He is, they say, from the country.
He's not dead yet, then?
He wasn't this morning, sir, though he has
never spoken a word. He breathes very hard.
He can't stand it long.
Here a watchman entered, and said Carpenter
had died.
Where was he hurt?
A deep gash on the head, sir?
But is he stabbed?
I don't know, sir. I just helped to carry him
to the watch-house last night, and then I went
after
that Henry Adams, and left him with Johnson
and the rest. The man that was hurt had a friend
with him: he appeared here to-day, and gave in
his testimony, and, I believe, he had some business
he couldn't put off; so he gave security for his
appearance
,
and left town. The court, you know,
commences next month.
Yes. What was his testimony?
The watchman could not say, and Bradshaw
turned to the magistrate, to inquire. Mr. Bailley
told him little more than he had previously learned.
Johnson swore positively, that he saw Jane
Durham
give the dagger to one of the boys, and make
the remark alleged. The friend of Carpenter,
whose name was Lowry, the magistrate informed
Bradshaw, swore, that a girl at Dean's had
quarrelled
with Carpenter, and threatened him; but he
could not say whether Jane Durham was the girl
or not. And Johnson said, continued the
magistrate
,
that old Moll would swear most positively,
she saw the girl, Jane Durham, stab Carpenter.
How can that be, said Bradshaw, when
Johnson
has already sworn that he saw the girl give the
knife to one of the boys, expressing the desire that
he would kill him?
Why, Mr. Bradshaw, said Bailley, I
committed
her finally, to await the sitting of the court;
I cannot properly hear the case, can I?
Bailley misunderstood Bradshaw's interest in Jane
Durham, as did every one, except those to whom
he had explained the events of the night, and very
naturally.
These things, you know, said Bradshaw, in
answer, are never very formally done; and if any
thing very favourable to the girl should transpire,
you would certainly have no objection to hear and
act upon it.
A sudden thought struck Bradshaw, and he left
the magistrate's hastily, to put it into execution;
namely, to ask Job not to let Johnson, the
watchman
,
go to old Moll's cell unaccompanied, for he
could not but think, that his evident malice
towards
himself and the girl, would induce him to
prompt old Moll to mischief; which, from what he
had seen of her character, and conduct to the girl,
he believed would be an easy matter.
Bradshaw had scarcely advanced three steps
from the door, when he saw before him, coming
directly to the magistrate's, Johnson, with old Moll.
His first impulse, was to warn Johnson that he was
aware of his conduct; but, upon second thought,
he resolved to meet him as if he had not the least
suspicion of him. Bradshaw stopped until Johnson
reached the spot where he stood: when the
watchman
saw Bradshaw, he started, and seemed
anxious
to avoid being seen; but he rallied, and said,
Squire, so you know we caught the girl who
committed the murder last night. I took her to
the jail this morning. Job tells me you got him to
be kind to her. If I had known your feelings, I
might have treated her better; but here's old Moll,
who saw her stab the man.
Yes, said old Moll, you may cut up rowdy
tricks in my house, and kill people for her, but you
can't save her neck, neither; and if you had killed
me, when you shoved me into the corner, you
couldn't have saved your own, without her false
swearing. But my time's come.
Johnson frowned, and shook his head at the hag,
as she spoke.
Yes, my time's come; the day's been when I
was better than her; and the day'll be when she's
worse than old Moll; ha, ha! What I saw I'll
swear to; you'll have to speak hard, to save her,
though you have a glib tongue.
Bradshaw said nothing, but followed Moll and
Johnson into the Squire's. Old Moll, Bradshaw
soon discovered, was intoxicated: Johnson was
irresolute
.
Bradshaw's presence seemed to produce
an effect on him which he could not throw off.
The magistrate asked him twice what he wanted,
before he answered, by saying
This woman will prove, sir, that the girl
you committed this morning, stabbed the man,
and
Yes, said old Moll, stepping up to the
magistrate
,
I'll swear to it, pint blankhand me
the book. I saw her stab the man at Dean's.
The magistrate looked at Bradshaw,
inquiringly
.
I have no objection, said Bradshaw; you
may as well examine herthough the girl should
be here.
Moll, you've been drinking, said the
magistrate
.
Who gave you drink?
I gave it to myself, said Moll.
That's a lie, said Jones, the watchman, for
when I took you to the jail this morning, you had
no money.
I gave her something to drink, said
Johnson
,
quickly, as we came along. May be she
had not best be examined. I didn't think 'twould
harm her. Shall I take her back, sir? said he,
to the magistrate.
We might as well hear what she has to say,
said Bradshaw, to the magistrate.
The greasy Bible, that so many profane lips had
kissed, was now presented, perhaps, to the
profanest
of all. Supporting herself against the
railing
,
with one hand, while with the other she
raised the book to her lips, old Moll took the
oath, and, with a toss of the head, faced
Bradshaw
,
who had seated himself carelessly by the
side of the magistrate, and was, apparently,
making unmeaning figures on a sheet of paper
with a pen.
Tell what you know about this stabbing,
Moll, said the magistrate.
I know this much about it, said Moll, that
last night there was a ball at Dean's, and that that
girl,I don't know what her name is,Jane
something, I believe, came there, and got cutting
round, and that a strange man, that looked
countryfied
,
asked her to dance, and she wouldn't; and
a fuss was raised, and she stabbed him.
You saw her stab him? inquired the
magistrate
.
O, yes, Mr. Bailley, said Moll, in a tone
that was affectedly gentle, I saw it; you may be
sure I saw it, Squireyou know I've sworn to
it.
Mr. Bradshaw, will you ask any questions?
said the magistrate.
A few, sir, said Bradshaw, if I have favour
enough with Mistress Molly to get an answer;
and, then, in a jesting indifferent tone he put his
questions, while he seemed to be figuring on the
paper. What time was this, Molly?
I can't tell the exact hour. I didn't note the
time: may be eleven, may be twelve. I can't
sayshe did it, that's enough.
Whom did she go to the ball with?
I don't know, and I don't care.
Did you see Johnson there?
No.Yes, I believe he was there, she
continued
,
after glancing at Johnson.
Who went to the ball with you?
What's that to your business? she replied.
The magistrate told her she must reply
properly
;
and she said, Sall Sanders.
Who else?
Henry Adams, she replied, after some
hesitation
.
Where is Henry Adams?
I don't know;dead may be. There was
more murders than one, that night, I expect.
Is Henry Adams the man whom I saw in the
house with you?
Moll hesitated a long time, and then said
No.
Bradshaw now asked her a great many
indifferent
questions; and then carelessly inquired
How came the girl, Jane Durham, at your
house?
She went there with Sall, Henry Adams, and
me, was the reply.
Henry Adams, then, remarked Bradshaw, is
the same man that I saw in your house?
Yes; the same man that you killedand you
ought to be stretched for it.
Describe the scene when Jane Durham stabbed
the man at Dean's.
I can't describe it: I know nothing about it. I
saw her stab him, and that I swear to.
Bradshaw here said, that he had but one more
question to ask. Why did Jane Durham go to
your house?
Moll hesitated for a long time, and, at last, said,
After she had stabbed the man, Adams and
Sall persuaded her to go to hide from the watch.
As Moll could give no security for her appearance
at court, she was remanded to the jail, that she
might be forthcoming at the trial. When Johnson
and Moll left the room, Bradshaw handed the
testimony
of Moll, which he had written off, as she
gave it in, and requested the magistrate to read it,
and see if it was not correct. He read it, and said
it was perfectly so. Then, said Bradshaw, be
so kind as to sign it, and I will keep it till the trial.
He did so. After being reminded by Jones of their
engagement for the night, Bradshaw withdrew.
He went in search of Willoughby; told him of the
whole case, and remarked,
Willoughby, I know you are fond of
adventures
.
I don't wish to enter this business to-night,
without some one with me whom I can trust better
than one of these watchmen: I wish you would go
with me.
With all my heart, replied Willoughby: I
meant to propose it to you, when you first said you
were going.
Which of you enacts Sancho Panza? asked
Cavendish, who was by. Which of you, I pray?
It must be you, Kentuck; and, Bradshaw, here is
Don Quixotte, and the lady fairGlassman's frail
ladyis the Dulcinea del Toboso. Well, you'll
get your heads broke, in all human probability.
Your knight-errantry is devoted, if not elevated
but I forgot the reward! you go halves, I suppose.
You put me in mind of an anecdote I have seen of
George Selwyn, the celebrated wit: he had a great
penchant
for the spectacle of an execution, and
hearing
Vol. I. 18
that several malefactors were to be beheaded
in Paris, (the guillotine was not yet invented,) he
crossed over, for the purpose of witnessing the
scene. On the appointed day, by the favour of the
police, he took his station beside the fatal
instrument
.
The executioner, seeing the evident
interest
he took in the business, supposed him an
English gentleman of his own craft; he, therefore,
with a profound bow, offered him the bloody axe.
`Thank you, my dear sir, said Selwyn; I am
only an amateur.' If you only go in as amateurs,
of course, you cannot expect any part of the
reward
,
but when the true thief-takers give a
jollification
on the strength of it, you will, of course,
attend
,
as their particular friends. So speaking,
away went Cavendish.
The Judge is an odd fish, said Willoughby.
To look at his phiz, one would no more expect
humour in him, than in the weeping philosopher;
but he has it, and loves it as a gourmand does his
favourite dish. Yet he has a good deal of
sentiment
,
and is one of the best-hearted fellows I ever
knew. Don't you think highly of his talents,
Bradshaw
?
Certainly, very. He is fond of the profession;
and that is the secret of success in it. He and I
were schoolmates here, in town: he was always
just such a fellow. He would have all the school
laughing; and, in the midst of the merriment, never
move a musclelook as if he wondered what they
were laughing at. One day, at a public
examination
,
he fixed the bell-rope to his dog's collar, as the
animal lay asleep, and quietly came up stairs, and
took his place in his class, looking as if the fate of
Cato and of Rome hung upon his solemnity. You
know the prinkiness of a public examination: the
boys in their best, and the parents and friends
looking
on so attentively and anxiously. In the midst
of it, the bell began to ring vehementlyfor the
dog, rousing up and finding himself fast, jerked with
a vengeance. `There's fire! fire!' exclaimed
Cavendish
.
The whole school took up the chorus,
and away he broke, down stairs, the first of all,
and let his dog loose, before any one discovered the
causethe boys following after. It has always
been a cause of inquiry among the boys, how the bell
was rung. Cavendish, with the gravest face
imaginable
,
would enter into the discussion, and
wonder
if a house could be haunted. I happened to
find it out, but have never mentioned it, just that I
may allude to the circumstance when some of our
old school-mates are by, and watch Cavendish's
face. He don't know, to this day, that I know it.
Don't you say any thing to him about it; and the next
time we are all together, where there are any of our
old school-mates, I'll speak of the fact, and do you
keep your eye on the Judge. The teacher was a
very peculiar man, and a great lover of wit and
humour. He had a habit of throwing his hat, which
he always wore in school, at a boy, when he
misbehaved
;
and he would make him bring it up, and
punish him. One day, he came in school with a
new hat. The moment Cavendish saw him, he
began
to cut a good many pranks: he wanted him to
throw his new hat at him. The teacher saw him,
and was in the act of hurling it, when he caught
himself, and exclaimed`Cavendish, if my hat was
not too good, I would throw it at you.' Cavendish
looked at him with a face of the most child-like
simplicity, and said`Throw your head, then, sir.'
The old fellow, contrary to what would have been
the conduct of most teachers, shook the Judge by
the hand, and laughed heartily. They never meet
now, but what they have a long chat together.
The Judge, too, sometimes acts very oddly, without
meaning any jest. He prides himself very much
upon being polite in his own house. You know in
what an old-fashioned house he lives; the furniture,
and every thing around and in it, are in keeping.
One day, we had been out riding, and we returned
very much fatigued. He insisted upon my staying
all night with him, and we retired very early. He
conducted me to a large, solemn-looking room, in
which was a very large bed, hung round with
massive dark curtains, and left me. For some time
after I retired, I lay awake, thinking of feudal
times, baronial castles, and so forth. I fell asleep
with such thoughts. I was awakened by a voice
that said, I know not what. Starting up, I beheld
a figure at my bed-side, with a light in its hand.
In the bewilderment of the moment, I really thought
myself in some castle's keep; but I was speedily
aware of where I was, by the Judge's apologetic
tone. `Bradshaw, my dear friend,' said he, `
excuse
me: I forgot to ask you if you would have any
thing. Are you warm enough?' Just as he spoke,
the clock struck two. Mark mehe'll come round
to my office this evening, to go, with us, on this
`Quixotic expedition,' as he calls it.
Ha! ha! Well, he really is an odd fellow. Do
you think he'll go? Bradshaw, suppose we step
in here, and take some oysters, and then walk
round through the lane, where you were last night.
I should like to see the locality.
Bradshaw assented; and, after taking some
oysters
,
by way of dinner, they proceeded to that part
of the city. Bradshaw pointed out to Willoughby
the place where the body of Carpenter was found;
and they passed on, and entered the lane. Here and
there might be seen a brick tenement, but the most
of the buildings were miserable shanties. The lane
was narrow and dirty. In many places the houses
were partially under ground, in consequence of the
lane having been graded since they were built. A
few of the frame ones were of two stories; and as
you looked up the lane, the houses on either side
reminded you of two rows of militia on their first
day of training, who find it impossible to stand in
regular file. Here the refuse of the city
congregated
.
It was the common sewer of her outcasts.
You may travel through all Kentuck, said
Willoughby, and see nothing that reminds you of
this, with, perhaps, the exception of one or two
places in Louisville. Such looking places always
strike me with sadness.
Fisher Ames says, remarked Bradshaw, that
a large city is the standing army of ambition.
Throw a community into commotion, and here you
may gather mercenaries for any purpose. If mobs
do not always originate in these haunts, here, at
least, are found the spirits whose similars made
France a demoniac democracy, who are fit for any
purpose of evilthe worst and for nothing of
good.
18*
Bradshaw, said Kentuck, I don't know how
you feel about it, but I am morally as well as
physically
healthier in the country. With my dog and
gun roaming through the woods, I feel no
headaches
,
and few of the excitements that lead to vice.
In a crowded city, the bustling inhabitants, the
news, and rumour of news, the many scenes that
attract, the various food for passion, the very noise
of the streets, keep one in a perpetual state of
excitement; at least one of my temperament, who
has lived in calmer scenes. And yet, like a love
for the cup, this excitement, which at first may be
disagreeable, becomes, after awhile, a pleasure,
and at last a want.
They had now passed a considerable way into
the lane.
Here I met those two fellows I spoke of, said
Bradshaw, who scampered off. As they advanced,
they observed several men at the door of a low
grocery
,
eyeing them suspiciously. A woman came out
of a house, as if about to cross the street to another:
on seeing Bradshaw, she stared at him a moment
fiercely, and then turned and entered the door she
had just left. Bradshaw thought, though he was
not positive, that she was the woman whom he had
seen on the bed with old Moll. A drunken man
staggered out of the grocery, followed by a woman
of the most wretched appearance, who was
heaping
upon him the most profane curses. The young
men at the door of the grocery, after whispering
earnestly together, followed after Bradshaw and
Willoughby, on the other side of the street.
Bradshaw, said Kentuck, those fellows have
some mischief in their heads. It always provokes
me when I see such rascals eyeing and speaking of
one in the way they seem to be. Let's cross over
among them, and ask them some questions
regarding
the rumpus last night. We'll see what metal
they're made of.
That won't do, Kentuck; we'll soon find that
they have a kind of metal which we hav'n'tcold
steel. I'm not armed the least, are you? Besides,
there is no necessity for an altercation with them,
and there's no honour in it. I shall appear for the
girl, and I don't want to provoke these fellows
against me. They were probably at the ball last
night, and may be witnesses in this case. Don't
you know that the feelings of these wretches are
such that, if they were angry with a lawyer, they
would as lieve as not swear away the life of his
client. No; I must conciliate them, and find out the
facts. Many a lawyer loses his case by assuming
a hostile attitude towards the opposite witnesses.
By the day of trial, I shall know much more of the
real facts of this caseand there is something dark
in the businessby this course, than I could in
any other way. The best place to let the rascals
know I've found them out, and to expose them, too,
is before the jury. In this way, I may protect the
innocent, and hit the evil doers with a vengeance.
The conversation on the opposite side of the
street was characteristic.
I wonder who those fellows are? said one of
themthey've ruffle shirts. Just look at that
tall fellowhe shows fight this very minute. By
hokey, there's a good deal of strength in him,he
cares for nobody.
That little fellow, said another, is Bradshaw,
the lawyer, who pled for Fritzhe's the one who
liked to killed Adams last night about a gal. He's
a busterany way you can fix him. He fit his
way last night through the lane, with a gal, in
spite of the whole of 'em. He knocked Adams
down just at a word. He ought to be mobbed.
Mob who? said a slim-looking lad, who had
left the grocery and joined them, while this
conversation
took place. He could not be more than
seventeen; he had a quick eye, handsome features,
with a kind of sailor dandyism about him; a mole
skin cap was set jauntily on the side of his head.
He was younger than any of those he addressed,
and much smaller. Mob who? said he; not
Mr. Bradshaw. If you do, Fritz takes the other
side.
The persons here stopped, and the one who
spoke last turned round and said to Fritz,Fritz,
I don't believe you're the clear grit, any how.
Clear grit, or foul grit, replied Fritz, he did
me a service, when there was nobody to help me.
When old Scrags asked me fifty dollars, and I
hadn't a cent, he got me off. He went my bail,
once, till I was tried, and kept me out of jail; and
when my trial came on, he got me off again.
Clear off, and I hav'n't paid him a cent for it.
If there's any plunder any where, say the word,
and I'm with you; but if you cut up any shines
on him, I'll blow the whole gang.
You'll turn state's evidence, will you? said
the fellow, advancing in a threatening manner to
Fritz.
Pete, said Fritz, looking him steadily in the
eye, hands off! you mus'n't lay the weight of your
little finger on me, man, in anger.
Do you dare me? said Pete, who was a tall
double-fisted fellow, I could pick you up, tie you in
a double beau-knot, and throw you over my
shoulder
.
If you can, said Fritz, I can let day-light
into you as you're doing it.
Come boys? said one of the company, none
of this. You will raise a fuss presently, and we
had better be looking out for chances. Come, let's
go to the balloon ascension,it's no use to follow
after them.
They, accordingly, faced about, and left the lane
by the way that Bradshaw and Willoughby entered
it. Kentuck and Bradshaw walked on to the other
end of the lane; and after standing there a moment,
conversing and looking around them, they
determined
to return through the lane to their offices,
that they might understand the place thoroughly
a spirit of adventure actuating the Kentuckian,
and a fixed determination to save the girl, and find
out the true state of the case, moving Bradshaw.
I begin to feel an interest in this business,
Bradshaw
,
said Willoughbythese scoundrels are a
caution. I expect that Adams is a leader among
them. Such miserable debauchery and villany
as theirs is a wonder to me. If a man were a
robber-chief
,
and held the fastnesses of a mountain,
or lived as Schiller described his Robbers, or as a
free, bold spirit might in the far west, there would
be some romance in the life; and the perilous
adventure
would be in the free air, where exercise
would give vigorous health, and renewed energies.
But these poor devils here, surrounded by dirt and
smoke, and dogs of baliff's, are like a hunted 'coon
in a fired woodsthey have no fair shake for it.
The hollowing, the smoke, the fire, conquers them
before they are seenuses them up at once. The
warfare of society upon these spirits, is like that of
the savages of the woods against their foes; it hunts
them down without mercy. Confound it!I feel
that these things are not right. Yet how can
you mend them. Here am I now, coming to-night as
I would go to fox hunt, to see a fellow run down
earthed.
But the fellow deserves it, you must remember,
Kentuck, said Bradshaw; and if, by leaving him
undisturbed, we could be satisfied that he would
do no more harm, why, I would rather give him
a blessing than a curse, as I left him. But we
must protect the weak and the defenceless: this is
not only the duty of man, individually, but of
society
.
To feel for such wretches as this Adams,
is natural in a generous spirit, for he feels for all.
But think of the woman, Kentuck.
That's a fact! For that reason, I want the
fellow caught, and I want to see these
characters
.
We don't start before eleven, you know, said
Bradshaw, and I am engaged to go to the ball.
You go, don't you.
Yes, I'll see you there, and we can both leave
together. Mind, Bradshaw, don't miss me. If you
do, I will be after you.
CHAPTER XIV.
Bradshaw
had determined to go to the jail in
the afternoon, to see Jane Durham and learn from
her the facts of the case. But it was wearing late
by the time he reached his office, and he entered
the court to speak to Nancy of her.
Honey, said Nancy, I see ye take an
interest
for the poor thing. It's right, and ye'll have
yer reward. The poor thing is deserving and has
been badly treated. I'm old, ye see, Bradshaw,
but I've been young, and I know a woman's
feelings
yes!
I say it in humbleness, a sinful woman's.
May be I've been more of a sinner than this young
womanbut I've not suffered as much, and there's
a merciful Providence for all. So speaking,
Nancy
screamed at the top of her voice, after her
black girl, Beck, who had strayed away
somewhere
,
and said, I'll go over and see the poor
thing;and so ye tell me, honey, that Job Presley
has been kind to her, and has her out of the jail
with his wife. She's a feeling woman, a very
feeling
woman, and so is her daughter Lucy. Beck,
ye hussy, where have ye been? A pretty trollop
ye are to be caterwauling about, and leave me to
'tend to every thing. What'll ye come to by such
conductions? Here, attend, and none of your
fooling
around among the fellows. Mind, the big pippins
are two for a fip. The frost killed 'most all the fruit
this year, and if folks get good fruit, they must pay
for it.
With Mary Carlton leaning on his arm,
Bradshaw
entered the ball-room, following Kentuck, on
whose arm leaned Emily Bradshaw. Though Miss
Bradshaw's parents were religious, they had little
or no objection against their daughters partaking
in such amusements. Miss Bradshaw had no
fondness
for them, but her brother was anxious for her
to attend, and the fashionable society in which she
was thrown, whenever she visited the city,
compelled
her to comply with some of its requisitions,
or seem very puritanical. She went very little
into society, for her extreme delicacy shrunk from
its glare; but this very circumstance made her
more admired. The hackneyed man of the world,
wearied with the flirtations and arts of some
fashionable belle, might often be seen with
respectful
courtesy attending Miss Bradshaw, throwing
aside the mere manners of the ton as qualities,
which, in this instance, were not most likely to
please. Her pale brow, her dark hair, her
simple
dress, her most winning manners, that wore the
impress of the gentlest heart, and the feminine
loveliness
of her face and figure struck every one. It
was an interesting sight to see Miss Carlton and
Miss Bradshaw conversing together, the one
leaning
on the arm of Bradshaw, and the other on that
of Willoughby. The tall proud form of the
Kentuckian
,
his expanded chest, his face and head on
which nature had stamped her noblest impress,
contrasted
finely with the delicate being who held his
arm. The slender form of Bradshaw, his
intellectual
head, his penetrating and fiery glance,
formed another contrast with the blue laughing
eye and fairy figure of Mary Carlton. Standing
together and contemplating the dancers, they
formed a group that would have interested a
painter.
The music sounded merrily: Mary Carlton
might be seen threading the mazes of the dance to
meet her partner, Bradshaw, like a fairy in a
labyrinth
.
There was Henry Selman, dancing with
Miss Penelope in high glee; occasionally glancing,
with a triumphant air, at Mr. Bates, who was
attitudinizing
on the confines of the dance. Propped
against a pillarnot far off was the judge, with
both hands in his pockets, in humorous
observation
of Bates, looking as if he were contemplating
a statue of wo.
Bradshaw, said the Judge, in the interval of
the dance, I thought you were going a
thief-catching
,
to-night.
So I am, but only as an amateur, as you say.
I don't go until eleven.
Well, joy go with you; have you told the ladies
of your anticipated achievement?
No, we wait until we have conquered, before
we blow the blast of triumph.
What if
you
are the conquered? Will you be
suffered to leave the lane on your parole of
honour
?
I don't know, Judge, we go like the savans in
Vol. I. 19
Napoleon's Egyptian army, probably, to be laughed
at by the troops, and to be treated with no
respect
by the barbarians, should we fall into their
hands.
Likely: here comes Kentuck. Willoughby,
what time do you commence your possum hunt,
to-night?
About eleven, I believe.
It's a delightful employment, and so
characteristic
of a Kentuckian, to go a hunting.
Oh! Kentucky,
The hunters of Kentucky.
Suppose you should be surrounded, will you
die upon the field? or will you tuck up your
coattails
and heel itraise a dust in that way? You
had better wear roundabouts. `He who fights and
runs away,' &c. I've been looking at Bates this
half hour. Well, I don't wonder that fellow's
thoughts are always dull when I reflect the
subject
is always himself.
Why, Judge, you're in spirits to-night, judging
from your conversation, said Willoughby; but
not from your phiz: that always plays possum to
your feelings, except when you are sad; and then
it gets the spirit of contradiction in it, and looks
comic.
A Kentuckian's phiz, replied the Judge, is
pretty much like his country.
How's that? asked Willoughby.
He has his hair every which way, untouched
by the comb or scissors, like his forests, unpruned
and free. His forehead is like one of his hills
bluff and bold, and with just as much brains in it.
His smile is not like his glorious rivers
Eternal smiles his emptiness betray,
As shallow streams run dimpling all the way.
His chin, when it is shaved, looks like a platter
licked clean by a cat. His neck is as open as a
prairie. His form's like one of his girdled trees;
and his arms are the branches, when tossed by the
winds. His cheeks are rich alluvial, where plenty
of pork and whisky has been deposited. His
manners
are those of a bear taught to dance with a
chain round his neck, and to grin when his tail is
pulled. His oratory is like a north wind roaring
through a wilderness. His eye twinkles like a star,
but it is not with the borrowed light of any kind of
lore, but merely with the pride of a rooster,
thinking
of his dung-hill.
Ha! ha! Good, said Kentuck, when we
consider
that I saw this very extemporaneous effusion
written off on the back of one of the Judge's briefs,
this very day, and blotted all over with
emendations
.
Willoughby, that's no such thing, said the
Judge, colouring.
A fact, said Willoughby, laughing. And,
Judge, carry out your analogies. You're a
Virginian
,
and Virginia is said to be the mother of old
Kentuck. If such is the character of the daughter,
what of the mother? She, like the mother of the
Gracchii, as Calhoun said, when asked for her
jewels
,
may point to her childrenbut most of her
great ones are now gone; and, like all old women,
she is now
past bearing
.
In such jesting, which provoked no anger, the
young men whiled the time, until the courtesies of
the ball called them off.
Well, Selman, said Bradshaw, to the admirer
of Miss Penelope Perry, how do you come on in
the court of love?
Why, Bradshaw, replied Selman, with a
delighted
smile, better. I cut Bates out to-night.
I don't know why it is, but he is not as attentive to
Miss Carlton as he used to be. He directs his whole
battery against Miss Penelope, now; but I think
he's losing favourain't he?
I think he is. She looks very well to-night.
O, very. Bradshaw, she won't let me dance
with her too often. Do engage her for a set, and
keep that Bates away.
With pleasure.
As Bradshaw advanced towards Miss Penelope,
he whispered to Willoughby: Kentuck, I'm going
to engage Miss Penelope for the next setor will
you?and I'll engage her for the set after. You
must dance with her, and help Selman on. We
must keep him in good spirits, and make him a beau
here, among the fair.
To be sure. We must row Bates up salt river.
I've set the Judge on him, by telling him, which is
a fact, that Bates said he looked like the great owl
at the menagerie. Bates refused to pay but two
dollars at the supper, the other night, because, he
said, that was all it was to cost. The breakage
cost two dollars a-piece, besides.
His love for the rhino is hereditary. I'm told
that the frail fair one, Catherine P, pledged a
diamond ring to him, the other day, for ten dollars,
worth fifty; and he refused to return it, because
she did not redeem it at the time stipulated.
Whew!the devil! It ain't possible.
Bradshaw
,
I don't believe that.
Ask the judge. He tells the tale with a holy
honour. The girl, I believe, is his client. He
swears he'll get the ring.
Miss Penelope, said Bradshaw to that lady,
may I have the pleasure of dancing with you the
next set?
If I am not engaged, sir; I promised Mr. Bates,
that I would dance with him; and he looks as if he
were about to claim my promise.
Ay, are you such an interpreter of Mr. Bates's
looks?
Not at all, sir; but I wish to keep my promise
at least for my self-respect.
When did you promise him, Miss Penelope?
In the beginning of the ball.
Ay, did he name the set?
No, sir.
Then will I cut him out? He has yet not paid
his respects to you, to claim the promise. A pretty
fellow! If you have only your self-love to gratify
in dancing with Mr. Bates, and
no other love
, allow
me to assure you that your best way of gratifying
that self-love is to dance with me.
How so? asked the lady, laughing.
Because it will be the very way to show Mr.
Bates, that you have forgotten a promise, which
his self-complacency is indifferent about
remembering
.
Why, you don't know, but that he himself
has entirely forgotten it.
19*
Miss Penelope took Bradshaw's arm, and they
were soon in the dance.
You seem to enjoy yourself, said Willoughby,
in another part of the room, to Miss Emily
Bradshaw
.
O! yes, sir, I generally enjoy myself. I see the
Babel, without feeling the stir. I mean a very
great deal of it. It is really delightful to look round
on the happy facesisn't it?
It really is; but do you take no note of the sour
ones?
O yes; I observe that they are sour, but I can't
interest myself in the mere sourness. I like to
watch the contrast. We may see sour faces any
where. You know it is said, that the reason so
many married couple look so much alike, is because
they have looked so long at each other that their
features at last acquire a resemblance. If this be
true, we should be careful how we take too deep
an interest in the feelings of the crab apples of
our race.
I must tell Cavendish of that. He's so fond of
contemplating odd people, and strange spectacles,
that I must warn him. His face shows already his
propensities.
Yes,but I don't think it will ever alter his
heart.
No, I don't think it will; though, he gets very
cynical, sometimes
But, said Bradshaw, who was passing by, and
overheard the remark, as Goldsmith said of
Johnson
,
all of the bear that the Judge has about him,
is the skin.
Thank you, sir, said the Judge, who was at
his shoulder; that is an ermine of which I am not
ambitious. You valiant gentlemen who go forth
on such a glorious expedition to-night, should be
equipped in that way. No, I'm wrongI should
not recommend to you the bear's skin, but that
which a certain other animal assumed for valiant
purposesthe lion's. But you'll be found out.
How so?
As he was found out by the
bray
.
Ha! ha!but we can't take you along, Judge,
though you are thus equipped.
Why not?
Because you'll be found out, without it.
I understand you, sir,I'm not only an ass,
but the stupidest of the tribe,hey? Well, I'm not
ass enough to go.
Bradshaw passed on, and Cavendish and
Willoughby
stood beside his sister.
I hav'n't seen you in the dance yet, I believe,
Mr. Cavendish, said Emily Bradshaw.
No, miss, that is an enjoyment in which I seldom
join. The fact is, I have a hatred to such skipping
about. There must be pleasure in it to some
people
,
of course, or they would not practise it. This
jumping up and down, and running to and fro
seem to me a relic of barbarism; just as I consider
the jewel in Miss Carlton's ear, (I'm glad to see
that you do not wear them, Miss Bradshaw,) is a
barbaric ornamentthe relic of a ruder age. A
Shawnee woman, you know, wears one in her
nose as well as ears. I don't see why the ears
should be complimented in this way, at the expense
of the nose.
The nose, you know, is complimented with
specs, said Miss Bradshaw. Do you consider
the use of specs a barbarous custom?
No, certainly, we cannot: but I consider them
a sorry sightsorry
spectacles
. I think a man
would almost be justified in making a resolution
against wearing them, like Dean Swift. Think of
our students, particularly of medicinewhy is it
that so many of them require specs? It must be
for the dignity of the profession. Think of them
gaping about through their glasses, like a cat in a
gooseberry bush, looking, by moonlight, after a
mouse. If there is any thing wanting in the
paraphernalia
of Mr. Bates, it is a pair of spectacles.
Behold him!he is skipping in the dance, now,
like an ape in high health: ten minutes ago, I saw
him Byronizing against a column, and looking like
many a fellow I have seen at the bar, ruminating
on the consequences of sheep-stealing.
Mr. Cavendish! Mr. Cavendish! exclaimed
Emily Bradshaw, you'll lose your good name for
amiability, if you often speak in this way.
It will not be the loss of the reputation, if I
have it, said Cavendish, but your opinion, that
I deserve to lose it, that would pain me, Miss
Bradshaw
.
How beautifully Miss Carlton dances!
Yes, said Willoughby; like a sunbeam on a
streambut, Judge, may be Bates is ruminating
on the gentlest kind of theft.
It must be on a petty larceny, sir. The heart
that he could steal would not be worth much.
Kentuck, said Bradshaw to Willoughby, as
another cotillon was forming, it's half after ten;
we should be off.
That's a fact, replied Kentuck. Half after
ten! why, by my watch, it is after eleven. What
shall we do?
Suppose we get Cavendish to see Miss Carlton
and my sister home, and go.
Willoughby looked blank, and asked, What
about our dresses?
We can get a rough overcoat at the
watch-house
,
and that will do. Cavendish, you'll see the
ladies home for us.
Why, Bradshaw, I expected to go with you.
If you get into a scrape, I don't want you to get
your head broke, when I might prevent it by
going
.
Bradshaw and Willoughby exchanged smiles.
They explained to Cavendish that they could not
all go; and, after a good deal of trouble with him,
he agreed to remain. They made their apologies
to the ladies, and departed.
They were soon at the watch-house. At the
door, they met Jones, with four other watchmen,
going upon their mission to catch Adams. A few
words were exchanged between them, when the
watchmen entered the watch-house, to obtain for
Bradshaw and Willoughby the necessary disguises.
The watch-house was situated in the centre of
the city. It was the house where the watchmen
met to receive the orders of the captain of the
watch, and to which the rioters and marauders of
the night were brought and locked up, to await a
hearing before the magistrate, who always
attended
early in the morning. The room the young
men entered was low and long: a dingy lamp of tin
hung suspended from the ceiling. Along the walls
were benches, permanently fixed, on which lay, at
length, or reclined, in any attitude that pleased
them, those watchmen who were not on duty.
Behind
the desk, near a fire-place, was a large,
square-shouldered
man, with a dread-naught coat on; his
cheeks were adorned with an immense pair of
whiskers, and through his bushy eyebrows his
reddish
eye glowed like a cigar in a dark night, in the
mouth of some sturdy smoker. This was the
captain
of the watch.
Lawyer, said he to Bradshaw, so you're
going
a larking to-night. I heard of your business
with Adams last night: I wonder, being as you're a
small man, that you came off so well. The
fellow's
a noted gallow's bird, and fights like
vengeance
.
He has sworn he won't be taken alive:
you'll have tough times to-night.
There is no harm in taking him dead, is there?
said Bradshaw.
Not exactly, said the captain, hesitatingly;
but it would be best to take him alive.
Bradshaw did not mean all that might have been
meant by this phrase; but he knew among whom
he stood. He remarked,
I have no enmity against the fellow; but he's
a great rascal, and he ought to be taken. Jones
here has a large family, and is a good watchman,
and I want him to get the reward. So saying, the
young men, who had put on dread-naught coats
and old hats, and the watchmen departed together.
They reconnoitred in the neighbourhood of the
alley
for some time before they entered it. Several
squads of young men, frequenters of the
neighbourhood
,
passed them; but they were much more
peaceable than usual; the late transactions having
quelled their turbulence. It must have been after
one, when they entered the lane. Loose clouds
had been floating in the heavens since dark; after
midnight, they gathered in huge masses, and the
wind began to blow roughly.
What think you of the business, Squire? said
Jones, in a whisper, to Bradshaw, as they
approached
the house where Bradshaw had
contended
with Adams: had we best enter the house?
Why, Jones, I should ask you; but my opinion
is, we had better enter some of these houses. I
wish I had a pair of false whiskers on, I could
enter
then without the least fear of detection, and
pass for a watchman, or one of them, as I chose.
Jones inquired of his companions if either of
them had a pair of whiskers to spare, and after
some explanation, one of them agreed to lend his
for the purpose. Bradshaw, accordingly, fitted
them on as well as he could, without a glass. It
was agreed that the watchmen were to wait in
the old frame building, in which Bradshaw had hid
with the girl from pursuit, until a signal was given,
and Bradshaw and Willoughby were to enter the
grocery, and see if they could make any
discoveries
.
Kentuck, whispered Bradshaw, as they
advanced
towards the grocery, what do you think
of this business?
First rate, was the reply, I'm for going the
whole hog. Suppose, we turn thief takers, and
rival
Vidocq or old Hays?
We will, if we succeed, but remember this is
our first attempt. Have you pistols?
Yes, two of them, and a dirk.
So have I. Let's have the word Kentuck for
our watch-word, and if I hear you call it, or you
me, we must come to the rescue. I've no idea of
having my profile spoilt, or of being carried out
feet foremost; and, therefore, if any of these
fellows
flash their knives dangerously, it will be worse
for them.
The grocery store was a high frame building;
on one side of it was a vacant lot, and on the
other a frame house not quite so high, and divided
from it by an alley of about seven feet in width.
Bradshaw and Kentuck entered, and passing up
by a counter, they took their station near a stove.
Seated by the stove, were two young men, who
looked at the new comers, and stretched out their
persons so as to take up as much room as possible.
The one by Willoughby, put his feet on the only
chair that was between them. As soon as
Kentuck
observed it, he said, My good fellow, if you'll
let your carcass occupy but one chair, I'll take a
seatand without waiting for the removalhe
lifted the chair, let the fellow's leg fall, and sat
down. The man stared at Kentuck, who returned
his glance with the mildest expression in the world,
which the fellow observing, and mistaking for no
fight, said, Do you want a fuss here, my young
lark?
Why, I don't much care, said Kentuck, in a
drawling tone. If there's a fuss, I shall be into it to
a certainty; and if there ain't a fuss, I shall sit still.
I tell you what it is, stranger, I'm all the way
from old Kentuck; you've heard of such a place,
may be? It's a place for varmints, wild varmints,
I tell you. The word there, is go a-head. You've
hearn tell of people licking their weight in wild
cats, hain't you? I've seen it done. May be I
could do itshould like to try? You've hearn tell
of rowing a man up salt river, hain't ye? Well,
I've seen it done; there's no joke in it. Did you
ever see a man bite the head of a nail off? Bring
me one.
While Willoughby spoke this, he stretched his
legs out, and looked the man in the face with the
most imperturbable indifference.
You're a picture, said the fellow, struck with
his don't-care manner.
Now, ain't I? said Kentuck. I'm not one of
your pictures to hang round a girl's neck, though:
I am a full length painting. One of your pictures
that may dangle in a strange kind of frame, some
of these daystwo posts upright, and one across,
with a rope and the picture at the end of it, so
well done, that the whole people are admiring the
execution
. Do you take, stranger? The fellow
nodded, and grinned. Well, it's no matterwhile
we live, be merry. What'll you take to drink?
If you're for drink, said the fellow, I'll take
a little whisky.
Ay, of the mountain dew, said Cavendish.
What's this landlord's name.
Scratch, they call him.
Vol. I. 20
Here, Scratch, called out Willoughby, to an
old man by the door, who was keeping a sharp eye
upon his moveableslet's have some of your very
best; no deception, old boy, or you'll get scalped,
just as a wild Indian scalps a fellow. They learnt
the trick to the Kentucks, and we can do it like
lightning. I'll bet you a treat, for the company,
that I'll take this Kentuck, (and he thrust his hand
into his pocket, and produced a curiously wrought,
large knife,) I'll take this Kentuck, and with one
sweep, just one, round your head, I'll leave you,
old Scratch, in the condition for a namesake, with
no more hair upon your crown, than there is on
the back of my hand. What say you?
Sir, the liquor's good, said Scratch, and I
want no such experiments.
Old boy, you'd scarcely feel it. It's a mere
circumstance
,
you'd look just as well with a scratch;
and who knows but what you might get a pension
by the scalping? But, no matter, if ever you want it
done, you must call on me. Stranger, continued
Willoughby, turning to the fellow beside him, I've
been a river character, a wild woods river
character
;
I've seen sawyers, and swamps, and snags,
and alligators, and every thing. Why, the sprees
you have here, in your lanes and alleys, are nothing
to Natchez under the Hill, or the swamps at New
Orleans. They'll dirk a fellow there just to keep
their hands in. I've seen knives there flash around
like sunbeams, and I just set among 'em as I set
now and looked on.
What brings you all the way here? asked the
fellow who had just taken his liquor, and who felt
warmed towards Willoughby.
Why, when I was last at New Orleans, I took
the sea, round from there, and landed at New
York, looked round there a spell, cut up in other
places, and at last came here. I happened to get
the word, while I was in this here city, that an
old comrade of mine had got into hardships
somewhere
down this way, and I thought I'd just take
a look after him.
What's his name?
Adams, replied Willoughby. Do you
know such a man, stranger?
What, besides Adams, is his name?
Henry Adams, said Bradshaw, who observed
that Kentuck was at fault. He's been a high
boy in his generation. The word reached us
to-day
that he'd got into a bad fix. It wasn't
to-day
,
exactly, it reached us, but last night. You
see, we took a spree, and got lodged in the
watch-house
.
While they were talking with us, the
watchman came in, and told about some fellow
having a fight here last night with Adams, and
how Adams got hurtknocked down two or
three times about a girl, at a place they called old
Moll's. He described the place pretty exact, and
I knew it must be in this lane.
As this conversation was going on, the
landlord
,
old Scratch, came round from behind his
counter, with a light in his hand, and observed,
narrowly, the young men. It occurred to
Bradshaw
,
from the landlord's interest, that, in all
probability, Adams was in his premises. The
scrutiny seemed to awaken Scratch's suspicion of
the new-comers, for he said
You've got the best kind of tailoring, I see,
under them old coats; and they look a good deal
like a watchman's. What have you been after?
Fun, my old roarer, exclaimed Willoughby,
to whom the eye of the landlord had been
mostly
directed; for, as our readers have observed, he
had talked the most, and also exposed his
countenance
and dress in a manner that made
Bradshaw
,
at first, fear they would be found out.
Willoughby's
consummate acting, satisfied him there
was little danger, and delighted him. Fun, my
old roarer! I can't call you a salt river roarer;
though you're not far off of the salt water. I see
you're fresh; but do you think a man of my inches
wouldn't wear the boot, if best was to be found?
As to the getting, that's not your business, my
old Scratch. You'd better let me scalp you, and
get a good top-knot in place of those rough
stubbles
you have on your crown. Look at me,
continued
Willoughby, slapping his thigh: do you
think I was born with these pants on? Man, just
eye themthey're as soft as a girl's cheek. I'd
take them off now for a better pair; and why not
take off your hair if you can get better? You're
now a scratchless Scratch. But keep dark, my
old fellow; don't flare your light so much this
way. I've some acquaintance in this city that
I wouldn't like to see me in your establishment:
they'd suspect my respectability.
Scratch took the hint, and replaced his light on
the counter, deliberated a moment, and withdrew.
He returned, after a short absence, to the back of
his shop, and beckoned Bradshaw and
Willoughby
to him.
What kind of a looking man is this Adams,
that you speak of? inquired Scratch.
He's a thick-set, bull-necked fellow, said
Bradshaw, with black hair and eyes. He was
lately in jail. I went there to see him; but they
wouldn't let me in.
Old Scratch hesitated a moment, seemed
perplexed
,
and remarked, unawares
He says he has known men like you, but none
that they call Kentuck.
My old boy, said Kentuck, can't a man
change his name, and have what these lawyers
call an alias. You don't think a free rover sails
always under the same flag, do you?
No, said the old fellow, with a grin, I
guess not. But what do you want to see him
for?
To see him for! exclaimed Willoughby.
The devil! Why, don't you know that the
watchmen and constables are after him, hunting
high and low?
Yes, said Bradshaw, who was satisfied that
Adams was in the house; they'll be down upon
you presently, and raise the devil. We want to
get him off some where if we can. We heard
the watchmen say, the other night, they would
turn over every stone in the city for him.
Blood and thunder! exclaimed Scratch,
can't a man do for a friend, without always
getting
into trouble!
20*
Scratch, said Bradshaw, they'll blow you
sky high if they find him; and they'll take him,
besides. He's a fellow that'll tell on any body
to get himself off. By thunder, I don't want him
to tell on me. I want to hide him.
It will be hard work to move him, said old
Scratch. He's very bad: he's got his foot
twisted
all out of place: his head and shoulder is
terribly
bruised. Come on; let's see if we can't do
something for him. Mind, I depend on you as
his true friends. You're on no account to reveal
the place where you find him.
So speaking, Scratch led the way to the back
part of his house, and then, by a ricketty pair of
steps, to the second story. His house was
uninhabited
,
save by himself, and those outlaws whom he
harboured. All his goods, that were of any value,
were in the front part of his shop: they consisted,
principally, of liquors, which, together with a few
dry goods, and a barrel or two of fish, and some
cordage, comprised his stock in trade. The second
story had two or three rooms in it, which, as the
doors were open, the young men could observe
were filled with all kinds of rubbish, of the most
inflammable
materials.
You see, said Scratch, chuckling, they may
hunt the hare, but they can't find him. If them
dogs of constables press too heavy on me, do you
see?I can just let a candle fall in yon old tar
barrel, and if they don't scamper like old rats,
what's that to me?
Bradshaw and Cavendish felt in a quandary, as
to how they should act, on seeing Adams; but, as
they could not communicate with each other, by a
tacit understanding, they determined to follow to
his hiding-place, and trust to circumstances. The
watchmen would, doubtless, keep their station
until
they heard the signal, or the young men left the
grocery. If Adams was much disabled, they could
easily take him; but the main point was to
prevent
the interference of old Scratch and his
company
,
before they could communicate with the
watchmen;however, on went the landlord, and
they followed after. He led the way to the
corner
of the building, next to the vacant lot, beside
the tar barrel to which he had pointed, and
touching
a board, that seemed to be nailed against the
wall to repair a dilapidation, a narrow door opened,
which led by a ladder to a kind of third story or
cock-loft. On entering the apartment, it appeared
long and narrow, with the ceiling unplastered and
slanting, which was, in fact, formed by the roof of
the house. There was no flooring on the rafters,
only, here and there, a board laid across in
different
directions. Treading a board that appeared
to lead to the sky-light, the landlord opened a door
close to the eves, which they had to stoop to enter,
and Bradshaw and Willoughby found themselves in
a miserable room, if room it might be called, on the
floor of which, on a mattress, lay Adams. The
ruffian's
encounter with Bradshaw had been no child's
play; he looked squalid and feverish. He was so
altered from sickness, and his wounds, Bradshaw
scarcely knew him. The Kentuckian eyed his
broad chest, bony arms, and bull neck, and
wondered
how Bradshaw could have contended,
successfully
,
with such superior strength. The landlord,
with the candle which he held in his hand, lit one
which stood by the bed-side of Adams, and then
stepped behind the young men. Willoughby had
to stoop very much, in consequence of his height,
and the lowness of the room. Forgetting, for a
moment
,
this necessity, as he stepped forward, he struck
his head against the roof with such force, as to
throw him off of his balance. In the impulsive
effort
to recover himself, he threw out his hand, and
struck from the head of Bradshaw the watchman's
hat and false whiskers. Snatching a pistol from
his bed-head, and aiming it at the head of
Bradshaw
,
Adams exclaimed, in the same instant that
he firedWe're betrayed! The ball grazed
the left temple of Bradshaw, and ploughed its way
right over the top of the head of the landlord. The
bone of his skull was thick enough to resist its
entrance
but
it nearly did for him what the
Kentuckian
offered to do with his knife. Uttering a
yell of pain, old Scratch descended the ladder with
all possible speed, and fastened the door after him.
Bradshaw threw himself upon Adams just as he
was cocking another pistol, and he had scarcely time
to force his hand in a harmless direction, when he
pulled the trigger, but it only snapped.
Willoughby
sprang upon the body of the ruffian, as he
attempted
to fire, and saidI'm the strongestlet
me hold him. Run, Bradshaw, and bring the watch.
Quick as thought, Bradshaw hastened down the
ladder. He found the door fast: but, placing his
body against the wall, and his feet against the door,
with main force, after a powerful effort, he burst
it open, and tumbled into the room. Within ten
feet of him, near the tar barrel, stood old Scratch,
with the light in his hand. Bradshaw rushed past
him, and descended the steps, into the grocery.
There were several persons around the stove, who
evidently had been startled by the report of the
pistol. Bradshaw looked round to see if there was
any back way, through which he could pass out;
for he reflected, without his false whiskers and hat,
he might be known to some of them, as the one
who had hurt Adams. He saw no way of passing
out, but by the front door. As he rapidly advanced
to do so, the fellow who had been conversing at the
stove with Kentuck, askedWhere's the other
fellow? Who fired the pistol? Where's your
whiskers and hat, my lark?
Keep dark, said Bradshaw; I left them up
stairs. There's watchmen hid away, about here,
I believe.
The devil! What will Adams do? Don't you
smell something burning?
At this moment, old Scratch called out from
aboveKnock him downkill him! He's a spy.
The fellows immediately placed themselves in a
threatening attitude: one brandished a formidable
club, and others drew their knives. They stood
directly between Bradshaw and the door, calling
out
Traitor, spywe know you. Say your
prayers
!
Make way, my brave boys, said Bradshaw,
nothing intimidated, drawing and cocking a pistol,
as he spoke. Make a clear passage. Put up
your knives and clubs. The first man who
attempts
to use one, I'll shoot dead.
Don't fear him, exclaimed the fellow who
had previously spoken: his pistol's not loaded.
Didn't you hear it go off, up stairs?
Why don't old Scratch come down, said
another
fellow, intimidated by Bradshaw's manner,
and help us, if he wants him caught?
See, boys! said Bradshaw, producing another
pistol, and holding one in each hand,two pistols
have not been fired: one must be loaded. Your
blood be upon your own head! The first one that
attempts to stop me is a gone case.
So speaking, he passed deliberately by them,
while old Scratch came running down stairs,
crying
out, Stop him! They followed, but at a
respectful
distance, after Bradshaw, determined to
dog him. He crossed over to the old building in
which were the watch. He thought it best not to
call them, as the fellows might then scamper off;
and he wished them to be taken. They followed
after him, giving, at intervals, a low whistle, which
was answered from the upper part of the lane,
where footsteps were heard advancing. All at
once, the cry of Fire! Fire!! from a hundred
tongues, burst forth in that fearful tone, that tells
it is near: at the same moment, a blaze of light
revealed
,
to Bradshaw, the forms and faces of the
watchmen, among whom he stood.
We've found him, said Bradshaw. He's at
old Scratch's.
He turned and beheld the old villain's house on
fire, with the flames blazing out of the second
story
windows. It immediately occurred to him, that
Scratch had set it on fire; and the rapid progress
of the flames was proof enough that his train, of
which he spoke, was well set. Bradshaw looked
anxiously round for Willoughby, but in vain. He
told the watchmen, hastily, the circumstances; and
requested them to take Scratch in custody, if they
should see him. He then entered the burning
house, in search of Willoughby. He proceeded as
far as the steps to the second story, but he found
it impossible to ascendthe whole was in a blaze;
and in places the fire dropped down into the
grocery
,
through the floor, which, in several places,
was burned through. He called in a loud voice,
stood listening, and called again and again, but
there came no answer. By this time, a great
crowd had gathered; the bells were ringing; the
cry of fire sounded through the city; and the noise
of the engine bells and wheels was heard in the
lane, as the hose-men ran to and fro, unreeling the
hose. When Bradshaw re-entered the street, two
engines were in full play on the fire. On the
opposite
side, he saw old Scratch looking very
composedly
on the house. Springing forward, and
seizing him by the throat, Bradshaw exclaimed,
Where's my friend? Tell me, or I'll choke you?
Where's Kentuck?
In the house, said the old fellow, doggedly.
As Bradshaw was in the act of pressing him to
the pavement, he glanced towards the house, saw
the trap-door open, and, in a moment after,
Willoughby
stood on the roof. It seemed to swing and
tremble beneath his weight. Stooping down,
Willoughby
helped Adams through the door, and, half
dragging him, for he could not help himself, they
reached the chimney that stood near the adjoining
house, divided, as we have before described, from
it by an alley of about seven feet in width.
Luckily
for them, the wind blew in the opposite
direction
,
so as to bear the flames towards the vacant
lot. The whole of the house on that side was
burning
;
and great bodies of flame broke upward through
the very roof at that corner. The engines
directed
the whole body of the water there, but it seemed
inevitable that the two must perish. Where's
the life escape-ladder? was called out on every
side. Not come yet, not come yet, was the
answer
.
The crisis was so fearful that the immense
crowd looked on in breathless suspense. The
firemen worked away at their engines without
their accustomed song, in dead silence, with their
eyes upturned to Willoughby and Adams. The
Kentuckian stood erect, with his arm resting on
the top of the chimney; his hat and watchman's
cloak he had left in Adams' room: a splendid cable
chain of gold was plainly perceptible, over the
breast of his mole-skin vest. At his feet, cowering
and clinging to the roof, with both his hands, was
Adams. His face expressed the wildest horror; in
heart-rending tones, he was calling on the crowd
for God's sake to save him.
As soon as Bradshaw saw Willoughby, he called
out to him, in a firm, clear voice, that every man
in the crowd heard, Willoughby! Kentuck! hold
on; I'll bring you a rope from the next building.'
Willoughby waved his hand.
To throw off his coat and boots, catch up a coil
of cordage, and enter the adjacent house, were
with Bradshaw, but the work of an instant.
Several
of the crowd said it was no use, as he passed
them; and one or two, from the best of motives
endeavoured to restrain him, but he rushed on
and, in a moment more, he stood on the roof of the
next house to the grocery. He put the coil of rope
round his neck; with one spring, he lit beside
Willoughby
;
but he would have fallen, had not the
Kentuckian caught his hand, for he had to jump
on the slanting part of the roof, in consequence of
the chimney. The roof cracked and smoked; a
cry of horror burst from the crowd.
Here, Kentuck, put this rope round you, and
let me let you down, said Bradshaw.
No, let's put it round this poor devil first,
said Willoughby, and let him down. I would
have dared the risk of jumping on the next roof
but I could not leave this man to die, while there
was hope.
While they spoke, amidst the breathless silence
of the crowd, they tied the rope round Adams
and lowered him down in safety. Willoughby
wrapped the rope round the chimney, made it
fast, and said
Now, Bradshaw, do you descend.
Not until you are first down, said
Bradshaw
.
Willoughby folded his arms, and looked a
Bradshaw.
Vol. I. 21
No, Kentuck, said Bradshaw, I got you
into this difficulty. You're making the peril
greater for both of us by waiting. Go a-head!
Come on! called out the crowd, come on!
the roof is falling!
The Kentuckian still paused; Bradshaw sprang
upon the next building, as the only means of
making him take the rope. As Bradshaw leaped,
Willoughby seized the rope: scarcely had it felt
his weight, when the roof fell in with a
tremendous
crash. The crowd thought for a moment that
both were lost. But, when the roof fell, the
chimney
stood; and Willoughby clung to the rope, and
held himself suspended, for an instant, by an
admirable
presence of mind, in air, till the smoke
somewhat subsided; and, while the flames were
yet smothered under the roof, he let himself down
in safety. By almost a miracle, Bradshaw, when
he jumped on to the next house, maintained his
footing. This he could not have done, had he not
been in his stocking feet. If the Kentuckian had
tried it, he must have fallen, booted as he was.
is he safe? called out Bradshaw. Is Kentuck
safe?
Safe as an old 'coon! exclaimed Willoughby;
how are you, Bradshaw?
At the name of Bradshaw, the crowd huzzaed
loudly. The deep silencethe fearful suspense
that had held them awed, was now broken, and
they shouted again and again. Bradshaw felt a
thrill of real pleasure as he looked down on the
sea of heads, and saw so many approving faces
upturned
towards him, and the many from the
house-tops
and windows. It gave him greater pleasure,
though, when he heard the crowd below huzzaing
for Kentuck. Adams, overjoyed at his deliverance
from the fiery death, had, though in the custody
of the watchman, told the crowd around of
Kentuck's
generous risk for him; while, in no measured
terms, he was denouncing old Scratch, who had
disappeared. The miserable male and female
tenants
of the lane gathered round Kentuck, who
was endeavouring to find his way to Bradshaw, in
wonderment and admiration; and, strange to tell,
his gold chain hung untouched round his neck.
The first person that Bradshaw met, when he
descended, was Fritz, with his boots and coat in
his hand.
Mr. Bradshaw, said Fritz, I just got here
when you threw off your coat and boots; a fellow
was making off with them, when I stopped him.
When I saw you on the top of that house, sir, I
thought you wouldn't need 'em.
Fritz, my good fellow, said Bradshaw, you
and I have both learned that, to be in danger, is
not always to be hurt. A miss is as good as a mile,
you know.
That's a fact, said Fritz, smiling, knowingly.
Fritz, I want to see you, particularly. You
must call at my office as soon as you can.
The boy promised to do so. As Bradshaw was
passing through the crowd, he met, at the same
instant, Willoughby and the Judge.
You're pretty specimens of human nature,
said the Judge, who evidently was much moved,
but who appeared very cynical; pretty specimens
of human nature, to disguise yourselves to catch a
poor devil, that you may, perhaps, hang him; and,
when you've caught him, to risk your lives to save
him. Bradshaw, you showed some feeling, if not
sense, in trying to save Willoughby, but as for
the Damon and Pythias friendship between
Willoughby
and this Adams,I can't understand it.
To stand on a house-top, beside a felon, whom you
have caught, when you had no business to catch
him; and because he can't get off, to burn with
him, is a
luminous
idea! There's nothing like it,
except that of a Hindoo widow burning on the
funeral pile of her husband. And that's not like
it; for she burns according to law, and the law
must be respected. How much a Kentuckian's
understanding is like an Irishman's, to be standing
up there in such a theatrical position`Get up,'
said a watchman, to Pat, `the house is on fire.'
`An', by hokey, what do I care?' said Pat, `go till
the landlordI'm only a lodger.' And you,
Bradshaw
,
after you had jumped on the house to let
that Adams down, first; and then to stand
parleying
with a Kentuckian as to who should descend!
A Kentuckian, who, if he could get a crowd to
look at him, would take Sam Patch's leap any
time, or ascend in a balloon for the sake of the
claps he'd get. It is preposterous, by Jove! I picked
up the biggest brick-bat I could find, and hurled it
at you with real vengeance!
They had, by this time, reached the outskirts of
the crowd.
Whose hack is that? shouted the Judge, to a
hackman, who was driving.
A gentleman sent a boy to our stable for it,
just now, sir, said the hackman. He ordered it
here.
'Twas I, said the Judge. That Jackson
has hacks, to be got at all hours, night and day:
it's a great convenience. Here, boy, giving a
boy some silver, you've been quick. Bradshaw,
get in; you look feverish, now. As soon as I saw
you safeI knew you must have pitched your
clothes any whereso, to prevent you and
Willoughby
being taken for madmen, or the inmates
of these places, burnt out, without clothing, and
roaming in search of it, I sent a boy round for
a hack. You're pretty spectacles, Willoughby
parading a gold chainit's lucky it wasn't stolen:
his friendship for Adams saved itand a ball-room
dress, in these haunts, to catch a rogue. He looks
like that mad tragedian, that came into the court,
the other day, and cut up his antics. A sixty
dollar
suit for such a purpose!there's your vanity
again! I suppose you wanted to shine out before
the Desdemonas of the lane. I saw a whole crowd
of women after Kentuck, like, I wont say what.
It's a marvel you were not knocked in the head.
Bradshaw, I wonder you had not more sense, than
to go on such an expedition, in a gentleman's dress.
Whose old coat is that, and where's your hat?
You'll catch some cutaneous disease from that
rascally
garment, that will last you for life.
21*
CHAPTER XV.
The
next morning, Bradshaw awoke with a
violent pain in his arm, occasioned by the manner
in which Willoughby seized it, when he jumped on
the burning roof beside him. He had also caught
a violent cold, which was accompanied with a
severe
fever. Willoughby and Cavendish went to
see him in the morning, and found him in bed, ill,
and getting worse. They determined not to send
for a physician there, but to see Miss Bradshaw,
who was staying at Mrs. Holliday's with Miss
Carlton
,
and inform her of the circumstance. As soon
as Mrs. Holliday heard of it, she insisted that
Bradshaw
should be removed to her house, where his
sister might attend him. This was too agreeable
to the affection of Miss Bradshaw, for her to make
any objection, other than to express a fear of the
trouble it would give. Mary Carlton smiled at
that. You know, Emily, she said, he is very
patient: I have helped you to nurse him before.
Besides, I know he will soon be well enough to sit
up and talk; and then a whole host of beaux will
be coming to see him. I will see him, if he's sick;
and who'll want to be trolloping to a
boarding-house
?
Nohe must come here. In half an
hour, Miss Carlton and Miss Bradshaw stood by
Clinton's bed-side, at Mr. Holliday's. The speedy
administration of medicine, by a skilful physician,
broke the fever the second day after his
confinement
;
and he was able to sit up, though his arm
was terribly swollen.
And, so, said Miss Carlton, entering his room
with a newspaper in her hand, Mr. Clinton
Bradshaw
,
you're a perfect herolisten. So speaking,
she read a full account of Bradshaw's adventure in
the lane, when he rescued Jane Durham from
Adams; and, also, a narrative of the events of the
fire: Willoughby's noble conduct, and Bradshaw's
aid, at the imminent risk of his own life. High
compliments
were paid to Willoughby, for the risk he
ran to save the life of Adams, whose real
character
was told. Speaking of Bradshaw, in
conclusion
,
the paper stated the fact, that when the
multitude
heard the name of him who so daringly saved
the life of his friend, they greeted him with loud
and long huzzas. This tribute of applause,
continued
the editor, Mr. Bradshaw, though a very
young man, who has not yet commenced the
practice
of the law, except in the criminal court, has
often received, for his great talents and splendid
eloquence in the assemblies of the people. We are
happy to know that it was given, in this instance,
to the impulses of a heart that is as brave and
magnanimous, as his genius is commanding. This
was from one of the first editors in the country,
who never paid an undeserved compliment. Miss
Carlton attempted to read it in a mock-heroic strain,
but, before she got to the conclusion, she threw
down the paper and ran out of the room, to hide
her emotion. She soon returned, with a piece of
fancy work in her hand; and, seating herself on the
sofa, very busily engaged herself with it, for a few
minutes. At last, throwing back her curls, but
without looking at Bradshaw, she asked
Who is this `beautiful creature' that the
paper
speaks of, Clinton?
A client of mine, Mary; and, you know, we
must keep the secrets of our clients.
You make great pretence to mystery, sir.
Not a particle. I scarcely know more of her
than the paper speaks of.
She is very prettyis she?
Beautiful.
Can she, can she be a murderess?
I think not, Mary; there's a mystery in the
case, which I can't unravel.
Here the servant entered, and said, there was
an old woman at the door, who wanted to see Mr.
Bradshaw.
Who is she? asked Bradshaw.
The old woman, who sells cakes at the
court-house
,
was the reply.
Bradshaw desired the servant to ask her in.
Nancy entered in her best habiliments. Her cap
was crimped with puritanical precision, and a
black silk dress of the finest, graced her person.
It was made after the ancient fashion, with
pockets
,
and the plaits in it were very carefully
folded.
Nancy made a courtesy to Miss Carlton, and
advancing
to Bradshaw, she exclaimed, Well,
Bradshaw
,
(our readers have already observed, that
Nancy seldom said Mister,) honey, I'm glad to
see ye; I sent Beck to inquire after ye, and I come
myself, yesterday, and the day beforebut, I
wouldn't have ye disturbedI only wanted to
know how ye were.
Thank you, Nancy, I am getting better; I
heard you were so kind as to call and ask after
me. Nancy, this lady is Miss Carlton, daughter
of Mr. Carlton, who lives next to my father's. I
believe you didn't see her when you were at my
father's.
No, I did not, but I heard tell of her. Honey,
ye're a bonnie lassie, as my first husband used to
say. I remember yer mother, well. Ye're like
her, but ye have better health. I knew ye
were not a Bradshaw; they have dark hair and
eyes. Bradshaw, honey, I've been this morn to
see the girl, Jane Durham. She's sore distressed,
on occasion of yer being hurt and sick; ye mus'n't
fail to do your best, in her case.
Have you heard any thing more, Nancy?
Nothing more, honey. I just stopped this noon,
at the jail, to see how things come on, and to have
a little talk with my old gossip, Mrs. Presley.
There I saw Jane Durham: she had heard of
yer being hurt, the day after it happened, by
the watchman, who brought Adams to jail. I
promised to send her word how ye were, by my
Beck. She's a forlorn, poor girl, my dear,
continued
Nancy, turning to Miss Carlton, but she's
an injured woman, and she has a woman's feelings.
Ye're rich, my dear, and ye have friends, and ye
stand high in the world. Ye have all that wealth
can buy. Ye can never knowno, it is not in
God's providence; I hope it is notthat ye should
ever know the deep sorrow that has entered this
young woman's heart. Yet, why may ye not?
why may ye not? Ye are beautiful: so is she. Ye
are rich: she is pooryet, riches may fly from us
like thistles on the wind, and then friends go; and
any thing's a shelter that keeps rain and snow out.
Though we are sheltered, what can keep us from
sorrow? Honey, I don't speak to ye to hurt ye,
dear. No! if ye have not one sorrow, ye must have
anotherfor none of God's creatures are free.
Them that ye have not, honey, ye can feel for;
and I see that ye do: I see it in yer bright blue
eye. If Bradshaw should be forgetting of this poor
girl, ye must remind him, dear. She's no
murderess
she's
no murderess. So, dear, continued
Nancy, after a pause, looking fondly at Miss
Carlton
ye're
no Bradshaw, but ye and he have
been brought up together. I bethought me, at
first, that ye could not be brother and sisterI've
seen Bradshaw's sister, and a sweet one she is; but
ye two may be nearer and dearer: ye may be a
Bradshaw yet.
So speaking; and telling Bradshaw that she would
call and see him, and bring him some fine fruit,
when the doctor would let him eat it, Nancy bid
him good bye. Miss Carlton, in great confusion,
without glancing at Bradshaw, left the room with
Nancy, to show her to the door.
A Bradshaw, yet! exclaimed Bradshaw, rising
and walking hurriedly up and down the room;
that would be as sweet as satisfied ambition.
But ambition must be satisfied first; no, not
satisfied
;
but I must be on the course, leading, and the
goal in view, before that crowning joy can be. Can
it be, though I were?she is so young, so
beautiful
,
so rich,suiters will press around her with
every art that man can practise. I must meet a
dozen Richmonds in the field, and, perchance, have
to contend against her father. What cares she
for me, but as a sister cares? She showed
emotion
,
in reading that newspaper praise; so would
my sister show just such emotion'tis natural
we have lived together since our childhood. I have
pressed her lip, and held her tiny hand in
playfulness
,
before I knew what passion was, or dreamed
of itand thus, in her innocence, she feels now.
Now
, I cannot keep the fire from my lip, when I
press hers. She does not think of me as a lover.
Yet, by heaven, if her heart is unengaged, Mr.
Clinton Bradshaw, you have a tongue, and why not
seek to win her? I have every opportunityI feel
that I have an influence over her; but it is,
perchance
,
but brotherly. And, if I have the
opportunity
,
is it manly, to win her with her splendid
dower, and in her glorious beauty, and I nothing
to throw into the other scale, but this frail form,
that she may love? No, no, no, Clinton Bradshaw;
this geniusthis commanding genius, if you have
it, that this puffing paragraph talks of, must
control
men first, and win the high places.
He walked up and down the room rapidly, while
his flushed cheek and burning brow showed the
fever had not subsided.
Yes, yes, I must win the high places first.
Bah! who would throw away ambition? Wolsey
thought not of the advice till he had lost all. In
this free land, thank God, we have no kingly
power
to damp our aspirations. All may aspire. Be
blessings on republicanism! None can hold back
the spirit, in this land, that men would honour.
But, said he, pausing before the glass, must
every little circumstance touch my health? O,
that I had Willoughby's body, to endure! He looks
as fresh this morning as a May day breaking.
Will I last, will I last in this toilsome way before
me? By heaven! while I, from very sickness,
must lie upon the road-side, with feeble pulse and
drooping head, some one, whom I left in the dim
distance, may pass me. Well, well, said he,
throwing himself on the sofa, sometimes I think,
perhaps, 'tis in my better moments, that I might
wed Mary, and live upon the Purchase, and let my
days glide on, like the stream before our door.
Under my old patriarchal oaks! Yes! I could
live in peace, if Mary were by my sideas
peacefully
,
as contentedly, as happily as I lived in my
childhood, when each other's presence was joy
enough.
Pursuing these reflections, he leaned on the
stand, beside him, and wrote the following
STANZASTO MARY.
I've thought, in many a dreaming hour,
If I could win the voice of fame
The wreath without a fading flower,
That gathers round a glorious name
That come what might, I should be blest;
The gay, the fair, might take the rest.
That woman's smile should but attract,
Like music at the gorgeous play,
Given between each passing act,
To while the tedious time away:
That when the scene employed my care,
I'd heed not how she went, nor where.
Even as the boy who takes the bird,
And loves to mark its panting breast,
And breathes it many a pretty word,
And gives it all that birds love best:
With woman thus I thought to play,
Then wearied, let her flee away.
That wish for fame is but a dream,
Which only in my dreams can live;
And could I realize the theme,
What could its frail possession give?
The bird, alas! her notes I've heard;
O! that I now could win the bird.
She should my every thought engage,
'Twould be my joy to hear her sing;
I'd keep her in a willing cage,
And of my heart I'd make the string:
Then lady-bird we could not part,
But with a seared and broken heart.
No, no, said he, pushing the stand from him;
I've the blues from loss of blood and pain. This
is namby pamby speculation. I must go-ahead.
Pursuing such reflections, Bradshaw wrapped
himself up in his cloak, and fell asleep on the
sofa.
After Nancy left Mrs. Holliday's, Mary
Carlton
(she was alone, Miss Bradshaw having gone
out to get some little delicacy for her brother)
hurried to her chamber, and sat at the window
gazing out into the street, where her thoughts
Vol. I. 22
were not for an hour. Her eye was animated,
and her colour went and came, though she sat
alone, at the course of her own thoughts. She
buried her face in her hands, while her rich curls
fell over them, and mused, and smiled, and wept,
and blushed, by turns. She seemed irresolute
what to do. Bradshaw, she thought, might want
something, and she ought to go and see. She
hesitated
,
and at last, with a noiseless step, opened
his door, and saw him asleep on the sofa.
Stepping
to the stand, she beheld Stanzas to Mary,
in Bradshaw's handwriting. She read them
hurriedly
,
picked them up, put them down, gazed on
the manly brow of Bradshaw, so calm in sleep,
the eye closed like a weapon sheathed, and
quickly
replacing the paper with scrupulous exactness,
but with a trembling hand, in the very spot she
found it, she left the room, with timid step and
fluttering heart, cautiously closing the door after
her.
CHAPTER XVI.
The
day after the incident recorded in the last
chapter, Bradshaw had recovered, with the
exception
of a painful arm, which he was obliged to
wear in a sling. He had not yet left the house,
when the following note was handed to him.
To Clinton Bradshaw, Esq.
Sir
In honour of your intrepid conduct,
displayed at the fire in  lane, on Tuesday
evening last, and in respect for your talents and
character, we have the high gratification, as a
committee
in behalf of the fire companies of our city,
to invite you to a public dinner, to be given at
the City Hotel, at such a time as your health will
permit: of which please apprize us. Permit us
to hope that your rapid restoration will give us
the honour of meeting you at the social board
very soon.
We are, sir, with sentiments of the highest
respect
,
Yours, truly,
Watson Johnson, Joseph Clooney,
Jonathan Cavendish, William Scott,
Henry Selman, Bird Pleasants, Com'tee.
Willoughby was also invited. In his note
accepting
the invitation, Bradshaw mentioned the
following
Monday, as the day when his health would
allow him to attend. On Monday, a sumptuous
dinner was, accordingly, served up, in an immense
hall, which was crowded. Bradshaw had the post
of honour, and beside him sat Willoughby. When
the cloth was removed, Bradshaw was toasted in
a highly flattering manner, and received with three
cheers, when he rose to return his thanks. His
remarks were admirably calculated to produce
effect
.
His language and thoughts were felicitous,
and every word was seconded by the voice and the
eye. They cheered him over and over again, as
he spoke, while his powers, like every true
orator's
,
gathered and glowed till there was not an
unmoved heart in the assembly. A true orator
can make any subject, where you touch his
feelings
,
of deep interest to his audience. He
complimented
Willoughby in the happiest manner, and
saidhe deserves all the honours of this
occasion
:
he risked his life, to save one whom he
could have no motive to save, but the promptings
of a heart, that could not let the most lowly, and
the most unworthy suffer. I acted, continued
Bradshaw, to save him who possessed these
noble
qualities of which I have just spoken, who is
an ornament, and an honour to society, and who,
from a love of adventure, and from a friendly
regard
to myself, was thrown into danger. None
could have blamed him, if he had left Adams to
his fateit was a fate, which all would have said
the ruffian merited. But IIhad I not exerted
myself for the rescue of my friendand under
these circumstances, I would have deserved, ay,
richly deserved, the fiery death which he escaped.
When Willoughby was toasted, in noticing the
remark of Bradshaw, he saidMy friend, to
whom I owe the deep debt of gratitude for my life
and who, if his life had been lost in attempting to
save mine, would have fallen, as though a star, which
had newly risen above the horizon, with a glorious
track before it, and with men's eyes upon it, in
wonder and admiration, had become suddenly
extinct
,
has been pleased to say, I deserved the
honours
of this occasion. Now, ain't this a pretty
story?when if he had not been
there
, I could not
possibly have been
here
.
During Bradshaw's confinement, Mr. Shaffer had
been appointed state's attorney, in which capacity
it was his duty, to prefer the indictment to the
grand jury against criminals, and to appear in
behalf
of the state at their trial. The court was
soon to set, and Bradshaw, was anxious to know
what would be done in Jane Durham's case. She
had not yet, of course, been indicted; but he was
satisfied that Johnson would do all in his power to
have a bill found; and he was desirous that it
should not be done, until he knew more of the case
had spoken with her on the subject, and had heard
something of Glassman. Before the fire, he had
inquired several times for Glassman among his
acquaintance, and the answer was, he had heard
town; but Bradshaw could not learn where he had
gone. Twice he had been to Glassman's house to
inquire, but he found it shut up, and he rapped in
22*
vain at the doorno servant came. Glassman was
a man of such erratic habits, that his
disappearance
for a day or two was scarcely noticed, but by
those who had intrusted business to him, and who
feared that he was neglecting it. He was not
habitually
intemperate, but he took too frequently
what is called a frolic, or spree, during which,
for days together, he would plunge into every
excess
,
which was sometimes followed by severe
indisposition
.
The day of the public dinner was the
first that Bradshaw had left the house since the
fire; and when the company broke up, he walked
round to Glassman's office, in the hope of hearing
something of him. On the rapper of the door of
the dwelling part of the house, he saw a napkin
tied; and he hesitated, at this sign of sickness
within
,
whether he should rap or not. While he stood in
perplexity, he saw Mr. Shaffer, the new state's
attorney
,
passing; and joining him, he inquired if he
could tell him any thing of Glassman.
Mr. Bradshaw, my respects to you, sir, said
Mr. Shaffer, in his formal, but courteous manner.
I understand, my young friend, that you have
been doing yourself great honour lately; honour
at the fire, sir, and honour to-day at the dinner,
which has been given to you. You deserve it,
sir, and I understand that there was a very large
assemblage who were very much pleased; an
evidence
of a popularity, which I have no doubt will
increase. You ask me, sir, for Mr. Glassman.
Mr. Bradshaw, there, is a man of great talents,
who, like the sun in a cloudy day, has scarcely
given a glimpse of the brilliancy which he
possesses
his
vices, sir, have obscured what should
have been a most brilliant career. Sir, Mr.
Glassman
,
as I have just been informed, (for I had some
business with him, and I have been inquiring for
him for this last week,) is just out of the hospital,
sir, where he has been, to use the vulgar
expression
,
as crazy as a bed-bug, from a fit of
intemperance
.
His friends, sir, don't want this publicly
known, and they have been trying all they can to
conceal it; but, sir, I may mention it to you. It
is melancholy. Every young man should reflect
upon it. Glassman is now betterhe was brought
home this morning. He is still quite ill, his
nerves are in such a state, that his physician has
deemed it proper to forbid his being seen. Is
your business urgent, my young friend? come,
this is my office, you know. Walk in.
Bradshaw accepted the invitation, and entered
Mr. Shaffer's office. After they were seated, he
congratulated the old gentleman on his
appointment
,
and said, I shall obtain more fees, Mr.
Shaffer, and lose more cases.
Ha! ha! Mr. Bradshaw. You compliment
me, sir. But, as I'm getting old, I must
occasionally
get you to assist me, when some stern
case comes up. I see you rescued a girl from that
notorious scoundrel, Adams, the other evening.
She is accused of murder, I'm told, sir. Since,
too, you have caught Adams. Well, sir, that was
a bold stroke. He is one of the greatest
offenders
,
and most determined ruffians, I ever knew.
Bradshaw thought this a fit opportunity to speak
to Mr. Shaffer of Jane Durham, and he
accordingly
narrated to him the whole circumstances;
observing,Though, Mr. Shaffer, you are the
attorney
for the state, I feel no delicacy in
mentioning
this to you. My object is not to get a
fee, but to have justice done. The girl I do not
believe is guiltymy suspicions rest elsewhere.
Well, sir, I will look into the case
particularly
.
I think I have some talent at ferreting out
a bad cause.
After a few common-place observations,
Bradshaw
took his departure, and went over to the jail.
Mr. Bradshaw, said Job, I missed you
sorely
.
I wanted to ax you on several pints of law
that I've been disputing upon with them
magistrates
that come here. I tell 'em it may turn out
that Job Presley knows more of the law than they
think for.
Oh! Mr. Bradshaw, you're good for weak eyes,
exclaimed Mrs. Presley, as Bradshaw entered her
apartment; while Lucy rose to hand him a chair.
I'm a sight, said Bradshaw to Lucy, which I
suspect your eyes, Lucy, will not soon require, then.
Where's my fair client?
She has, just this moment, gone into her room,
sir. She was wishing very much to see you,
replied
Lucy.
How do you like her?
Oh! very much, indeed, sir. She helps
mammy
and I, at our sewing, or she sits and reads to
us. We don't believe one word that's said against
her. Will you walk in? Here she is, sir.
Bradshaw, accordingly, entered the room, and
Lucy left it, closing the door after her. Jane
Durham
showed great joy at seeing him, and after,
with many tears, expressing her deep sorrow for
the trouble she had given him, and for the great
risk which he had run on her account, she told
him she would narrate to himif he could spare
time to listenall that she knew of Adams, and
how she came in the lane; protesting, at the same
time, that she was entirely guiltless of murder.
I am a guilty creature, she said, but no
murderess
,
no murderess! But there is a curse on me,
it may be, that demands my life. Yes, a curse, a
curseOh! how have I fallen! how have I fallen!
she burst into tears.
Calm yourself, Jane, said Bradshaw, in a
soothing voice; why exaggerate your errors into
crimes? You let your imagination brood too much
on the events of the lane; one, possessed of your
sensibility, never can see her situation, when
there is any difficulty in it, in a proper point of
view. Unfortunate circumstances may place any
one in, apparently, the most desperate difficulty;
but, remember, that the darkest night is often
succeeded
by the brightest day.
Mr. Bradshaw, you don't remember me? said
Jane Durham, in a more cheerful tone.
No, I do not remember you, said Bradshaw,
but it strikes me forcibly, that I ought to
remember
youthat I have seen you somewhere. Where
was it?
I have been your schoolmate, replied she,
with a deep blush. We must be about the same
age. Don't you remember Jane Durham, who
used to go to Mr. Lusby's? pretty Jane, they used
to call me. It may be, that the vanity engendered
in my heart, then, ruined me.
Bless me, yes, said Bradshaw, I remember
you. Pretty Jane! I remember you well; we
must, as you say, be about the same age. We
were about twelve, when we were schoolmates?
Yes, sir, near that age. My father hired a
small farm from Mr. Carlton; we lived, just before
you get to the school-house, on the left hand side,
you know, after you passed the Branch. You
frequently
used to stop at my father's, as you went to
school, and ask, if pretty Jane had gone yet.
I was just twelve, when my father moved away
from the neighbourhood of the Purchase, and went
to Long Swamp to live, near the third turnpike
gate, a little this side of the village they call, Fair
View.
I felt that I had seen you somewhere, said
Bradshaw, and that I ought to know you. Pretty
Jane! how often you have sung for me! Do you
remember it? Why, we have paddled in the Branch
together, after many a pretty pebble. Well, Jane, I
am glad I came through the alley that night: be
assured, that I will exert myself all I can in your
case.
O! I know you will, sir; I know you will. As
soon as I heard the watchman mention your name,
by the dead man, I thought it must be Mr. David
Bradshaw's son. I had heard of you often. Mr.
Glassman talks a great deal of you. And when
I came to inquire of aunt Nancy, I knew you must
be the same. She mused a moment, and then
continued, in a sorrowful strainMy father is
dead, you know, sir. He died shockingly,
shockingly
!
My mother! my mother! she's dead now,
tooI have an uncle living in Pennsylvania; he's
all the kin I have on earth. Believe me, I have
tried to resist degradation and shameI have tried
as the weak bird tries to resist the net of the
fowler
.
Mr. Bradshaw, indeed, I have been
unfortunately
,
miserably situated. Whom have I had to
guide, to advise, to shield, to protect me? My
father
it
is not wronging even the dead, to say it
was no father to me; and my mother! she meant
well, generally, but she was weak and easily
deceived
.
We lived comparatively happy, while we
were on Mr. Carlton's place; my father, intemperate
as you know he was, even then, was still within some
boundsthe good examples round him, in some
measure restrained him, and, at times, we had hopes
that he would do better. How fondly, even then,
a child, with all my apparent giddiness, I nursed
the hope!After some low debauch, in which he
would abuse my mother and myself, often turning
us out in the cold nights, into the woods, where, in
the leaves, we have slept, or lain down with the
beasts in their wretched shed, have we crept
towards
the house in the morning early, and appeared
to be busy about it, at our work, to prevent the
neighbours from suspecting our situation.
Sometimes
,
after one of these miserable nights, he would
come out and call us in, and ask my mother, in a
kind tone, for his breakfast: then, partly from
remorse
,
and partly from the shattered state of his
nerves, he would weep, declare how much he loved
us, and say, this should be the last time we should
be so treated. Oh! with what watchful
anxiety
would my mother and I try to keep him from
drink. We would sit by him, together, for hours,
and try to talk cheerfully, and, as if nothing had
happened,if mother had to go away, to attend to
the cows, or get wool to card, I would sit by him,
child as I was, and try to amuse him. If he
wanted
tobaccoand often, after one of these scenes,
and while he yet felt ashamed of it, he would say
he wanted it, as an excuse to go to the grocery, on
the road, and drinkas soon as he expressed the
wish, I would insist upon going, and, in the dark
night, on the lonely road, I have hastened off to get
it, while mother would try to amuse him till I
returned. At last, when, as he often would, he
avowed his purposes, and said he didn't want
tobacco
,
he wanted drink, mother would persuade him
to let me go and buy it for him, hoping that, by
keeping
him at home, we might restrain him within
some bounds, or, at least, hide the vice from our
neighbours, which we could not prevent; he would
say he had no money, and he must go himself to
get credit; mother would then produce her last
cent, which we had obtained for carding or
knitting
,
and send me. Alas! for what good? The
neighbours knew it long before we dreamed they
knew it. And when the drink was brought to him
at home, he would get crazy on it, drive mother
and myself, in the middle of the night, into the
woods, lock the house, and threaten our lives, if we
dared to return to it. These scenes, which were
not unfrequent, even when we lived on Mr.
Carlton's
place, became, I might almost say, of daily
occurrence, when we moved to Long Swamp. At
the Swamp, we were miserably situatedwe lived
in an old log house, off of the road, but within sight
of the village and the grocery. We had no
comforts
comforts!
we often wanted bread. My
mother's
health grew worse and worse from the
unhealthy
situation. My father never brought a
cent into the house, and often, with threats and the
most horrible curses, extorted from my mother the
few she had, that were to buy us bread for the
only meal we had in the twenty-four hours. In
winter, we had no wood; while my mother has
been shivering in her wretched bed, with an old
blanket for a covering, and the wind whistling
through the logs on her, I have cowered over a
few coals in our desolate hearth, and at every noise
I heard, started up and looked between the logs,
through which you might have put your fist, out
on the old fields, in which our cabin was situated,
with the fear and dread of seeing my father
staggering
over the heath, muttering curses on us, as
he came. Oh! exclaimed she, clasping her hands
together, this was heaven to what I have known.
One day, I remember it now, as I felt the
superstition
then that it was ominous, one cold winter's
day, I sat by our lonely hearth, and thought it
would not be wrong to pray to Heaven, that, in
returning
from the village, my father might never be
permitted to enter the house again. I started at a
noise I heard without, while a conviction of the
wickedness of my own thoughts struck me with
Vol. I. 23
terrible dread. I looked through the logs, and
beheld
my father, who was so drunk, that he could
not walk alone, staggering towards the house,
supported
by a man whom I did not know then, but
who was Adams.
Here a gentle tap was heard at Jane Durham's
door, and Lucy Presley entered and said, That
her mammy had got supper; and wouldn't Mr.
Bradshaw come and take a cup of tea with them.
With great pleasure, Lucy, said Bradshaw.
Come, Jane, said Lucy, in a kind tone, to
Jane Durham: and they were soon seated round
Mrs. Presley's table. The jailer's wife and Lucy
had arranged every thing in apple-pie order, in
honour of Bradshaw. There were several kinds
of preserves; bread of the whitest; toast of Lucy's
making, and biscuits spread out on a table-cloth
white as snow. The teaNancy had often
proclaimed
that Mrs. Presley made as good a dish
of tea as any body need tastewould have made
Dr. Johnson take his thirteenth cup. The jailer's
wife bustled around; and officiously, with her
apron, wiped off a chair, and handed it to
Bradshaw
.
She had dressed herself in her best cap
while old Job had put on a clean shirt and cravat,
with a fine broadcloth coat, that he had had for
years, and which he only wore on extraordinary
occasions. Much as Job liked Bradshaw before,
and he had often been heard to say, pointing to
him, that that young lawyer was going to take
the rag off the bush, at that bar; yet his rescue of
Jane Durham from Adams, which he had heard
from the girl herselfhis conduct at the fire, and
the talk which it had made about townthe
dinner
,
and Bradshaw's speech, of which Job, who
had been in the city, had heard great accounts,
all combined to raise him higher in the jailer's
admiration than any other man had ever stood.
Job brought the newspaper home that gave an
account of the fire, and of Bradshaw and
Willoughby
,
and read it with great unction to his
wife and Lucy. There, said he, what did I
always tell you about Squire Bradshaw, from the
first time I set eyes upon him! What did I tell
you? every body's found it out nowthere it is
in printI guess they know, too, that old Job
Presley knows something about human natur.
When a man's done a thing, any body can say
he did it; but it isn't every body that can
foretell
that he could do itthat's the pintsaid
Job, as he finished reading the article in the
paper
getting,
not without great difficulty, over
some of the longest words, which he attributed
to his bad eyesight, as he wiped his spectacles
that's the pint. I can read human natur, just
as I read that paperbetter! I can read human
natur without specks. There, daughter Lucy,
put that paper away. Mr. Bradshaw 'ill be in
more papers 'an that, 'afore the sod's on him, if
Job Presley knows any thing.
At supper, Job questioned Bradshaw, over and
over again, of the manner in which they managed
old Scratch, and took Adams. He laughed loud
and long at the narrative Bradshaw, who told a
tale well, gave of Willoughby's conversation with
the fellow at Scratch's. Time slipped away
unobserved
by Bradshaw, as he sat conversing with
the jailer and his wife, daughter, and Jane Durham.
Not feeling very well, for the excitement of the
day had given him a violent headach, he arose,
and telling Jane Durham, he would call over and
see her again soon, he bid them good night, and left
the jail.
END OF VOL. I.